$VAR1 = '$VAR1 = [
          \'--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
As writer and owner of this piece of intellectual property I hereby declare it
free for use and modification except I don\\\'t condone it\\\'s use in weapon systems
or for deception of any kind. This legal agreement cannot be modified ever, and
all modifications of this logic and/or data are bound by this same agreement.
You may sell applications and/or services that use this logic (or its
modifications) but you may not sell the logic itself and you may not try to
prevent others from understanding or using the logic in any way except if they
try to use it for deception or military weapon applications. Sincerely, Justin
Coslor. This book has many errors in it so please remember to be kind to
everyone and only read it gently when you are in a good mood and if you get
tired then gently stop and do something else such as sleep and dream of peace.
The diagrams and drawings and stuff for that book are in the difficult to
follow though sometimes interesting for me to think about and they are not
perfect either so please be kind and try not to treat anyone badly, and please
do not treat me badly. Thank you. More formal thought about that could perhaps
be carefully edited by hand. PICForm Compiler Project Perhaps people could make
a program that makes writing C programs easier. I think that C stands for
subset. It could be a program that translates PICFORM cross-domain relations
into C programs and data structures. Computation: COMPUTATION IS A MEANS OF
SOLVING PROBLEMS. IT IS APPLIED STRATEGY, AS AN APPLICATION OF NUMERICAL
DIMENSIONS TO QUALITATIVE ASPECTS OF A MENTAL MODEL, SO THAT PATTERNS ARE ABLE
TO BE IDENTIFIED AND CONTEXTUALIZED COMPUTABLY BY PEOPLE. I have noticed that
wide sweeping statements and humor do not translate very well.
-------------------------------------------- One of the ways to invent stuff.
Make a system to list topics next to each other with a selection of topics to
find some useful compatibilities of their relations. It requires helpful
compassionate human beings and a beautiful diversity of other life as all life
can be beautiful if nurtured to be compassionate. Helpful thinkers with many
skills are needed to think about the topics in the discovery of new ideas and
new profound concepts and considerations. Concepts are contextual perceptions.
A continuum of textuality is like the setting in a story and is what a context
is. Often it is said that a picture, such as a drawing or diagram, is worth a
thousand words. Sometimes less is more with words. It sometimes helps to
simplify and it sometimes helps to elaborate. It helps to try to do a good job
and plan ahead and leave plenty for the future.
---------------------------------- Summary of some ideas from Possibility
Thinking :: Sine Spiral Graphing note: many waveforms are perpendicular side
views of spirals and complex spirals. The Unit Circle is a front view of a
spiral or complex spiral. If data has recognizable features then it is a
pattern. Repetition is what makes a symmetry and is what makes a patterns\\\'
features recognizable to some. Information is a symphony of symbolism and
symmetry. Information, by it\\\'s very nature is a division. Yet it strives to
become whole again, and at the very least, to become balanced. All truth is but
an approximation of a deeper truth. What the world needs more of in order to
support the population is more industries. An entire industry can be created
simply by making a new kind of algorithm, such as a new adjective. Perhaps an
algorithm that creates a helpful niche for people to fill or make use of via
services or products. An algorithm can be developed by applying an axiom to a
new context. Contexts are composed of networks of patterns, patterns are
composed of networks of variables, and variables are composed of networks of
properties (first principle dimensions such as adjectives). In considering
ideas and information that is new to me, I ask networks of questions. The
questions can be framed as dependency charts. Now what is a good way to
understand dependency charts? List out the major nodes (most well-connected
nodes) as open-ended definitions and form lexicons out of the interconnected
definitions. Next, map out the rest of the nodes axiomatically using those
definition structures. Turn this into a software for common sense perception.
Maybe make a free cognition engine that can learn the meaning behind things so
that it can solve problems by figuring out new ways of thinking about things
such as by adapting the context of question /perception networks or another
helpful way. What metric makes an analogy recognizable? KNOWLEDGE MINUS WISDOM
EQUALS NOTHING Thoughtforms are to Metaphor as Plurality is to
Interconnectivity. Thoughtforms : Metaphor :: Plurality : Interconnectivity : =
Thoughtforms :: = Metaphor Form networks of questions to gain valuable
perspectives on topical and problem data. Model question engines in a careful
goal manner with sustainability and capability and filling necessity as the
primary objectives. Example: Make a question network. Draw a picture.
................................................. . . . . . . . . . . .
................................................. Basic question thoughtforms:
Why? = Is there a reason for how this came to be, and what is it? What? = The
existance of this shall be called by a name that needs to be defined, and we
are inquiring about that. When? = This occurred or shall occur at what time and
day? How? = By what process does this function? Notice that I had to use "what"
in every one of these... Except I tried not to use "what" in it\\\'s own
definition, which was difficult. "That" = a pointer to a specific instance of
something in existence... Whether it be in physical or virtual reality. The
difference between virtual objects and physical objects is that virtual objects
are just pointers to other pointers. Physical objects are pointers that point
to themselves in a loop of circular reasoning. To loop is to group. A dot can
loop a line. Sometimes experimentation is necessary to solve problems and to
answer questions because some nodes of information or questions or contextual
perception networks are otherwise unreachable, and often entirely unknown to
exist. We are surrounded by answers. However, if they are meaningless and often
impossible to detect without knowing at least some of the questions that they
are derived from, then without a question/answer connection, the consciousness
of awareness may not exist as well it may.
----------------------------------------------------------------------- Please
remember to not treat anyone badly. observe . The Certainty Principle When
anyone observes someone they change them and the observer is always also
changed by that which they observe. So worry not about that which is temporary
and instead think long and deeply about how to treat everyone well as that is
the proof by example that lasts forever. . Accuracy . Symmetry + Precision ->
Accuracy -> Efficiency Accuracy -> Clear Thinking -> Logical Reasoning Logical
Reasoning -> Organization Organization -> Tool Adaptability -> Resource
Management Resource Management -> Sustainability -> Repeatability
Sustainability -> Reliability -> Freedom Repeatability -> Mobility -> Liberty
Honesty -> Trust -> Diplomacy -> Symbiosis -> Justice Freedom + Liberty +
Justice -> Virtue Virtue -> Harmony Without Harm -> Friendly Intelligence Tool
Adaptability -> Creativity Honesty + Love + Logic -> Wisdom . Nurture Thought
We all know a lot more than we even know. We do not know what we can know and
we do not know what we can not know. We do forget. We do not know something
until we know it and then we know it. Then it becomes out of sight and out of
mind as a baby seed of potential that can grow if nurtured. . Suffixes The
suffix er is erronious. The suffix est is especially temporary. .
Juxtapositions is is In Synchronous equals is = therefore 1 = 1 AND 0 = 0 YES =
YES NO = NO + = plus = YES AND YES - = minus = NO AND NO therefore = .: : =
analogy = is to = are to :: = metaphor = as . KNOWLEDGE MINUS WISDOM EQUALS
NOTHING Thoughtforms : Metaphor :: Plurality : Interconnectivity Thoughtforms
are to Metmetaphor as Plurality is to Interconnectivity. Thoughtform is to
Metaphor as Oneness is to Interconnectivity. Oneness = Mono = Monality We are
of a common seed long ago. Words are semantics and symbols are syntax. Words +
Symbols = Knowledge Wisdom comes from Oneness and Knowledge is translated
Wisdom in Plurality. Knowledge is a gateway to Wisdom. Intention is the ion of
intent. Priority is before reality. Priority is a principle ion of reality. is
= in synchronous Ion is a gateway of dimension as a thought in a dot. A dot can
loop a line. To loop is to group. Knowledge as patterns in contexts. Thinking
as storing and grouping knowledge. Grouping is a way of networking knowledge.
Intention is the inverse of tension before reality, as a free flowing ion.
Metaphor analyzes the logic of thoughtforms plurality of interconnectivity.
Knowledge -> Wisdom Knowledge leads to Wisdom. KNOWLEDGE - WISDOM = KNOWLEDGE
MINUS WISDOM LEADS TO NOTHING ? = QUESTION = QUEST ION = QUALITY UNION
ESPECIALLY TEMPORARY ION. Something like that or something. . . Explorations in
Logic and Thought :: Even though we forget, we just do the best that we know
how in each moment.
-----------------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------------- If you
would like to donate then read this page: If you want to donate something I
only accept Post Office Money Orders.
Please be kind to everyone. Thank you. -------------------- JUSTIN M COSLOR PO
BOX 367 MOUNT VERNON, WA 98273
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
. Possibility Thinking: Explorations in Logic and Thought by Justin Coslor
Possibility Thinking: Explorations in Logic and Thought by Justin Coslor
*************** Table of Contents: *************** ---------------------- Book
I: Patterns In Contexts ---------------------- ---------- Stuff that occurred
to me while going through some of my old journal entries (about eight pages
worth). ---------- Numbers & Patterns Across Contexts ---------- Property
grouping axioms in cross-domain relations ---------- Properties ----------
Patterns In Contexts: Neural Nets As Priority Systems ---------- Patterns In
Contexts: a computational model for representing information metaphorically
through abdicative reasoning ---------- Augmenting Ideas: Generating New
Perspectives on Information ---------- Epistemology Systems ---------- Some
definitions for Patterns In Contexts Theory ---------- Cliff Partitions
---------- Object-oriented processing ---------- Simulated Models and Utility
Axioms ---------- Operation Spaces continued - Tomographic Data Structures
---------- Operation Spaces: Grids V.S. Networks ---------- Key axioms and
branch axioms in pattern collections ---------- Hypothetical Relation
Highlighting in Undefined Data Sets ---------- Am I reinventing the wheel?
---------- Programming ---------- Programming Languages ---------- Patterns In
Contexts Cognition Kernel ---------- Complexity ---------- Linker Patterns
---------- Patterns In Contexts Cognition ---------- Knowledge Mining
---------- Pattern Occurances ---------- ePIC Goal Representation ----------
Cross-Domain Relations in Analogical Relations ---------- Patterns In Context
and Question Asking Systems for Object-Oriented Programming ----------
Complexity Progressions ---------- Metaphoric Operations on Patterns Across
Contexts ---------- Information Theory Quotes ---------- Metaphoric Operations
---------- Visual Dictionaries and Axiomatic Abdicative Simulation ----------
Patterns In Contexts: 3D Engine ---------- Graphical Representation and Visual
Heuristics ---------- Creativity & Understanding ---------- Concepts ----------
Measurement Systems ---------- Re-contextualized Patterns ---------- Observing
patterns and differences ---------- Patterns Matching ----------
Remote-Controlled Contexts Via Pre-Processor Switchboards ----------
Definitions ---------- Geometric Abstractions ---------- Index of Topics
---------- Abstraction ---------- Analogical Recursions ---------- Implicit
V.S. Explicit Knowledge ---------- Analogy, Metaphor, and Examples ----------
Sight ---------- Computer Vision ---------- Rules Are Behavioral Expectations
---------- Categories: Part 1 ---------- Hypothetical Relation Highlighting in
Undefined Data Sets ---------- Some Thoughts on Information Theory ----------
Some Methods of Proof ---------- Axiom Notes ---------- Contexts ----------
Perception ---------- Perception -- continued from ----------.... ----------
artificial intelligence notes ---------- Mission Statement
------------------------ Book II: Networks of Questions
------------------------ ---------- Everything I know about questions
---------- Question Networks: option questions v.s. spectrum questions
---------- Question expectation templates and question context intersections
---------- Question asking systems ---------- Re-defining basic question
thought forms ---------- Writing Tips ---------- Regarding Education ----------
Choice ---------- Creativity ---------- Intuitions ---------- Ideas and
Probabilities --------------- Book III: Math Ideas: --------------- ----------
Infinity ---------- The upper limits of NP-Completeness ---------- Qualifying &
Quantifying Dimensionality ---------- Spirals ---------- Light Spirals
---------- Light Spirals continued ---------- Sine Spiral Graphing ----------
Conical Satellite Orbit Graphing ---------- Justin Coslor Applications of
Conical Hyperhemisphere Graphing When Combined With Sine Spiral Graphing
---------- Cross Domain Relations, for the Mathematics of Alternative Route
Exploration ---------- Hierarchical Number Theory: Graph Theory Conversions
---------- Hierarchical Number Theory Applied to Graph Theory ---------- Odd
and Even Prime Cardinality ---------- HOPS: Hierarchical Offset Prefixes
---------- Prime Breakdown Lookup Tables ---------- Prime divisor-checking in
parallel processing pattern search ---------- Looking for ways to merge prime
number perception algorithms ---------- Prime Sequence Matcher (to be made into
software) ---------- Prime Sequence Matcher Algorithm ---------- Prime number
patterns based on a ratio balance of the largest near-midpoint prime number and
the non prime combinations of factors in the remainder ---------- Prime Numbers
in Geometry continued . . . Modulo Binary ---------- Prime Numbers in Geometry
---------- Geometry of the Numberline: Pictograms and Polygons. ----------
Combining level.group.offset hierarchical representation ---------- N pictogram
representation of numbers ---------- Optimal Data Compression: Geometric
Numberline Pictograms ---------- Prime Inversion Charts ---------- Classical
Algebra (textbook notes) ---------- Privacy ---------- A Simple, Concise,
Encryption Syntax ---------- Automatic Systems ---------- How to combine
sequences ---------- Notes from the book "Connections: The Geometric Bridge
Between Art and Science" + some ideas ---------- Notes on three papers in the
MIT Encyclopedias of Cognitive Science by Professor Wilfried Sieg: Formal
Systems, Church Turing Thesis, and Godel\\\'s Theorems ---------- Concepts that
I\\\'ll need to study to better understand logic and computation ----------------
Book IV: Invention Ideas ---------------- ---------- Penny Universities
---------- Inspiring book notes & some art product ideas ---------- Art
Software For Making Symmetrical Design Patterns & Motifs ---------- Perspective
Drawing Projects ---------- Robotics ---------- Video Game Idea ----------
Portable Operating Systems On Cross-Platform USB 2.0 Flash-Memory Devices
---------- Nanotechnology ---------- Product idea: seed kits for suburban
gardens ---------- Bottled Water ---------- Camping Stuff ---------- Cooling
Shirt ---------- Dune Shirt ---------- Alternative Energy System for homes that
have an acre or more ---------- Knowledge lifespans and pictograph software
---------- Pictograph books for language adaptation ---------- Knowledge
lifespans and pictograph software ---------- Industries, Priority Systems, and
Adaptation ---------- Industry Creation ---------- Natural Gas Mining in
Landfills, Using Grids of Vertical Living Bamboo Plant Tree Grass Life Tubes
---------- 3-Legged Walking Robot (It Gallops) ---------- Magneto-sonic Element
Separator ---------- Diamagnetic Electromagnets ---------- PDA Kiosks
---------- PDA Virtual Reality/Augmented Reality System ---------- My eBike
Shop: Eco-Bikes(TM)(R) ---------- Ram-Horn Handlebars for City Bikes ----------
Augmented Reality Goggles for doing X-Ray Vision and 3D Image Reconstruction
---------- New Kinds of Electric Generator/Electric Motors ---------- Batteries
---------- Diamagnetic Energy Generation Satellites ---------- Electromagnetism
---------- Magnetic Coordinates ---------- Magnetic Battery Idea ----------
Toroidal EM Fields ---------- Crystalline Memory Lattices, and Super-Cheap
Gigantic Diamagnetic Electromagnets ---------- Supercomputer and Memory
Technology ---------- Speculation about photodiodes, photovoltaics, and the
nature of energy transmission through materials ---------- A New Kind of
Potentiometer (which can be used as a tactile sensor) ---------- Highly
sensitive touch-sensing/optical range-finding robotic finger sensor-pads
---------- A cheaper kind of touch-screen for computer kiosks for 2D operating
system user interface haptics and 3D augmented reality user interface haptics
---------- Course Catalog and Skills Inventory (Software Idea) ----------
Portable Robotic Hole-Threading Tool for Building Robots and Stuff. ----------
Cottage Industry Explosion: Portable Inexpensive Manufacturing Robots for
Intentional Communities in America ---------- Cottage Industry Stuff ----------
Holographic Rangefinding Orbiting Space Telescopes, for Holographic Geometric
Reconstruction of Distant Celestial Objects and Celestial Systems (or point it
at the Earth for Geographical Information Systems) ---------- Safety Skin for
Robots ---------- Free public archive of great anonymous writing and poetry
---------- Precise EM field sensing nanocoil fabric ---------- Notes on an
Intelligent Agents book ---------- 2D Wireframe Digitalization of Digital
Images for Computer Vision ---------- Computer Vision Thought ---------- 3D
Engine Idea ---------- Binary Space Partition Trees ---------- Data compression
for 3D polygonal objects ---------- 3D compression scheme --------Re-write my
paper on Chromodepth prism glasses and anaglyphs and how you can just snap
regular photos in a black room that has a red, blue and green light
sequentially lined up illuminating the objects front to back, for making 3D
Chromodepth photos. ---------- ---------- Thoughts on Computer Vision: 2D
Snapshots to 3D Wireframe ---------- More Computer Vision Thoughts ----------
Imaginative new perspectives on famous artworks ---------- More thoughts on my
Thermoelectric Generator Cloth Invention ---------- Inventory of revolutionary
inventions that I\\\'ve invented (but not built) up to this date --------- Puzzles
--------- World Medicine ---------------------- Book V: Philosophy & Quotes
---------------------- --------- Some topics I like that I think can really
help people and the world --------- The Dreamworld --------- Violence quote
--------- Ways To Help -- Topical Index of Ideas to Elaborate On: ---------
Bubble quote --------- The Future --------- Homo-Sapien Evolution ---------
Prizes --------- Interconnected Galaxies --------- Stargate (stay put)
--------- A guess about Pulsars --------- Freedom in Sleep --------- Good
Thinking V.S. Flawed Thinking :: Helpful V.S. Harmful --------- Hollywood quote
"Do not watch television or movies." --------- Do magnets affect time?
--------- Measuring Progress --------- Me --------- Expectations --------- New
Logic Operators --------- Motion --------- Book Notes on "Connections", and
"Telepathy, and the Etheric Vehicle" --------- Deep Thinking --------- Outside
the library --------- The Soul --------- One possible order of developments
leading up to friendly intelligence --------- Monality and Plurality ---------
What I Believe --------- Life Skills :: Love and Forgiveness --------- More
thoughts on the philosophy of love... --------- Excerpt from Justin\\\'s Journal
--------- Appreciation --------- Ways to heighten interest and ways of
inspiring motivation --------- On Motivation --------- Information Theory
Quotes --------- Perls of Wisdom
----------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------
---------------------------------------------------------------- The following
copyrights and dates may or may not matter.
----------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------
---------------------- Book I: Patterns In Contexts ----------------------
Stuff that occurred to me while going through some of my old journal entries
(about eight pages worth). Analogies mimic patterns across contexts via
cross-domain relations. That\\\'s the basis of Analogical Reasoning. Every pattern
in every context is unique to the properties and axioms of the contexts they
exist in. I\\\'ve written this book without doing a lick of research or reading
(except where indicated on a few entries), as an experiment to see if I could
generate some new foundations of knowledge and understanding. Some experts say
I succeeded. A symmetry is an example of an internal algebra. Unique symmetries
are atomic repetitions, and are the simplest form of patterns, distinct from
perceptually apparently random chaos. (I don\\\'t believe in ultimate randomness).
Analogical mimicing results in similar, yet distinctly different patterns. All
truth is but an approximation of a deeper truth. Understanding is subject to
computational complexity of the perceiver and the data forms and content
perceived. Knowledge is the quest of discovery, and understanding is the growth
of the perceiver. It\\\'s how possibilities happen through careful navigation.
There are no dead ends. Mark fundamental landmark differences in analogically
mimiced patterns, for possible classification category augmentations (for
navigation and data retrieval purposes). Beware of oversimplification of data
streams in order to fit a pattern into a perceptual mold. Even if my ideas
overlap with existing knowledge, they provide a new way of understanding that
knowledge, and that is valuable because my ideas are not based on mimicry since
I haven\\\'t studied topics related to them much (except a college philosophy
course and K-13 math). These ideas exist for the most part in their own
context. They can be no doubt eventually be linked to ideas in other contexts
though. Lexicons can often be linked to external contexts.
-------------------------------------- Numbers & Patterns Across Contexts
Metaphorically speaking, prime numbers are injective and composite numbers are
surjective, when translating functions from one context to another. Similarly,
single-repetition patterns are injective and composite patterns are surjective,
when translating relations from one context to another. This is an essential
part of analogical reasoning. -------------------------------------- Property
grouping axioms in cross-domain relations. (See diagram.) 1. All variables have
properties. 2. All properties are independent of their variable\\\'s context(s).
3. All properties have some combination of qualitative relations, quantitative
relations, existential locations, and existential conditions. 4. Every variable
exists within a context and can vary from context to context. 5. Contexts are
composed of networks of patterns, patterns are composed of networks of
variables, and variables are composed of networks of properties. 6. Information
can be represented as patterns in contexts, and in that way it can be
represented metaphorically through analogical reasoning and abdicative
reasoning. Relations of various kinds, location(s), and condition(s) (apon and
of) exist at all of the various levels, and those are the data access points.
---------------------------------- Properties These are first-level definitions
of some useful kinds of properties, any of which can be networked together to
create relations and variables and patterns and contexts that may exist in
physical and/or platonic reality: ---------------------------------- *
qualitative identifiers: Categorical names and cross-references. * qualitative
factors: Qualitative pieces of composite patterns. * quantitative identifiers:
Cardinalities (orderings), scalers, and surjective equalities. * quantitative
factors: Representational methods of measurement of dimension sets. * states:
Observable distinct configurations that mark and increment step counts. *
conditions: Dependencies that distinctly configure each state. * cycle counts:
A tally that is increased with each repetition of a process. * recursions: A
self-defined process or network (an internal algebra), or a function that calls
itself. * repetitions: An algebra, atomic elements that repeat, composite
patterns that repeat, or symmetries. * activity level: The number of cycles per
step (positive, negative, random, or null). * step counts: A tally that is
increased as conditions of each state transition is reached. * location: A
place in a memory grid where identifiable data is stored. * positions: The
sequence coordinates of variable in N-dimensional orderings. * orientations:
The perspective that data maps are observed from: This may be contextual, or
spatially framed position maps, and perspectives may even have translation
conditions of their own. ------------------------ As you can see, activity
level is just one kind of property, and priority systems such as neural nets
can be based on that property. Other kinds of systems can be based on other
properties. ------------------------ * Relations are the juxtaposition of
infrastructures, which result in an output. ------------------------ Patterns
In Contexts: Neural Nets As Priority Systems Neural nets are essentially
priority systems for allocating and de-allocating priorities of networked
elements such as variables on a grid. Each network can be considered a context,
and can be said to be a network of patterns composed of variables and
relations. If the patterns are functions, then the priority of each pattern
determines the level of activity (cycles per step) of each pattern\\\'s function
(s). Some priority level results in a random level of activity, and the other
priority levels result in either positive levels of activity, negative
(reverse) levels of activity, and an undefined priority setting results in no
activity. Example: Context: ABCDEFG * R1R2R3R4R5R6R7R8 == a network of patterns
(see diagram). Where each pattern == (a variable)(a relation Rn), and the level
of activity of each pattern is: (undefined, -3, -2, -1, random, 1, 2. 3)(a
variable)(a relation Rn), and the activity level determines how many cycles per
step that the relation Rn operates on the variable, and the pattern it is
linked to. These values could be anything, this is just an example. Activity
level is one type of property of the variable. ***Variables are composed of
networks of properties. ***Patterns are composed of networks of variables and
relations. ***Contexts are composed of networks of patterns and relations to
other contexts. Properties can be things like qualitative and quantitative
identifiers and factors, states, conditions, cycle counts, recursions and
repetitions, activity level (cycles per step), step counts, locations,
positions, orientations, etc. Patterns in Contexts: a computational model for
representing information metaphorically through abdicative reasoning. All ideas
herein are Copyright by Justin Coslor on their respective dates. These notes
are a progression of the concepts in the order they occured to me. This occured
to me as a pseudo-sophomore at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, PA.
(It\\\'s a first draft so please forgive it\\\'s sketchyness.) All knowledge=
information, which can be represented as metaphors. Metaphors are applied to
specific contexts and general contexts=multiple contexts. A. All knowledge is
metaphors applied to >= 1 context. B. A metaphor is a set of associations
(links, patterns) that can or is applied to a context. A single context...A
single specific context...general/nonspecific contexts. C. A context is a set
of restrictions (restrictions on information, associations, links, patterns,
sometimes even contexts). Therefore the statement A is equivalent to this
statement: "Each piece of knowledge is a set of associations that can be
applied to >= 1 set(s) of restrictions." ---------- The use of this I had in
mind is to make a computer software that could understand and manipulate (and
maybe even apply) metaphors. Many other ideas occurred to me today too,
possibly due to doing yogi breathing and meditation exercises and taking
vitamins since my health had been suffering. Epistemology Framework for
artificial intelligence "Patterns in Contexts" continued... ---------- * A
pattern is a collection of symmetries, where each partition section of data of
every symmetry in the collection corresponds to another partition section of
data in that collection, or sometimes corresponds to a piece or pieces of data
in another collection (or other collections) which may or may not be part of a
similar symmetry in that other collection. If data has recognizable features,
it is a pattern. Repetition is what makes a symmetry, and is what makes a
pattern\\\'s features recognizable. Unique partition sections of data are the
atomic elements that a pattern\\\'s features are composed of. A symmetry is a type
of repetition, but a repetition isn\\\'t always a symmetry (see metaphor
definition below). * A context is a map of patterns within (thus bounded by)
either a set or stream of data in which other patterns are ignored or are not
apparent. Or a context bounded by a larger pattern than the map itself (which
itself is a pattern that may or may not be part of the larger pattern), such as
the ordinal of the map or a pattern larger than the boundaries of the scope.
There can be many parallel streams, waves, or sets of data in, traveling
through, across, or around the self-updating mapping of patterns which is
chosen to be the context. Sometimes the corresponding partitions of data that
make up a repetition are translated by some pattern with each iteration, such
as in a methaphor. Yet similarity remains apparent (identifyable by some
means). Again, I believe that information is patterns in contexts, and that
information is metaphoric in nature. Tip: If confused by this write-up of my
premise, try reading the sentence in reverse order then back through again.
------------ Information is a symphony of symbolism and symmetry. Information,
by it\\\'s very nature, is a division. Yet it strives to become whole again, and
at the very least, to become balanced. ------------ Category Theory: Abdicative
context changing using identified metaphoric patterns. Some dimension additions
for alternating or specializing the application of a pattern or set of
patterns: - Location - Relative rate, relative timeline framework - Newly
recognized relations found under sequential and parallelly recursive brute
force and intuitively adaptive experimental logic search strategies -- Yields
hypothetical considerations which can be temporally prioritized and recursively
checked and updated from state to state and organized intelligently by current
1. depth, 2. branch size, 3. branch cardinality (alpha-numeric, etc), 4. task
growth rate, and 5. average task completion rate (for scaling computability).
------------ When you figure out why a variable is a variable in a particular
way, that understanding becomes a new relation to consider, which in effect and
affect either increases or decreases the dimensionality of the variable\\\'s
context. Some dimensions that are added usually increase task completion rate
(such as specialization) other dimensions that ar added usually increase task
growth rate (such as broadening the context or broadening the number of class
categories to consider). Generalization can in some cases merge categories,
classes, and/or contexts, or blur them for simplicity, and can increase or
decrease completion rate. ----------- Generalization is useful for
experimentation. All truth is but an approximation of a deeper truth. A pattern
is like a function, and a context is like a field. Each has relations,
variables (when thought of metaphorically), and often the potential for
variations and unconsidered variables of dimensionality. ---------- A working
definition of the mystery of consciousness might be ascribed to the interplay
between 1. perspective, 2. priorities, 3. intentions, and 4. awareness; all of
which depend on the flexibility, state, and mechanisms of belief held by the
subject. ---------- My data symmetry section analysis technique for perception
through patterns in contexts may be able to play a key role in automating axiom
and theorem discovery for any given context (i.e. contexts such as the
integers, the reals, wavefield analysis, map data, behavioral intention charts,
language/speech modeling and representation, transform sequences, etc.). Any
pattern discovered within a particular context can be applied to any of the
known axioms and theorems of that context, and patterns that are discovered can
sometimes be related to undiscovered axioms in that context. Anytime an axiom
or theorem is discovered in a context, the entire context is redefined (as well
as its subcontexts), and in doing so, its scope is narrowed. Choose -> Search
-> Experiment -> Classify -> Test -> Prove. Choose/define context -> search for
patterns -> searchfor patterns that relate discovered patterns -> postulate a
classification for each discovered relation. For each relation, if a
classification category does not exist that closely matches the relation, then
further experimentation, context choosing (add and/or subtract context
dimensions), and pattern searching must be done, starting with the
characteristics of all partially matched categories, until an accurate or exact
classification or category definition can be derived. After the relation\\\'s
category is realized, search for more examples of that relation and derrive a
proof of it. If the relation can be proven to be applicable to all patterns in
a given context and all subsets of that context, it can be said to be an axiom
of that context. ---------- Context can be thought of as a network as well as a
shell that encompasses abstract nodes. The context of a set is merely its
powerset, that is, until relations are applied. I don\\\'t believe in randomness,
but I do believe that some contexts are larger or deeper than the scope of our
perceptions. ---------- A context can also be thought of as a network of
patterns, or even the network of relations that tlinks patterns. But when
relations are applied to a context, it becomes an organism. An organism that is
capable of translation (metaphoric operations), modification (adaptationn),
division (duplication/reproduction/partitioning, and/or growth and association
with other contexts. ---------- There are patterns, and they exist within and
between/across contexts, and there are relations that act as reasoning engines
that operate on the systems of patterns and contexts. Patterns can have
analogue distortion, digital distortion, or metaphoric distortion. Contexts can
be approximations of larger contexts, and elaborations or extensions of smaller
contets or extensions of other contexts in general There can be relatively
unique (somewhat unique, minimal commonality) patterns and contexts. Note: the
word "commonality" is based on the greek root "monality", which is the
"commonality" of the prime numbers. Each prime number is a "co-monality." This
can be visualized in terms of geometry, to some extent. Every prime number is
balanced, and is symmetrical, and contains a unique number of dimensions, which
are also unique kinds of dimensions. Patterns and contexts and relations can
also be symmetry pieces of other patterns and contexts and relations,
regardless of whether or not they are distorted in any given state or piece or
part or linkage. ---------- Every context is founded on its own set of axioms
and theorems, and adding an axiom to or from a context\\\'s foundation
fundamentally changes the context profoundly, yet some structures may remain
un-affected. (*Note many of these notes may become invalid or ridiculous as you
read more, so mental filtering may be necessary.) ---------- This is a quote
from my journal. ""Metaphor" is a relational model of recursion, where the
circular reasoning (in recursive definitions & recursive functions)
cross-relates the elements of definitions & functions from multiple (or
different) contexts. That is why cross-domain relations are so crucial to the
metaphoric representation of knowledge and knowledge systems (logics)."
---------- "I also believe that information is metaphoric in nature (has
algebraic interconnectivity), and that it can be represented as a composition
of patterns in contexts, where the contexts themselves can be patterns, and the
atomic elements of each pattern are composed of symmetry sections (partitiopns
of data, where each partition is part of a local or dislocated repetition (a
symmetry, and algebra)). And it is only through the repetition of a data
section that part of a pattern can become recognizable from apparently random
white noise. Randomness and white noise are probably patterns that are larger
than the scope of our perceptions, so the data appears random. And I say that
metaphors can be represented geometrically because all of the prime numbers
(the balance points in the universe) are symmetrical when represented
geometrically, and it is likely through primarily symmetrical sensory and
cognitive structures that our minds can interpret information. And I think of
metaphors not as A=B, but more like the similarity of the juxtaposition of A\\\'s
elements in the context of B, and B\\\'s elements in the context of A, in terms of
general systems theory. I equate truth with workable patterns that become more
and more refined and defined as they get used. I believe that all truth that we
are capable of perceiving is but a small approximation of the whole truth. And
that the truth/patterns that we are capable of using is often subject to
perception within varying contexts. But there seem to exist connections between
information none-the-less, through whatever means. Possibly since (in my
opinion) everything came from oneness)." ---------- Scope & Context ->
Boundaries and Restrictions/Limitations Class -> Purpose Type -> Syntax Pattern
Definitions -> Semantics Data Element Groups -> Configurations (Data Maps &
Dependencies) ---------- Patterns in Contexts Cognition Kernal Database ->
Metabase -> Context Rotator -> Experiment Application Field Expandable
Adaptable Translatable Summarizable subjectively/objectively ======> Metaphoric
Linkers Patterns Toolkit Augmentation Socket Parameters Analysis Scope
Dimensionality of (Input/Internal perspective "eyes") Geometry & quantitative &
qualitative properties of simultaneous interrupts and their instantaneous
functional interrelations and interactions across multivariate sequence states
(such as time & symmetry equivalencies). *Every set state is but an
approximation of the possible combinatorial translations. ----------
Epistemology thoughts on Metaphor Abduction Metaphors hide cross-domain
relations between generalized nouns, adjectives, and systems within a
semi-subjective context of perspective. The descriptive mappings of metaphors
and multi-layered metaphoric operations are generallymore foundational than
their analogical counterparts, as the metaphoric objects and relational context
is generalized (from set, type, and categorical specifics), which simplifies
the computational complexity of the models\\\' qualitative factors, and provides
new bases for consideration and re-application of data, relations, and
knowledge. Metaphor generation provides the architectural basis and objective
of considering newe relations and data experimentatiopn for deriving and
arriving at new models of understanding. data --> context unknown patterns -->
hypothetical contexts relations --> categorical context parsing metaphoric
relations --> cross-domain functions across contexts specific knowledge -->
contextual scope focusing/narrowing analogies --> applies metaphoric relations
to different examples of specific knowledge for partial transitivity new
knowledge --> modifies existing contexts to incorporate new axioms. ----------
Prioritization and choice in decision systems (Part of a reasoning engine.)
---------------------- New action (such as prioritization or actual action) ^
---^ Evaluaction ->criteria ^---^ outcome ^---^ choice ^---^ initiative factor
(s) ^---^ prioritization ^---^ evaluation-->criteria ^---^ possibilities
---------------- ---------- Inventing industries with patterns in contexts What
the world needs more of in order to support the ever rising population levels,
is more industries. An entire industry can be created simply by developing a
new kind of alagorithm, or an algorithm that creates a niche for people to fill
with services or products. ********************** An algorithm can be developed
by applying an axiom to a new context. ********************** This may require
forming or describing a new context or kind of context, with intentions and
expectations and attributes or properties in mind, as axoms are chosen and
adapted to make that possible. Theorems can then be derived from those axioms,
that are specific to that context, and when possible, they can be
metaphorically related to theorems in other contexts. This is the basis for the
patterns in contexts model for creating new information. It relates directly to
abdicative reasoning, analogical reasoning, and cross-domain relations. Axioms
depend on which dimensions they can exist in and apply to. For they are the
links that connect different dimensions, parts of dimensions, and sets of
dimensions, with the goal of unique lowest-terms representation. Usually they
incorporate at least some implicit knowledge or material structure in their
model. ----------- Property grouping axioms in cross-domain relations. (See
diagram.) 1. All variables have properties. 2. All properties are independent
of their variable\\\'s context(s). 3. All properties have some combination of
qualitative relations, quantitative relations, existential locations, and
existential conditions. 4. Every variable exists within a context and can vary
from context to context. 5. Contexts are composed of networks of patterns,
patterns are composed of networks of variables, and variables are composed of
networks of properties. 6. Information can be represented as patterns in
contexts, and in that way it can be represented metaphoricly through analogical
reasoning and abdicative reasoning. Relations of various kinds, location(s),
and condition(s) (apon and of) exist at all of the various levels, and those
are the data access points. Today in a Cafe I was talking to my friend
-------------- telling him about how I come up with ideas. Besides keeping an
ever growing network of questions in the back of my mind, I take a topic or
generate a topic by combining keywords, and then think about how that topic is
typically represented, then I try to epistemologically dissect that
representation and then rebuild the content using different, if not more
foundational contextualization of those concepts. Then I go off on a tangent
exploring the most interesting parts by associating other concepts, patterns,
contexts, and operations to the new representation of the concepts in the
original topic. It is often very valuable to have alternative representations
of ideas and concepts and topics because each representation can yield a useful
perception. If there is any word sense ambiguity, or use of metaphor, then each
alternative representation can yield many perceptions, each of which could
uncover previously unseen or unconsidered aspects of the topics, ideas, and
concepts. So in the end, exploring and mapping out alternative representations
of concepts, ideas, and topics is a way to augment their knowledge base, by
generating new perspectives on the information, which can generate entirely new
contexts, which can generate entirely new knowledge bases, by treating all
information metaphorically. People are currently very good at metaphoric
interpretation and analogical reasoning. Computer programs currently are not.
It\\\'s the next step towards computational methods of abdicative (round-about
scenic-route) reasoning. Anyway, my friend said I should make a program that
does what I do, i.e.: a program that recontextualizes information from
different perspectives of association, sort of like a choose-your-own-adventure
story, but more like a choose-your-own-perspective program. Like a computer
program that generates alternative representations of ideas, topics, and
concepts. Or even more generally, a computer program that generates alternative
representations of patterns (thoughtforms) in a variety of contexts (settings).
---------- Epistemology Systems Categories, and complete dictionaries as
foundations. Quantified objects (and systems) can be juxtaposed into relations
that balance alternative representations of objects and systems via a
structural or syntactic methodology that acts as a transformation into some of
the possible alternative representations of the quantified objects and systems.
Algebras as alternative representations of information. Algebras can rename, or
point to representations of information, as well as interconnect and dissect
informational objects and systems. All objects and systems are named.
Simulations, recontextualizations, and "polymachines" as alternative models of
systems. Proof is contextual, in other words: proof is dependent on perspective
and representation. In much larger contexts than the original context in which
something was proven, most "proof" becomes incomplete or uncompatible, and
sometimes even false if more foundational epistemological structures are found
to have been overlooked. Proof is complete, logically consistent introspection
of perceptions of concepts. Any given proof is only applicable to specific
axiom sets. I.E. a proof based on one axiom set may be incomplete or
uncompatible or even false in a context composed of a different set of axioms.
Therefore concepts must be analogically translated into other contexts and
their translations must be formed concurrently with their proof validity in
their new context, as a best-fit categorical search procedure. The proof is a
complete, concise system, so the proof in it\\\'s new context can be considered to
be a polymachine, since it is an alternative representation of that system. A
polymachine is a set of cross-domain relations that operate on
analogically-matched patterns from an original context to a new context, and
represents an alternative form of a system in a different context. Polymachines
are created by inductive, deductive, or (in the case of analogically translated
proofs) abdicative reasoning. Cross-domain relations are relations that
analogically match the domain of a relation in one context to the domain of a
relation in another context whose range approximates the same infrastructure
and quantitative parameters while leaving the qualitative parameters
categorically open-ended; they are a form of analogical reasoning. Input
Devices->Internal model buffer->Association and repetition filter->Analysis/
comparison engine->Perceptions on experience->Algebraic Conceptualization->
Character sets and dictionaries, or number systems and axiom sets ->
statements, arguments, inquiries, propositions, implications, operations,
filtrations, combinations, exegesis, dissertation, assignments,
contextualizations, templates, associations, compositions, dissections,
introspections, modifications, adaptations, introductions, translations,
transformations, distortion, refinement, recontextualization, proof, mapping,
search, buffering, sorting, indexing, encoding, decoding, regulation, pattern
formulation, trans-substantiation (joke), frollick. Copyright 5/23/2005 Justin
Coslor Some definitions for patterns in contexts theory Metaphoric objects are
informational objects defined by their relational properties. In relational
contexts, sub-contexts of each property are independent of the application
context. Qualitative factors are computed by mapping and defining a lexicon of
their properties. Qualitative factors are reflective and algebraic usually.
Quantitative factors are computed by counting and performing materialistic
operations on them, and mapping them in that way. Quantitative factors are
materialistic and geometric usually. Copyright 8/2/2005 to 8/3/2005 Justin
Coslor Cliff Partitions Cliff partitions are perceptual references that
distinguish deeply layered patterns from surface patterns, much like a cliff
wall bordering the ocean. In the ocean, every couple of feet down an ocean wall
is a new layer, much like how layers of pixel groups can be laid out on a
visual canvas, with some stacked up several layers high on an edge. Cliff
partitions are essential markers of where a topology has a steep slope that may
or may not be an overhanging awning above a hidden hollow or cave. In topology,
cliff partitions are useful for analyzing the depth perception of a view. In
linguistics, cliff partitions may indicate a sentence that is placed in the
wrong order, or it may indicate a sudden change of topic, or a jump from one
perspective of a context to a deeper or more superficial depth of perspective
of that same context. Cliff partitions in linguistics may also indicate the
boundaries of a given context, where one context ends and another begins. Cliff
partitions are only conceptual perceptual references in linguistic domains, as
writers and speakers linearly paint a nonlinear picture with their words.
Copyright 5/23/2005 Justin Coslor Object-oriented processing Grids (a.k.a.
manifolds), networks, and gridded networks all can house patterns in contexts
of information data sectors as the representation of knowledge (knowledge is
information that contains meaning). Grids, networks, and gridded networks are
materialistic operation spaces for knowledge representation, whereas the notion
of "patterns in contexts" are the Platonic operation spaces that form the
meaning behind the scenes on the materialistic operation spaces. Identifying
the representation of knowledge in an operation space as "patterns in contexts"
and specifying the details allows us to work with the information in an
object-oriented manner. Copyright 5/27/2005 Justin Coslor Simulated Models and
Utility Axioms If a network or grid is composed of N elements, then it is
capable of simulating every possible permutation of those elements by forming
internal networks and sub-networks (& grids). Grid networks allow for an
infinite number of combinations to be simulated though, but only some
simulations are of any use. Maybe there are utility axioms that can be defined
to tell us what classes of models contain useful representations. It seems like
some factors that might determine whether or not a model is useful would be: 1.
Compatibility with existing useful models. 2. Novel representation or novel
perspective. 3. Incorporation of new information. 4. Novel capability. 5.
Ability to link two or more other models together. 6. Ability to prune other
models. There may be many more factors directly related to evaluating the
worthiness of a model. Simulation allows for recontextualization of models and
problems and systems. Copyright 5/22/2005 Justin Coslor Operation Spaces
continued - Tomographic Data Structures In the gridded network system, as
described previously, a multidimensional array is built between selection of
nodes in a network, where elements of this array can be used to build internal
networks between the primary node anchors of the array, or between other nodes
in other networks --as in cross-domain relations. This process can repeat to an
infinite depth, in the order of network node to array anchor to array node to
tomographic network to cross-domain relation network to array grid, cyclically.
This is a way of creating tomographic data structures of an infinite depth and
of infinite permutations, due to the potential for infinite depth, all without
adding any extra primary nodes. Every array element and every node represents a
relation to or between their anchors or parent nodes. Copyright 5/21/2005
Justin Coslor Operation Spaces: Grids V.S. Networks Rows and columns and layers
are dimensions of a grid, but dimensions can also be parts of an N-dimensional
array. Each of the dimensional intersections form a unique partition that
relates or is categorized by it\\\'s parent sets\\\' position along their own
sequences. So in this way, elemenets on a grid (i.e. in an array) come from
multiple parents, wheras elemenets in a network can often come from only one
parent (an injective branch). However, in some networks, such as where a planar
geometry can exist by the interconnection of more than two nodes, multiple
parents can be a grid of subspaces between the nodes on the plane that they
make, and in those subspaces multivariable position and quantized quality
relations can be said to exist, that are anchored to multiple origin points
(each vertex be treated as an origin, and angles between them only serve to
define the partitioning of the planar grid). I\\\'ll call this kind of
transformation of a network "a subspace grid of vertices". Maybe this
combination of a grid network can enhance the operation space by making any
nodes on a network able to be related to eachother, in grid format, between
particular data sections on the subspace grid as well as between other primary
nodes. The other kind of operation space is the Swiss cheese like structure
that surrounds a subspace geometrized grid transformed network. The inner edge
of that space is where one context ends and other contexts may begin to exist.
Copyright 5/14/2005 Justin Coslor Key axioms and branch axioms in pattern
collections. Patterns are composed of smaller parts, with the smallest parts
being repetitions of unique elements in which no sub-patterns are apparent;
also, these smallest parts exist and their repetitions make them algebraicly
recognizable due to certain axioms, which act as fundamental truths
(self-evident assumptions) for which no proof is said to be needed. This being
said, we can say that all patterns that are unique in some manner must contain
at least some unique axioms, and if we look at a collection of basic patterns
and determine what is unique about each one and what is in common between them,
and then figure out how those similarities and differences ar ordered on an
axiomatic level, we may discover key axioms and branch axioms which can be
represented in a nodal network graph. The value of this is that we can then
understand, at the most basic level, what makes a pattern exist, what makes a
pattern recognizable and similar to other patterns, and what makes a pattern
unique. We can use that understanding to select axioms suitable to generate a
set of patterns with a measurable degree of flexibility/adaptability, to use in
constructing a system of perception, similar to a painter mixing paints on an
artists pallete, while he mixes concepts in his mind\\\'s eye. Copyright 11/7/2004
Justin Coslor Hypothetical Relation Highlighting in Undefined Data Sets: If
categorical names have been assigned to finite elements in a domain, the rest
of the data in the set can be hypothetically considered to be relations or
parts of relations (on those elements and elements not in that buffered data
set). Or they may be elements of categories you don\\\'t yet recognize or know of
yet. 9/23/2004 Justin Coslor Am I reinventing the wheel? Today while studying a
diagrammatic map on "Can Computers Think?" that Seth Casana gave me I learned
of work that has already been done in Artificial Intelligence that is very
similar to some of the concepts that I came up with on my own. For instance,
there has been work done in the area of making computer software that can
understand "analogies". That is very similar to my concept of "metaphoric
operations". Also, in 1989 in seems, Keith Holyoak and Paul Thagard created
ACME, which is a connectionist network that discovers "cross domain analogical
mappings." That soundsd just like my concept of "cross domain relations for
alternative route mathematics", that I have written about prior to reading
anything about it, and I came up with it all on my own earlier this year. Here
are some Analogy Systems: Copycat - Douglas Hofstadter and Melanie Mitchell
1995. SME - Brian Falkenhaimer, K. Forbus, and D. Gentner, 1990. ACME - Keith
Holyoak and Paul Thagard, 1989. 8/20/2004 Justin Coslor Programming In the
preface to the introductory computer programming book "The Little Lisper"
second edition ISBN 0-574-21955-2 it says: (that in LISP) "the primary
programming activity is the creation of (potentially) recursive definitions."
Now to me, that sounds like the main task (and goal) is to map out and/or
define patterns that are either finite or infinite and to put them into a
relational context that is capable of transforming incoming data patterns by
relating them to stored data patterns, so that the output can be 1.
represented, 2. stored, and 3. used/manipulated. I believe this because nothing
is more recursive than a pattern (nothing is less recursive than a pattern as
well, except that which is totally random). Patterns always exist within a
context or contexts, otherwise they are not recognizable and look like random
garbage (see Godel\\\'s Theorems). On page vii it also says that "LISP is the
medium of choice for people who enjoy free style and flexibility. LISP was
initially conceived as a theoretical vehicle for recursion theory and for
symbolic algebra." (and likely Lambda Calculus & the EMACS environment for
Artificial Intelligence)... LISP syntax looks very similar to my old nonlinear
style of thought notation, with its parenthesis within parenthesis (which was
good for scaling depth on tangents and concept descriptions). Copyright 8/4/
2005 Justin Coslor Programming Languages "Programming languages are formal
languages that have been designed to express computations." - How to Think Like
a Computer Scientist - Java Edition In other words, programming languages are
mappings of balanced processes. The flow of any kind of process can be mapped,
if not only approximated by a systematic contextualization of patterns and
relations involved in the process. Every system is like a state machine in
motion, where the elements and operators are encapsulated by their
interconnectivity via contextualization, which is a form of perspective of
finite scope. Formal languages have fully defined axioms, and are consistent
and complete in the mechanics of their methodology. But what is the methodology
of mappings of balanced processes in general? The universality concept applies
to them: they are consistent and complete because they are balanced about a
tight contextualization, where the interconnectivity of the process\\\'s elements
acts like a fulcrum (when thought of quantitatively), with no element left
unconnected. That\\\'s why patterns in any context can be transformed through
operations into different patterns, so long as there is a method of
representing both sets of patterns. The balance comes from having multiple
methods of representing each state of the elements in the process. The mapping
comes from being able to contextualize the processes, which is only possible if
the processes have finite scope, and are completely defined (thus
interconnected), and must be systematic (thus logically consistent) in order to
be precisely mappable with regularity throughout their states of operation.
Copyright 9/22/2004 Justin Coslor Patterns In Context Cognition Kernel
[Database]-> [Metabase]-> [Context Rotator]-> [Experiment Application Field]
----------------------- The following are *a. Subjectively and *b. Objectively
1. Expandable, 2. Adaptable, 3. Translatable, & 4. Summarizable:
------------------------ Metaphoric Linkers ------------------------ Pattern
Toolkit ------------------------ Augmentation Socket Parameters
------------------------ *Considerations: ----------------- I. Analysis II.
Scope Dimensionality (of input/internal perspective "eyes") III. Geometry &
Quantitative & Qualitative properties of simultaneous interrupts and their
instantaneous functional interrelations and interactions across multivariate
sequence states (such as time & symmetry equivalences). **Every set state is
but an approximation of the possible combinatorial translations. Copyright 6/13
/2004 Justin Coslor Complexity Commercial or proprietary software is surjective
or injective, but free open-source software is bijective. Part of the FRDCSA
Tutorial (Free Research Database Cluster Study and Apply) on frdcsa.org says a
blurb from an ACM paper about measuring the power of a set of axioms in order
to measure the information contained within the set of theorems that can be
deduced from those axioms. It says that one can only get out of a axiom sets
what one puts in. The paper says something like: "If a set of theorems
constitutes t bits of unique information, and the set of axioms that the
theorems are based on contains less than t bits of unique information, then it
is impossible to deduce those theorems from that set of axioms." My friend
Andrew J. Dougherty of FRDCSA says that to understand the general necessity of
having more software, simply replace "theorems" with "problems", and "axioms"
with "programs", and "deduce" with "solve" in the previous statement. Doing
that we get: "If a set of problems constitutes t bits of unique information,
and a set of programs contains less than t bits of unique information, then it
is impossible to solve these problems using just that set of programs. By
"problems", I think he means "explicitly defined problems", because an
explicitly defined problem is a program that has yet to be executed. Abduction
may be necessary to define all of the elements and operators of a problem in
the process of turning a problem into a program. I say, replace "theorems" with
"context", and "axioms" with "patterns", and "solve" with "create". This
yields: "If a set of contexts constitutes t bits of unique information, and the
set of patterns that the contexts are based on contains less than t bits of
unique information, then it is impossible to create those contexts from that
set of patterns." Copyright ?/5/2004 Justin Coslor This is part of my method of
knowledge representation for my epistemological representation of artificial
intelligence through Patterns in Contexts. Contexts come from patterns that are
combined. There can be patterns noticed in the cross-examination of different
contexts, but those "patterns" are elements of a greater scope of context than
any of the contexts being cross-examined, that is to say, when those
cross-context patterns are not noticable when only examining any one of those
contexts in relation to itself. This method of knowledge representation may
hopefully prove to be useful in the abdicative search for new axioms within and
across representable contexts. A context is represented by its systems of
patterns (a.k.a. it\\\'s system of axioms). Copyright 6/5/2004 Justin Coslor New
patterns can be discovered by experimenting with data sets: analyzing them in
relation to metaphoric operations on other data sets. Metaphoric operations are
operations that translate, juggle, predict/locate, and/or transform specified
elements across specified contexts. Copyright 6/7/2004 Justin Coslor New
metaphors can be discovered by combining axioms that come from multiple number
sets, orderings, and/or algebras. Metaphors are esoteric relations. The
application of a metaphoric operation on a data set sometimes results in the
discovery of new axioms through the new perspective\\\'s set of relations brought
about by the application of esoteric relations. Metaphoric perception is all
about cross-domain relations. This is because the application of metaphors
brings about both: 1. relations between the range of the metaphor and the range
of all applicable operations (operations of applications) of the data set, and
2. new cross-domain relations (new domain perspectives) for both the operations
of potentially all applications of the data set; and sometimes new cross-domain
relations and new ranges for the system and set of relations that algebraically
defines the metaphor (when applying the unmatched relations that are not
bijective of the operations of applications of the data set) metaphorically
(i.e. algebraicly to the metaphor). Copyright 6/5/2004 Justin Coslor Linker
patterns Linker patterns require both an observation buffer (that is at least
of equal size to the sum of the contexts to be linked), and linker patterns
require an operation buffer that is at least as big as the observation buffer
(though far larger is necessary for some observations, even though the amount
of data that ends up in the operation buffer may be far less, in some
instances, than the amount of data filtered out of the sum of the contexts into
the observation buffer). Data gets filtered out of every applicable context by
the linker pattern\\\'s "filter specifications", right into the linker pattern\\\'s
observation buffer. Then the linker pattern\\\'s set of metaphoric patterns
operates on the observation buffer one at a time or in parallel, but inside the
operation buffer. The linker pattern contains a set of metaphoric patterns
whose elements are referenced algebraically to the applicable data elements
present in the observation buffer for every possible metaphoric pattern
combination present in the linker pattern innately. Metaphors which are
algebraically a complete set of elements to applicable/valid data elements are
used in the observation buffer, then inside the operation buffer they perform
their calculation (translating, juggling, and/or transforming of the data
section by the metaphor) and the linker pattern then places the output in an
organized form (so it can be referenced later), and those outputs are placed
into a buffer called "the unified context" of the original contexts. This
"unified context" includes the linker pattern\\\'s filter specifications and
metaphor set that was used (i.e. the set that was computable). Linker patterns
can duplicate themselves to divide up the work of applying their metaphoric
pattern sets to the observation buffers\\\' data (and they update each other with
each successful operation). Each linker pattern is like a mobile set of
operators that copies select groups of contexts and gives birth to unified
contexts (which are new contexts). It is each linker pattern\\\'s unique set of
filter specifications that differentiates one linker pattern from another. New
axioms and theorems that are found elsewhere and within each operation are
found and get added to the metaphor set after the valid discovered patterns are
provably generalized. They are placed in all of the linker patterns. Linker
patterns can also update each other\\\'s set of metaphoric patterns by sharing
ones the other doesn\\\'t have, and copying new ones from the other. The
observation buffer performs general quantifier type matching. Copyright 5/31/
2004 Justin Coslor Patterns In Context Cognition A context is any specified
number set, ordering, or system of numbers that is representative of something
(symbolic). Take the desired outcome (the goal) and break it down into unique
aspects. Treat each aspect as an element of a context that contains it, or as
an element of several contexts that contain it. each element/aspect may have
its own unique context at first. We will be striving to find the pattern or
patterns that link all aspects of the goal into one context. A "linker pattern"
can be a linker of the contexts that each of the elements of our goal exist
within. Such a pattern links contexts together by assigning a system of
translating, juggling, predicting/locating, and/or transforming the specified
elements across their specified contexts. This "linker pattern" is metaphoric,
and can act as the "unified context" in which we will search for the aspects of
our goal, as well as search for alternate routes to each of these aspects (for
optimization). After this experimental search has completed and an optimal
cross-domain relation search for shorter routes to each aspect has been
completed, we will have generated the optimal route map to our goal.
Cross-domain relations can also be thought of as possible associations, or
simply as patterns. They can very explicitly depict ambiguous relationships,
such as when they are used with graph theory. Cross-domain relations are a
little bit like surjective and bijective networks in logic but where two
domains lead to the same range in a number set, even when the domains come from
different contexts. They can also be thought of as alternative routes.
Cross-domain relations can be searched for that relate aspects of our goal that
are also aspects of goals that have different unified contexts than our goal.
It\\\'s important to mark the optimal routes out of the cross-domain relations,
but keep the other relations (possible routes) for use in future goal
structures. By linking multiple goals in this manner, we expand our network of
understanding. Copyright 9/7/2000 Justin Coslor Knowledge Mining Maybe amassing
huge intelligent databases that can draw conclusions and make abstractions and
predictions towards goals that can recognize & ask for specific data it needs
to output one or more units of truth, which could help demystify fields of
study and help major breakthroughs occur, if not by simply abstracting and
relating so much specific data and general patterns in so many areas; to help
bring everything to one\\\'s fingertips. A massively parallel search and
correlation engine: The computer has to be able to understand a goal enough to
figure out how to better understand that goal, so that it can design it\\\'s own
searches (determine its own search criteria), and know what a conclusion would
look like and would require to be complete enough to make an abstraction. What
is the criteria of a conclusion? Is a conclusion just one particular
perspective in every situation? How can the perspective be intelligently
shifted and rotated in a search to generate and array of complimentary
conclusions? At what point does the difference in goals generate opposing
conclusions? (i.e. when do conclusions become apparently contradicting when
using the same set of data...) Taking this into account, what difference in
goals produces contradictory conclusions (perceptions) when searching (parsing)
intersecting sets of data? Input something like a handbook of chemistry and
physics, with a goal of making valid correlations that are not a listed part of
that original data set. Start out with general patterns like input types,
leading to language semantic patterns, leading to patterns of contextual
settings, leading to metaphoric patterns between contexts, *leading to
applications of the generalized raw data to the metaphoric patterns, leading to
generalized predictions of the outcome of the previous step*, parsing the
conclusions listed in the raw data and matching it to the metaphoric mold (the
pattern and logic) that led the contained data elements (or equivalents) to
that listed conclusion. . .in short: enable the software to understand how the
data elements were led to the conclusion listed in the raw data, so that those
patterns (metaphoric molds or logic operations) can be understood enough to be
applied to the raw data in different permutations (ways) to uncover conclusions
of previously unconsidered possibilities. Those patterns and derivation/
discovery methods could also be used as a guide for designing new patterns
built from recombining the old patterns with unique data. And since unique data
almost always is unique due to its being composed of at least some unique
patterns; parsing the old (known) patterns from new (unknown) patterns might
make it easier to clarify what exactly the new pattern is or at least how it
operates (or at the very least, its function). This is knowledge mining. . .One
form of artificial intelligence. Circular Reasoning: I aught to look up the
dictionary definition of a bunch of the key words in this.. Hey, why not all of
the words? A number could correspond to the number of words the dictionary
definition of each word had to reference (on every level of the tree of lookup
words, each branch pausing when it ends up at it\\\'s own word (a loop)) until the
parts of the world applicable to the context of the base word have been
described (mapped)), until an upper limit has been reached on each word. The
highest number out of all of the words will be the number of words in the
applicable dictionary to the context of that paragraph (no repeats). It will be
a complete system of circular reasoning. A complete system of circular
reasoning is where every word in a dictionary is mapped to at least one other
word in that dictionary. Some may be mapped to every word in that dictionary. A
complete system of circular reasoning is one unit. It is aversion/perspective
model of a truth. And different ones can be combined to build complex systems
of truth. Like mitochondria building cells building structures. Copyright 7/13/
2005 Justin Coslor Pattern Occurrences Some patterns are designed or brought
about intentionally, and other patterns are brought about naturally, and others
are brought about as an unintentional consequence of bringing about intentional
patterns, such as in unintentional contexts that are created as a result of
layering patterns, and grouping patterns, and modifying patterns. Some patterns
occur naturally according to certain variable probabilities specific to their
contexts, while others are subject to haphazard creation, randomness, and free
will. Copyright 7/14/2005 Justin Coslor Since all patterns are composed of
repetitions, and since the repetitions are what makes the parts recognizable,
and since anything that is recognizable can be considered a pattern, the
reference pieces for the parts of each pattern can be local, as part of the
pattern\\\'s context, or the reference pieces can be remote, as part of other
contexts that are accessible to the perception system. The reference pieces are
instances of the repetitions that make the parts recognizable, and are usually
cataloged by order of exposure to them, as well as by associations. When new
patterns are encountered they are either recognized (thus categorizable), or
they are unrecognizable (thus not categorizable) because their parts and
properties are unknown, or they are partially recognized (thus potentially
categorizable and partly referencable). If the pattern is new and it is
recognized, then its parts are already known but are arranged in a new
configuration and with potentially new properties due to the novel association
of its parts. So basically, once the perception system is exposed to contexts,
the pattern matching/classification system begins its task of dissecting new
patterns into reference pieces, and classifying recognizable patterns into
association contexts and utility contexts, and assigning priority ratings to
everything so that the perception system can decide what to pay attention to.
Priority ratings get constantly updated, and depend on how much bandwidth and
processing power the perception system and reasoning engine have available. The
reasoning engine does all of the heavy calculations, task and priority
assignments, memory management, simulation modeling, and most of the decision
making. Copyright 7/5/2005 Justin Coslor ePIC Goal Representation (ePIC =
electronic Patterns In Contexts) A goal is an abstract construct, and the
attainment of a goal is to fill in all of the details of the goal either: 1. in
Platonic Reality (information space), or 2. in physical reality (matter
configuration space). If the details have been filled in in Platonic Reality,
then the result is a simulation. If the details have been filled in in physical
reality, then the result is a working model. A prototype can be a preliminary
model or preliminary simulation. The abstract construct of a goal is the
starting point for changing your reality in some way. One need only be able to
partially perceive of the abstraction to initiate the existence of the goal,
but to fully specify it, a viable plan needs to be formulated. Usually there
are unknown variables in every abstract goal, and specifying each variable
becomes an iterative process. Often the abstract goal can be stated in the form
of a question, and is the result of the questions that arose from some problem.
Often times further questioning of the problem impetus is necessary to specify
the goal and in doing so, the problem gets solved as the unknowns become
decided or calculated. Many goals are qualitative/categorical subjective/
objective priority system calculations, that rely on preference, perspective,
universal truths, contextual restrictions, and contextual properties. However,
all problems, goals, and solutions can be represented as patterns in contexts,
such as undecided patterns in partially determined contexts, that evolve
through storing and grouping of categorical, qualitative, and quantitative
patterns across different contexts into an experimental buffer/model space
towards the sufficiently representative construct or construction of networks
of systems of patterns, that satisfy the objectives of the problem and goal, in
the context of the final form of the problem and goal. The Patterns In Contexts
concept is an epistemological language, which I strongly believe can be used to
represent anything, any concept, and any information of any kind, including
first person, second person, third person information in past present or future
tense, and it adapts well into any other language. Copyright 6/3/2005 Justin
Coslor Cross-Domain Relations in Analogical Relations A true cross-domain
relation would have two domains that each lead to the same range. Analogical
relations do something very similar to this, however not quite. In an
analogical relation, the relation between the domain and range of one context
is mimicked across a somewhat similar domain and range in a different context
(only some properties need to be similar for the analogy to be formed, since a
barely recognizable similarity needs to exist). The result is like having
generalized an abstraction of the two domains and the relation, and using that
abstraction to perform the abstracted relation on the second domain in the
other context. Copyright 6/3/2005 Justin Coslor Patterns In Context and
Question Asking Systems for Object-Oriented Programming The patterns in
contexts model of knowledge representation and question asking systems based on
forming networks of questions and networks of patterns in networks contexts can
be used to make a profoundly sophisticated object-oriented programming system
capable of doing analogical reasoning, deductive reasoning, as well as
induction and recursions that are simply not representable in other systems. In
this system there is a constant acceleration of computational complexity, all
of which is progressively designed to simplify the system while augmenting
abilities and understanding. Copyright 5/30/2005 Justin Coslor Complexity
Progressions Every state of a complex pattern can be said to be the result of a
progressive augmentation of the previous state or model/version by a new or
repeated pattern, or by multiple patterns. That is, unless data loss has
occurred due to random deletion or a random addition process. Copyright 5/31/
2005 Justin Coslor Pattern Details & Randomness Every pattern is the iterative
accumulation of modulations and augmentations of sub-patterns, right down to
the atomic repetitions that are the first forms that are recognizable from
randomness. Atomic repetitions may come in a wide variety of non-interoperable
modes of partitioning, each of which is subject to a unique perception system
that is capable of buffering and filtering its own particular spectrum of
atomic repetitions that are partitioned from patterns and randomness that are
unrecognizable to that mode. Randomness comes in two main forms: there is
randomness that is compatible with the partition mode of a given perspective
system, thus being countable or measurable via the mathematical comparison of
the atomic repetitions of that mode (because it is just a randomization of
those atomic repetitions); and the other kind of randomness is composed of
randomized patterns that are partitioned in modes other than that which is
compatible with the current perspective system. It is undecidable whether or
not there exists a randomness that cannot be partitioned by any mode of
perspective, i.e. a randomness that is not the randomization of some set of
patterns or atomic repetitions. Copyright 9/7/2004 Justin Coslor Metaphoric
Operations on Patterns Across Contexts I want to learn LISP and use it to make
an intelligent agent capable of doing metaphoric operations on patterns across
contexts. 2/17/2005 Update by Justin Coslor: I guess now, most Artificial
Intelligence Programming is starting to be done in Java since it is
cross-platform and simple to use. Copyright 9/8/2004 Justin Coslor To do this,
the sub-agents will need to be able to research raw data configuration sets to
look for algebraic repetition that can be considered to be patterns in the sea
of cached buffered inputed/observed/recognized elements. In order to recognize
something, it will have to have a known set of basic recursions (repetitions)
to begin with. The prime numbers ar a good source to start out with (since they
are the natural balance points in the universe). Then it will need to try to
describe each data configuration set (data map) whose atomic repetition
symmetries can be characterized or parsed. This description will be known as
the pattern\\\'s type, and patterns with similar types will be grouped into
classes. To describe a metaphoric operation will require generalizing the
differences between each type description in a particular class, and then
mapping the observed relations (between each of these types) in the form of a
nodal network. That nodal network will be a metaphoric object that summarizes
the class. Create metaphoric objects for all of the classes in the context (aka
scope) of your total original cached raw data. Then form relations between
different metaphoric objects, and combine and reconfigure different metaphoric
objects, with the original metaphoric objects being treated as axioms of that
particular context. The metaphoric object relations can be treated as templates
for filtering other raw data contexts in the search for known patterns which
contain their own distinct uniqueness, that will will warrant the generation of
new types in new classes. Every context has its own types in their own classes.
In other words, every raw data set has its own patterns in their own contexts.
This is how to relate different raw data sets to extract their relational
axioms, and the combination and reconfiguration of different contexts\\\' axiom
sets (metaphoric objects) is what I call metaphoric operations. Copyright 8/23/
2004 by Justin Coslor. Information Theory Quotes ""Metaphor" is a relational
model of recursion, where the circular reasoning (in recursive definitions &
recursive functions) cross-relates the elements of definitions & functions from
multiple (or different) contexts. That is why cross-domain relations are so
crucial to the metaphoric representation of knowledge and knowledge systems
(logics)." Copyright 8/26/2004 by Justin Coslor: "I also believe that
information is metaphoric in nature (has algebraic interconnectivity), and that
it can be represented as a composition of patterns in contexts, where the
contexts themselves can be patterns, and the atomic elements of each pattern
are composed of symmetry sections (partitions) of data, where each partition is
part of a local or dislocated repetition (a symmetry, an algebra). And it is
only through the repetition of a data section that part of a pattern can become
recognizable from apparently random white noise. Randomness and white noise are
probably patterns that are larger than the scope of our perceptions, so the
data appears random. And I say that metaphors can be represented geometrically
because all of the prime numbers (the balance points in the universe) are
symmetrical when represented geometrically, and it is likely through primarily
symmetrical sensory and cognitive structures that our minds can interpret
information. And I think of metaphors not as A = B, but more like the
similarity of the juxtaposition of A\\\'s elements in the context of B, and B\\\'s
elements in the context of A, in terms of general systems theory. I equate
truth with workable patterns that become more and more refined and defined as
they get used. I believe that all truth that we are capable of perceiving is
but a small approximation of the whole truth. And that the truth/patterns that
we are capable of using is often subject to perception within varying contexts.
But there seem to exist connections between information none-the-less, through
whatever means. Possibly since (in my opinion) everything came from oneness)."
Here\\\'s another quote from my journal Copyright 11/24/2003 by Justin Coslor:
"Information is a symphony of symbolism and symmetry." Here\\\'s another journal
entry Copyright 12/23/2003 by Justin Coslor: "Information, by it\\\'s very nature,
is a division. Yet it strives to become whole again, and at the very least, to
become balanced." 12/25/2004 ::Metaphoric Operations:: Metaphors are
geometrical, in a sense, that is to say they follow mathematical geometries.
That is to say, metaphors can be thought of in terms of geometrical patterns
and systems. This is because metaphors can be diagrammed, and diagrams have a
relative/nodal/graph-theoretic logic about them, and through the logic of their
patterns and systems they can be recognizable as having a sort of relational
geometry (at least in the unseen Platonic-reality). Patterns have an algebraic
repetition at their foundation, and the most basic repetitions are symmetries.
The most basic symmetries can be perceived through prime numbers, in that they
are the fundamental building blocks of more complex symmetrical and
a-symmetrical structures. A-symmetrical structures are constructed out of
symmetrical structures, just as non-prime numbers (composite numbers) are
constructed out of prime numbers and relations/functions. Metaphoric operations
are relational templates that are axiomatic, adaptable, reconfigurable, and
versatile. This is because they are collections of relations whose options have
been generalized to optimize those qualities for relating similar, and
different qualitative domains across contexts. Each context\\\'s qualities\\\'
relations are unique to that context\\\'s set of axioms. One might say that
domains are qualitative, while the domain\\\'s ranges can be qualitative OR
quantitative. Metaphoric operations relate different consistent, recursively
complete, contexts by copying or moving elements from each context into the
separate but more versatile context of the metaphoric template. Once the
elements have leave their original context, their original context\\\'s axiom set
(s) may be altered, as well as some of the context itself (and sub-contexts, if
any are relevant). Metaphoric contexts may only need to copy some of the axioms
of their element\\\'s original contexts, because they have axioms of their own
that help to allow for the relation of the axioms that are buffered in from
multiple other contexts. The metaphoric template\\\'s original axioms also help to
relate the qualitative elements which are the current primary focuses, that
were constructed out of relevant axioms from the external contexts. New
knowledge is created when the qualitative elements\\\' axioms sets are adapted to
form new qualitative elements and relations out of the augmentation of the
metaphoric template\\\'s context\\\'s axiom sets, by the elements\\\' external axiom
sets. With metaphors, anything that isn\\\'t explicitly cross-domain related is
ignored. Qualities are itemized as they are noticed or as they are deemed
relevant. Personally, I feel like the diagram of metaphoric operations is a lot
prettier than the description... Copyright 12/25/2004 by Justin M. Coslor
Copyright 1/9/2005 Justin Coslor Visual Dictionaries and Axiomatic Abdicative
Simulations Maybe as part of building the logical framework for a systematic
visual dictionary, we could try representing each image both as a set of
angular or situational perspectives; but also I think it\\\'s important to try to
axiomatize the image properties into contexts, and by doing so we can do
abdicative creative constructions (and abstractions of those to some
approximate goals), such as by perceiving each image as a series of nodes
(graph theory vertices) and connections that are all linked together both
contextually in the physical space, and conceptually in the historical-timeline
/platonic interaction space. By doing this, the heuristic (guess-work) training
can be semi-automized and the intelligence data on the scenario objects can
have a far deeper meaning and farther reaching applications. Deepening the
understanding of content and its abdicative recombinations and metaphoric
transcombinations, both increases the potential for creating new applications
and tools, and increases the versatility and effectiveness of existing tools
and applications. Deepening understanding of content creates new contexts and
reconceptualizes stuff by augmenting axiom sets that the contexts are based on.
Copyright 1/21/2005 Justin Coslor Axiomatic Visual-Layer Interpretation Forming
stronger linkages between axiom sets deepens the meaning of content of all
structures that are based on those axioms. It can also complicate things by
cluttering the contexts that those structures act within if the linkages are
formed sub-optimally. Such is the case of an image with ambiguous layering.
This has applications to steganography, computer vision, and virtual-reality
educational environments, etc. Copyright 8/7/2005 Justin Coslor Patterns In
Contexts: 3D Engine I think Java3D, combined with some inexpensive virtual
reality equipment, will be the ideal environment for exploring Patterns In
Contexts theory visually. Critical to that is a software that is able to parse
video data into 2D objects and build 3D geometric reconstructions of those
objects along with the parameters of their observable range of motion, and do
heuristic guessing at the backsides of the objects that are hidden from view or
just make the 2D objects into 3D avatars that always face you regardless of
which side of theme you are on. That way, video data can be geometerized and
represented as Patterns In Contexts, and 3D worlds can much more easily be
created by mixing together objects and behaviors from an enormous archive of
experience (from video sources) that is all parsed and sorted categorically by
a visual dictionary that maps adjectives and nouns and verbs to pattern
properties such as qualitative geometric relations, axiomatically defined
variables and operations, and contextually associated references of objects and
their pattern groupings. Each entry of the visual dictionary will contain an
up-to-date list of all objects in the pattern archive that contain the
geometric or otherwise visual property defined by that visual dictionary entry.
Scale, color, orientation, state, position, and quantitative data in many cases
can be ignored by the visual dictionary, unless the entry is directly intended
to describe one or more of those properties. Copyright 1/9/2005 Justin Coslor
Graphical Representation and Visual Heuristics Make a website loaded with
graphs, diagrams, flowcharts, and simplified geometric reconstructions of
stuff, events, places, flows, tools, intellectual understanding,
interpretations and translations, programs, systems, etc. Call it "mapworld" or
"graphworld." Make webcrawling intelligent agents that generate extensive
thorough, and systematic visual dictionaries online. Similarly, there should be
a webpage utility where you can enter the URL (Uniform Resource Locator =
website address) to some text or copy/paste in some text directly and it could
try to abstract visual perceptions of the text content\\\'s meaning and represent
it in the form of a diagram or graph, etc. It could also try researching images
on the internet that are related to the text. I realize that the second part
might be difficult, since there aren\\\'t very many visual dictionaries in
existance yet, and computer vision and machine learning technologies may not be
that advanced yet (but maybe they are...?). Heuristics (guess-work on visual
data and in language processing is just a matter of logical deduction, manual
training of Bayesian statistical and Connectionist techniques, and metaphoric/
analogical/cross-domain-relational mappings across contexts, to bridge systems
not yet adapted to each other. Copyright 7/20/2005 Justin Coslor Creativity &
Understanding Language is permutations of semantics, governed by syntax and
context, with meaningful intention. So.... What is the language of creativity?
What are its semantics? What is its syntax? What is its context? The language
of creativity always contains either: 1. new semantics or new permutations of
semantics, and/or 2. new syntax, and/or 3. new context. *Creativity does not
always convey meaningful intention. The semantics of creativity are new
patterns and/or old patterns thought of in new ways (recontextualized
patterns). The syntax of creativity is either internally defined by the
language of the format (if the format is known), or else (if the format is new)
it is externally defined by the naturally occurring partitions and connections
of the organic objects and systems of developments of the natural universe, or
by the connections and partitions present in the diagonalizations of
synthesized patterns juxtaposed through a relational operator or operation, and
/or the diagonalization of the juxtaposition of synthesized patterns and
natural patterns juxtaposed through a relational operator or operation, and/or
the diagonalization of the juxtaposition of natural patterns juxtaposed through
a relational operator or operation. The context of creativity is always at
least partially new. Creative expressions composed entirely of entirely new
patterns (not just modified ones) in entirely new contexts with external syntax
that has never before been known of and that is unrelatable to known syntax
will always appear random and entirely undecipherable unless the person or
interpretation program is capable of analogical abdicative reasoning. However
there will be no conclusive proof that the analogies drawn will be correct. The
analogies may be qualitatively correct in the metaphoric sense, but they will
never be proven quantitatively correct to the knowledge of the analyst. There
has to be some decoding method, key, or common ground known to the analyst in
order to decipher such a creative expression. Copyright 7/17/2005 Justin Coslor
Concepts Layers of states and states of layers (As in "finite element state
machines" and similar systems): ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ Art Video Writing Talking
Scent Taste Touch ------------------ Mathematics -> connections and differences
in maps of possibilities Philosophy -> depth of possibility maps models of
truth progressing Science and Technology -> exploration of possibilities
through careful experimentation and adaptation to discoveries
------------------------------- Can you think of more? It is definitely
possible. Look for stuff like those descriptions. Juxtapose operators and
abdicatively reason into applications. Copyright 7/8/2005 Justin Coslor
Measurement Systems In measurement, two or more quantities or qualities are
compared to one another, such as a unit of measure applied to a starting point
and ending point of another object. When a unit of measure is undefined, you
look for the minimum unit(s) of commonality between the objects and mark the
overlap points and the center-points between the starting and ending points,
and the center points between those points, etc. If any number systems or other
patterns are used as division or counting units (such as prime numbers), as
well as center-point binary tree parsing, we realize that "all measurement is
really comparison by parsing or partitioning". The units of the partitioning or
parsing can be native common denominators of the observer\\\'s perception system
and the object. The intersection of the juxtaposition of multiple objects is
another native unit of parsing, which itself can be parsed into smaller units
via a number system or other pattern. Common ground or compatibility is
necessary for comparison, and since measurement is a form of comparison,
measurement is an act of perception adaptation via parsing or partitioning.
It\\\'s the act of trying to perceive of an object via the perception system of
something else, and often times perception systems miss a lot because there are
often lots of valid ways for a particular observer to perceive of things, and
it\\\'s an undecidable problem about whether a perception system is not
recognizing other undefined potential aspects of the object, let alone know
what it is not perceiving through its axioms and atomic units of partitioning,
and methods of parsing and grouping, and methods of determining anchor points,
interpretation, starting and ending points, edge detection, pattern layering,
and buffer sizes and contextualization, etc. Active measuring is when ea
system\\\'s partitioning structure and methodology/reasoning system is constantly
updated as something is being measured. An example of active measuring is a
system capable of learning, such as an adaptive or evolutionary perception
system, such as an artificially intelligent reasoning system or human being. A
perception system that is merely adaptive but not evolutionary is autonomous or
semi-autonomous, but not intelligent, since it only knows the context that it
currently exists in. By storing perception systems adapted to multiple
contexts, a system can then often map out the commonalty and differences
between each context and form a general common-sense perception system which
can be analyzed inductively, deductively, and abdicatively by its reasoning
engine. Analysis via comparison of the domains and ranges of functions that
exist in different contexts is an abdicative reasoning process since it is a
form of analogical reasoning. Once again common ground must be mapped between
the functions being compared or else an external perception system will have to
artificially map its units onto both functions so that compatible parsing and
partitioning can proceed in a measurable, if not blind (thus artificially
simulated) representation. Passive measuring is when the measurement and
perception system\\\'s reasoning engine is not updated by internal induction,
deduction, or abduction during measurement, nor after measurement. Passive
measurement is merely mechanical and not adaptive or evolutionary. Copyright 7/
2/2005 Justin Coslor Re-contextualized Patterns It\\\'s interesting how patterns
and their implications change as their raw data is re-contextualized and/or
perceived from different perspective systems and contexts. The parameters of
each context shapes the possibilities of its patterns\\\' applications,
implications, and recognized states of existence. Often times the possibilities
of contexts overlap, and are subjective in the sense that there may exist
several possible ways to perceive of and interpret a context, where each way
may have equal or varying levels of probable truth in its systems, depending on
the perspective system and intentions/expectations of the observer and/or the
controller. Copyright 6/25/2005 Justin Coslor Observing patterns and
differences Combining my poem about "Sight" with my poem about "Reasoning
Engines", leaves me thinking about the line "from color comes shape" and the
line about "thinking as storing and grouping knowledge", and how it takes a
pattern to perceive of a pattern, such as one colored shape outlining or
juxtaposing against another colored shape, and how each of these shapes (and
color information) gets stored as a piece of knowledge (a pattern), and how
both are grouped together by their situational context. The differences between
them are patterns not origininally apparent in either piece of knowledge prior
to their comparison, unless those patterns are stored in the perceiver\\\'s
virtual knowledge base from prior experience or innate programming. So you can
try grouping every atomic pattern with every other atomic pattern (time
allowing), and as long as you\\\'re working with more than a one-dimensional
medium, the differences between each atomic pattern being compared one-to-one
will constitute a unique atomic pattern. This sort of comparison is one way of
coming up with new knowledge in mediums that exist in two-dimensional (or
greater) qualitative and/or quantitative and/or conditional mediums, and
mediums that combine different types of properties. * Comparing unequivalent
objects always creates partitions in either one or both of the objects. The
remainder partitions are sometimes entirely knew but virtual objects. *
------------------ "Sight" From color comes shape, and from shape comes size,
we triangulate images that come into our eyes. ----------------- "Reasoning
Engines" 1. Knowledge as patterns in contexts. 2. Thinking as storing and
grouping knowledge. ----------------- * Language contextualizes perceptions.
The language used in each perception identifies and indicates patterns that
have been parsed through comparison. * Copyright 6/24/2005 Justin Coslor
Pattern Matching Previously I\\\'ve written about how if you divide a circle into
a bunch of equiangled sectors and if there is a prime number of sectors then no
symmetrical alternating coloring patterns exist, but if there is a non-prime
number of these equiangled sectors, then you can color in alternating sectors
or groups of sectors to form symmetrical patterns that correspond to each of
the composite number pieces. To apply this to pattern matching, simply cut the
circle so that its sectors lie in a straight line and then look at the coloring
patterns to match pieces of that linear pattern to strings of numbers, where
each color might be a particular number, or just do it in binary. In this
manner you can make numerical landmarks in raw data streams to look for
patterns within potentially random data. When only a piece of one of these
composite number symmetry patterns shows up in a linear data stream, that may
indicate that other layers of patterns may be overlapping it. The thing that
makes these patterns recognizable from randomness is the juxtaposition of their
unique alternating prime partition patterns. An individual prime partition
pattern piece that has been linearized is indistinguishable from any other
linear prime partition pattern piece unless you know for sure that you\\\'re
seeing the whole thing. But when you juxtapose two or more of these patterns
together in the form of a composite symmetry pattern even a fragment of that
pattern can dramatically narrow down the possibilities of its origin. Copyright
6/20/2005 Justin Coslor Remote-Controlled Contexts Via Preprocessor
Switchboards (See Diagrams) Instead of having injective, surjective, and
bijective, maybe there could be a preprocessor module that is bijective that
goes in front of all surjective and injective relations. For a surjective
relation: P1 = surjective ARP1 = bijective ARB = surjective = ACP1B For an
injective relation: ARP2 = bijective P2RB = injective ARB = injective = ACP2RB
A and B are domains P1 and P2 are preprocessors R is a relation, C is a
cross-domain relation. In effect, the preprocessor becomes a duplicate of the
domain element in A, but independent of the context of A. So since the
preprocessing is done outside of A, you can have single-line inputs from A, and
you can take several domain elements out of their contexts and perform their
relations via remote control. In the second diagram, the cross-domain relation
BCP2 is turned off, so context D doesn\\\'t contain its relation (P2RD) unit P2
gets turned back on. In that diagram, D is a remote-controlled context via the
preprocessor operations switchboard S. A, B, and C are each in their own
contexts and they combine in context D. The preprocessor modules allow for
simple remote control like an operations switchboard. Copyright 6/12/2005
Justin Coslor Definitions Defining something by cataloging it\\\'s properties and
relations is blind unless you specify the particular context of the thing, and
the sub-contexts of the properties and relations it is composed of. Context is
both an exoskelletal structure as well as an endoskelletal structure. Context
is is defined by both the external limits as well as the internal limits.
Copyright 6/5/2005 Justin Coslor Geometric Abstractions When doing abstraction
on geometries and photos of patterns (symmetry formations, repetitions of
patterns, and that which is recognizable from randomness), maybe all that is
needed is a map of intersection points for each level of connectivity: i.e. a
map of all points where two lines intersect, a map of all points where three
lines intersect, etc. The union of all of those maps should form a sufficient
geometric abstraction to recreate a recognizable approximation of the original
model of photo patterns. Copyright 6/4/2005 Justin Coslor Index of Topics *
(Remember to finish adding topics to this index, as it is only a partial list
of ePIC-related topics I\\\'ve written about so far.) choice creativity patterns
contexts variables properties relations: quantitative, qualitative,
cross-domain, analogical abstraction models simulations axioms: key, branch
knowledge: implicit, explicit, representation intuitions complexity
progressions pattern details randomness analogical recursions question asking
systems question expectation templates object-oriented processing operation
spaces: grids v.s. networks analogy metaphor examples Copyright 6/4/2005 Justin
Coslor Abstraction Abstract relations are relations described by descriptions
that are the simplified form of lexicons, where the details have been stripped
and only the categorical data remains, along with some quantitative data
(possibly. . .I\\\'m not sure yet....), such as the dimensions and data types.
Relations are fairly easy to abstract because you can just build an itemized
list of the operators and verbs used on or in the general context of the
domains that use them. Copyright 6/3/2005 Justin Coslor (See example diagrams)
If a domain A is cross-domain related to a domain B analogically, that relation
can be injective, or subjective; or if it is bijective, even if it\\\'s bijective
to another element in the domain than the starting point, then we can say that
the relation is recursive. This is an example of analogical recursions, because
since all bijective relations are recursive, and analogical reasoning deals
primarily with cross-domain relations, then all cross-domain relations that are
bijective are analogical recursions. Another form of cross-domain analogical
recursions comes from alternating back and forth through a set of relations
between two or more domains, where the active element in the active domain is
determined by some function on the ordering of the elements in that domain (a
sequence function on the cardinality). Injective analogical recursions can also
exist in a back and forth system that ultimately loops between the various
domains of two or more contexts. Copyright 5/25/2005 Justin Coslor Implicit
V.S. Explicit Knowledge In knowledge bases, facts and data are stored in
patterns and contexts explicitly, but that same information may also belong to
other contexts, and can be arranged into different patterns and may have
unidentified relations to patterns in that data set and/or to patterns not in
that data set. Often times there are multiple hierarchical levels and
recursions of patterns in contexts and sub-contexts in patterns, and bridging
across these levels are more of the same in many cases. Data that is implied
can be treated as though it is hidden, though its role may be very important in
the context of the data that depends on it. In the perception of questions,
lots of implicit patterns and contexts are necessary to generate and adapt
simulated models of the knowledge that is involved with the possible ways to
represent the meaning of the question, as well as for generating models of the
expectation parameters of the context templates involved with goal search,
answer retrieval, and answer formulation (for discovering or constructing
suitable content of the right level of detail). This is because every question
is the intersection of multiple contexts, or rather every question is an
attempt at adapting multiple contexts into compatibility, and thus unknowns
must be declared. Copyright 5/16/2005 Justin Coslor Analogy, Metaphor, and
Examples Now due to my lack of a dictionary on hand I\\\'ll create some of my own
definitions (the names can be changed later). An analogy is like half of a
metaphor. An analogy gives an elaborated example of a relation, whereas a
metaphor gives an example of a relation across multiple contexts (a
cross-domain relation). An example of an analogy is like saying: An apple is
like an onion. Both rot, and are edible. An example of a metaphor is: Apple is
to onion as postman is to salesman. An analogy is essentially a simile plus a
moral or explanation/elaboration. A metaphor may describe the same relation(s)
as an analogy in that it juxtaposes two or more pieces of information. This is
similar to generating a unique diagonal length from a box generated by using
one sequence or variable quantification as the x axis and another sequence or
variable quantification as the y axis to produce a unique qualitative variable
or sequence... Add more dimensions to the diagonalization to combine more
variables or sequences or functions... Then just rotate the diagonal axis until
it is horizontal. But metaphor goes a step farther and presents another example
of that relation, but in a different context. *Examples are contextualizations
of patterns. A relation between qualitative variables is thus a diagonalization
of their quantitative mappings. In this way, qualitative mappings can be
represented geometrically. Patterns are composed of variables and relations
between variables. **Variables are usually qualitative property sets that have
been quantitatively mapped into juxtaposition with their enumerated algebraic
repetitions. Juxtaposition via diagonalization is a form of an operator.
***Operators are forms of juxtaposition of variables and patterns. Addition
sequentially juxtaposes variables and patterns on a grid. Subtraction is the
opposite of addition, as it removes variables and patterns from a grid.
Multiplication sequentially adds to columns of categories, one category at a
time. Division de-references and parses columns of categorical values, and is
the opposite of multiplication. Addition, subtraction, multiplication,
division, 2D geometry, trigonometry, algebra, calculus, etc, ... all are
operations that can be performed on a grid. Change the operation space (i.e.
change the context), and the axioms that these operations are based on may no
longer apply; but some may, and those are the axioms we want to collect for a
wide range of adaptability, and can be used in forming general systems theory
grids and networks. As far as I know about operation spaces, there are grids
and there are networks. Each can be within each, they can come in many
different forms, and translations are possible between them, but the
translation between a grid and a network always relies on a core set of axioms
that are in common between the two data structures. Copyright 5/4/2005 Justin
Coslor (Based on a theory I had around the year 2000) Sight -------- From color
comes shape, and from shape comes size, we triangulate images that come into
our eyes. --------------------------- Fall 2001 to 4/25/2003 Justin Coslor My
fundamental theorem of Computer Vision: I believe that from color comes shape
and from shape comes size; comparatively/relatively/contexually. I\\\'ll have to
read about the cognition of vision to fill in the details and check out
software and plasticware/firmware/hardware models of visual perception. Learn
known mathematical techniques. Copyright 5/6/2005 Justin Coslor Rules Are
Behavioral Expectations Here are some types of rules: Laws, priorities,
environmental limitations (physics), trends, norms, common sense, personal
limitations, societal beliefs, personal beliefs, lazy tendencies &
optimizations, conditions, terms of use or license agreement, policy, ethics,
morals, probability judgments, priority judgments, game theoretic strategy,
preemptive negotiation, real-time negotiation, post hoc proc negotiation,
design considerations, navigational control, pattern guidelines, pattern maps,
mathematical modeling and calculation, combination possibilities, case-by-case
possibilities; forum dimensionality, axioms, theorems, and restrictions; units
and parsing and sorting methods and requirements; activation, deactivation, and
flow control theory, network access methods, network exchange methods, network
dynamics. Here are some qualifiers for those kinds of rules: Global,
situational, regional, local, continuous, temporal, static, dynamic, linear,
parallel, hierarchical, symmetric, independent, context specific, general,
intentional, unintentional, conscious/unconscious, automatic, manual, modal,
type, categorical. Find an ontology that lists concepts related to a given
concept, in a hyper-linked format. Similar to encyclopedia references (see
Wikipedia.org) or book topical references in the public library\\\'s card catalog.
Copyright 1/7/2005 Justin Coslor Categories: Part 1 Even if categories get
proven to be inaccurate (*Are accuracy proofs based on any subjective
information?), then useful information about the compatibility of the data
elements can be discovered as parameters get refined. Ultimately, it is the
compatibility of the elements, both in and between data sets, that makes the
fundamental definitions of the categories. Copyright 11/7/2004 Justin Coslor
Hypothetical Relation Highlighting in Undefined Data Sets: If categorical names
have been assigned to finite elements in a domain, the rest of the data in the
set can be hypothetically considered to be relations or parts of relations (on
those elements and elements not in that buffered data set). Or they may be
elements of categories you don\\\'t yet recognize or know of yet. Guessing about
Neural Architectures... This is a journal entry, Copyright 9/12/2004 by Justin
Coslor. I could be totally wrong about this, but it is currently presumed, by
me at least, that neural architectures tune to, receive, translate, and
transmit various wavelengths of patterned energy configurations. The tuning
functions may be in one unit, the receivers/input devices may be in another
unit; the translation/manipulation apparatus may be in another unit; the
translation/manipulation apparatus may operate in a unit of its own, and the
transmission/re- communication apparatus may be in a unit of its own as well.
There is likely data loss in the imperfections and limitations of the tuning
apparatus, the receiving apparatus, and the re-transmission apparatus
successively; however, the translation/manipulation apparatus may apply
experience-based heuristics to fill in the holes and sharpen or simplify the
distortions and puzzles in the data field. Each cluster of nodes, as well as
the relation nodes themselves sometimes perform negotiations for syntactic and
semantic consistency. Such negotiations are likely interfaces composed of
multi-purpose reconfigurable general cellular nodes. Meaning might be derived
from information streams by creating translations and equivalence
representations in other classes and other contexts, and by defining and rating
utility functions and organizing them in such a way that their priority can
easily be determined relevant to the general function of the class of relations
they belong to in generalized/easily-specialized contexts. The neat thing about
information, rather than cause and effect, is that it can be re-conceptualized
and re-contextualized and re-framed/re-patterned. 10/22/2004 Justin Coslor
(after reading pg. 11 Modern Algebra by Gilbert and Vanstone) Some methods of
Proof: - Assumptions (context) - Examples of problems or experience - Critical
questions of interest - Representative language choice -Translation/Mapping ->
same or different context? - Inventory of context axioms - Define critical
question\\\'s search scope - Assume all questions are somewhat answerable -
Convert other knowledge into current representation and abstract relationships
without regard to hierarchical depth - Group compatible relationships - Mark
partial compatibilities as overlapping sub-contexts - Hypothesize mappings that
assume each relationship to be the answer to a series of questions - Look for
hypothesized questions similar to questions of interest - If found, remap
original examples in terms of those similar mappings of hypothesized questions
- Define inconsistencies and address them - Represent conclusion - Explore
relations of conclusion to other contexts - Blah blah blah, I should study
more. 8/12/2004 Justin Coslor Axiom Notes (Here are some note I took at the
public library today.) Structuring XML Documents / David Megginson CLP MAIN SCI
&TECH QA76.76H94 M44 1998 The National Strategy To Secure Cyberspace February
2003 http://www.gpoaccess.gov - Perhaps people and machines should be trying to
prove the limits of proof. - There are many shapes of non-Euclidean geometric
reality. - Perhaps quanta of energy is a form of matter that exists on
non-Euclidean spiral and tubular planes? Maybe quanta breaks off from matter
and electrons that exist on non-Euclidean spherical planes during orbit changes
and altitude changes? I read part of the end of the book Thinking about [TLC]
LOGO: A graphic look at computing with ideas. pg. 206&207 ISBN 0-03-064116-0
Each set of axioms is based on a unique working model of the universe.
(Regardless of the completeness of the model.) In many cases, there is some
overlap between different sets of axioms, because many contexts have some
properties and/or patterns that are in common. Metaphoric operations describe
the relations between the properties and/or patterns that are in common between
unique contexts. More than that, each set of axioms attempts to define a
working model of the universe, and that no model of the universe is complete
(hence it is a model) other than the universe itself; and from within the
universe, a model of the universe can only be approximated, and to a varying
degree of accuracy and/or applicability at that. 8/20/2004 Justin Coslor
Update: So essentially, a set of axioms is only as good as the model they
attempt to describe. Copyright 6/8/2004 Justin Coslor Contexts A context is a
relation that defines a group of patterns. A pattern that is not related to any
other patterns is isolated, and can for the most part be considered "invisible"
to other contexts. A context can also be considered to be a pattern, and can
sometimes also be considered as subject to this "isolation" concept. Patterns
that exist within networks of contexts are the most easily located, since
cross-domain relation-based experimental search and discovery methods need not
be applied to locate or define them, as is necessary in many cases to find
isolated patterns (i.e. island knowledge). Networks can consist of relations
(surjective, injective, and bijective ) and cross-domain relations (which are
potentially multi-node route reverse-surjective relations). Data turns into
knowledge as the patterns and contexts and networks of contexts are mapped out.
Copyright 6/5/2004 Justin Coslor Perception Every multi-state organization or
cognitive organism exists on a higher plane than it is capable of perceiving,
because nothing can monitor every aspect of itself (unless every cell is
symmetrically identical) since the monitoring devices (sensors, etc), even when
recursive, cannot monitor every aspect of themselves. This is because in order
to perceive of something we must classify it in terms of something else we have
perceived, and since we were born in motion, our consciousnesses pass forward
from state to state, processing information (perceiving of things in terms of
the physical universe) until parts, or the entirety of our bodies have fully
ceased to move (i.e. until the breakdown of the subparts). As Godel\\\'s theorem
implies: "no set can map its powerset". After some developed mental subparts
have broken down, the structures of the consciousness that they were physically
translating may continue to operate outside of the rest of the brain\\\'s physical
time-frame. The latency of the various cognitive architectures in the brain may
have a great deal to do with the relativistic self-observations of
multi-sensory experiences. Since after all, some parts of the mind/body
connection and mind/brain connection operate at near the speed of light (as
electrons flow between the parts of each cell). Copyright 8/10/2005 Justin
Coslor Perception -- continued from 6/5/2004.... On 6/5/2004 I wrote that "The
latency of the various cognitive architectures in the brain may have a great
deal to do with the relativistic self-observations of multi-sensory
experiences." In other words, people think at different rates and depths from
time to time, and that can create recall and encoding obstacles in grouping and
interfacing memories between different cognitive states. However, those kinds
of qualitative and quantitative differences between the contents of memorized
perceptions can create bridges into depthier re-perceptions for recognition
into fine- tuned contexts. 5/17/2003 Justin Coslor A.I. Notes Today I did a
http://Google.com search on OpenCYC Thought Treasure V.S. OpenCyc came up. I
guess both are major knowledge base ontology management systems, i.e. Reasoning
Engines. Thought Treasure seems to have more stuff for Natural Language
Processing than OpenCyc, but it is only free for noncommercial use. The Cyc
technology though is the world\\\'s largest and most complete general knowledge
base and commonsense reasoning engine. The CIA uses it, and did about 500
man-years worth of data-entry into to. OpenCyc is a much smaller subset of Cyc,
and is open-source. Cycorp runs opencyc.org, and also makes ResearchCyc for R&D
in academia and industry. Dependencies: none Languages: CycL, SubL, Java (other
API\\\'s on the way) Platforms: Linux (Win32 coming soon) Sites: http://
opencyc.org foundry.ai-depot.com/Project/OpenCyc /Amygdala /Fear /GAUL /Joone /
LogicMoo /OpenAI /SigmaPi /Simbrain 10/20/2004 Justin Coslor Mission Statement
Free open-source software is quite possibly the best hope, in conjunction with
the freely accessible Internet, to give the common citizens a fighting chance
at building foundations for their decendents in the midst of the mechanized
empires of greed that thwart and encroach on their liberties and livelihoods in
their attempts to squeeze and control the creative potential of supposedly free
individuals who might otherwise be nurtured to blossom as citizens of a humbly
selfless and harmonious planet Earth, that we all know can happen.
------------------------ Book II: Networks of Questions
------------------------ ======================= Everything I know about
questions. ======================= By Justin Coslor justincoslor@gmail.com
(These ideas are all copyright by Justin Coslor on their respective dates. I
very much want to share these ideas, but I want to work in collaboration on
related projects, so I withhold all intellectual property rights to this
material. The work in this document is just a small selection of my ideas.
Please do not steal my work via Tempest equipment or by any other means. If you
are interested (due to tempest surveillance since I haven\\\'t shown anyone this,)
and wish to collaborate, feel free to contact me at the above email address,
and I will keep your technological secrets as long as you don\\\'t exploit me.
Also, I\\\'m egalitarian and I don\\\'t build weapons. Let\\\'s get that strait.
Realize, I\\\'m living on food stamps and measley disability stipend that barely
pays the rent.) 2/28/98 Standard Inferences About actions: who what happened
why when where how. Most everything else just uses one or a couple of these
inferences. 10/6/2003 Query As far as questions are concerned... It seems like
there are yes/no questions, option questions, spectrum questions, ind-depth
(and short) descriptive questions, computational questions, essay questions,
etc. Some are subjective (of opinion), some are neutral, some are definitive,
some are explanatory, some are geometrical/visual, some are mathematical, some
are of finite domain, some are impossible, some are biased, some are traps,
some are falsely/inaccurately stated, some are open-ended, some are meaningless
/pointless, some are direct, some are indirect, some are of infinite domain (a
snapshot), some are time/space sensitive, some are quantitative, some are
qualitative, some are recursive. 8/1/2004 Questions (a re-write) Questions can
be used to define agendas; or indicate knowledge; gaps; or inquire about
attributes, associations, and relations; or speculate; or to demonstrate
something or make a statement; or be used for introspection or inspection; or
to infer, deduce, or search for the elements of a pattern or context or its
system(s) or relations; or to map assumptions (an assumption being the context
that defines a set of beliefs); or to analyze and re-analyze data and
information. 3/15/2005 Networks of Questions In considering ideas and
information that is new to me, I ask networks of questions. The questions can
be framed as dependency charts. Now what is a good way to understand dependency
charts? List out the major nodes (most well-connected nodes) as open-ended
definitions, and form lexicons out of the interconnected definitions. Next map
out the rest of the nodes axiomatically using those definition structures. Turn
this into a software for common sense perception. Maybe make a web crawler
cognition engine that can learn the meaning behind things so that it can solve
problems by figuring out new ways of thinking about things (adapting the
context of question/perception networks). 3/15/2005 Experimentation Sometimes
experimentation is necessary to solve problems and answer questions, because
some nodes of information or questions or contextual perception networks are
otherwise unreachable, and often entirely unknown to exist. 4/15/2005 Question
Networks, continued... Abdicative reasoning: When does a function discover or
prove an axiom? What metric makes analogy recognizable? Do recursive lexicons
have the potential for infinite macro-scale growth? Do they have the potential
for infinite micro-scale growth? Or will they all be governed primarily by the
initial categories? Form networks of questions to gain valuable perspectives on
topical and problem data. Model question engines in a careful evolutionary goal
manner with substainability and capability and necessity as the primary
objectives. Map the spectrum of inquiry. Expectations->Intentions->
Experimentation (scientific combinations)->Dependency Chart Gaps and
Representation Gaps->Formulation of questions incorporating "known" data. 5/4/
2005 Answers We\\\'re surrounded by answers, but they\\\'re all meaningless and often
impossible to even detect without knowing at least some of the questions that
they are derived from. Without this question/answer connection, there is no
consciousness, awareness would not exist. Copyright 5/10/2005 Justin Coslor
Re-defining basic question thought-forms: Why? = Is there a reason for how this
came to be, and what is it? What? = The existence of this shall be called by a
name that needs to be defined, and we are inquiring about that. When? = This
occurred or shall occur at what time and day? How? = By what process does this
function? Notice that I had to use "what" in every one of these (except I tried
not to use "what" in it\\\'s own definition, which was difficult). Therefore
"what" is the most important thought form to focus on. "What" is the algebraic
domain of the relation "that", or "this", or "these", or "those"; and the range
is unknown, and is entirely unbounded. "That", is a pointer to a specific
instance of something in existence (whether it be in physical or Platonic
reality). The difference between Platonic objects and physical objects is that
Platonic objects are just pointers to other pointers, whereas physical objects
are pointers that point to themselves in a loop. Physical objects can bound and
/or link (like a chain) other physical objects because if we geometrize the
representation of the pointers we have physics, since the pointers loop. We
exist partially in physical reality, and partially in Platonic reality since we
can make conversions between the two. It\\\'s like the difference between
particles and waves. Copyright 6/17/2005 Justin Coslor Question Networks:
Option questions v.s. spectrum questions A lot of ambiguity is in every
question. For instance, if you asked a question today you\\\'d get one answer most
likely, but if you asked that same question 10,000 years from now you\\\'d
probably get a much different answer. The scope of a question can be narrow or
it cana be wide. With a narrow scope, a question might be a basic question that
can be modified by many options, or it can be a bunch of cases, as in specific
questions. Those are option questions. They lay out perspective question
options. When the scope is very general or comprehensive of a lot of
possibilities, then it is a spectrum question because it is intended to explore
a range of possibilities that are within the same domain. Option questions seek
to explore multiple questions that are not necessarily of the same domain.
Copyright 5/25/2005 Justin Coslor Question expectation templates and question
context intersections Questions contain an expectation template of the kind or
class of answers that thet inquisitor is looking for. Often times though, the
answers that are found or generated, or the answers that are of the most use,
do not match the question\\\'s expectation template. Often times, answers that ar
suitable cannot be derived or located until the question is elaborated,
generalized, or otherwise modeled using different representation, such as
analogical equivalencies of its objects, objectives, contexts, and relations.
Every question is the intersection of several contexts, where behind the
scenes, each context has its own unique expectation template; such as: - 1. The
type of question: who, what, where, when, why, how, and its structure and
methods. - 2. The semantic purpose of the question indicated by the question\\\'s
structure: to define a context, to define a pattern or variable property, to
state an open-ended knowledge structure and indicate the unknowns and data
access points, to explore a domain or a range, etc. Or to state facts alongside
the question, to indicate expectation parameters of the answer(s). - 3. The
setting of the question is object(s) and relation(s). Associated objects and
relations can be explicit or implied, but does result in expectation
parameters. - 4. The existential time frame or solidity or transitory frame
cycle of the question\\\'s objects and relations in regard to their setting is
another context involved in definitive consideration of answer expectation
parameters. - 5. - 6. . . etc. There may be many more foundational contexts
that intersect in the formation and existence of every question. Copyright 5/24
/2005 Justin Coslor Question asking systems Question -> Perception of meaning
of question -> Search and answer retrieval -> answer formulation ->
interpretation of answer. In short, QUESTION -> ANSWER(S). The more methods of
knowledge representation that are available to model the perception of the
meaning of the question, the more depth and breadth the search scope will have
in the answer retrieval process, and the experimental data combining buffer
will have more possibilities to form experimental combination answers with. If
the answers are experimental, then they may need to be tested or proven valid.
Not all valid answers are useful though, and not all questions can be modeled
accurately. Question-Answer systems and Question asking systems are subject to
priority systems, in their exploration of patterns in contexts. Every question
or series of questions is a rough draft of the question that will produce or
point to the desired answer that contains the right level of detail of suitable
content. Copyright 5/10/2005 Justin Coslor Re-defining basic question
thought-forms: Why? = Is there a reason for how this came to be, and what is
it? What? = The existence of this shall be called by a name that needs to be
defined, and we are inquiring about that. When? = This occurred or shall occur
at what time and day? How? = By what process does this function? Notice that I
had to use "what" in every one of these (except I tried not to use "what" in
it\\\'s own definition, which was difficult). Therefore "what" is the most
important thought form to focus on. "What" is the algebraic domain of the
relation "that", or "this", or "these", or "those"; and the range is unknown,
and is entirely unbounded. "That", is a pointer to a specific instance of
something in existence (whether it be in physical or Platonic reality). The
difference between Platonic objects and physical objects is that Platonic
objects are just pointers to other pointers, whereas physical objects are
pointers that point to themselves in a loop. Physical objects can bound and/or
link (like a chain) other physical objects because if we geometrize the
representation of the pointers we have physics, since the pointers loop. We
exist partially in physical reality, and partially in Platonic reality since we
can make conversions between the two. It\\\'s like the difference between
particles and waves... Copyright 5/11/2005 Justin Coslor Writing Tips When I
want to write, to figure out what to write I try to figure out a priority
system, where I aim to invent the most important new idea that I\\\'m either
interested in (topically) or that is very important but that is only
interesting enough to write down for somebody else to explore. Once I\\\'ve
focused on a topic I start asking questions and map it out and associate it to
other areas and build networks of questions and answers and arbitrary data. I
have to feel like writing and be relaxed and well hydrated (slightly
caffeinated helps), and it\\\'s best when I\\\'m thinking at my best (not bogged down
by emotions) I don\\\'t consider this entry an "idea" since I feel awful and am
terribly lonely and depressed and have heartburn at the moment. I write best
when I\\\'m either really really happy (a bipolar high), or really really
depressed (a bipolar low). 10/20/2004 Justin Coslor Regarding Education If
people could be taught first how to learn on their own, and next how to find
and update their sources of information and resources, and then be taught
creative and consistent logic and how to interact in their chosen forums of
discourse, along with some skills as to how they can negotiate their insights
and nurtured talents for wellbeing and non-harmful prosperity to an extent
limited to what they can successfully and comfortably manage without bloating
into the arena of greed or ill- intent; then they would have a great potential
for doing a lot of good in the world and in the happiness of their daily lives.
Lives lived purposefully. 10/28/2004 Justin Coslor It\\\'s important to be
semi-autonomous rather than being just another domino. Copyright 6/1/2005
Justin Coslor Choice Choice depends on having recognized options to choose
from. The availability of options depends on a system of awareness, and the
explorative mapping of solution spaces and/or experimentally created
generation. Also an evaluation system or metric is necessary for the selection
process to pick a suitable option. The initiation of choice can be voluntary or
forced; and it can be activated out of necessity, or independently. Copyright 5
/31/2005 Justin Coslor Creativity Creative processes start out with a chosen
medium, and then a random process is activated that generates a lot of
possibilities, then it is a matter of choosing the best or most desirable
possibilities and elaborating on them and linking them. That is what creativity
means to me. The creator may also have several goals or requirements in mind,
and be aware of juggling prerequisites. Copyright 5/28/2005 Justin Coslor
Intuitions Intuitions are sequences of inspiration, and are part possibility
thinking, part logical thinking, and part random chance phenomenon. Intuitive
truth requires proof. Copyright 8/13/2005 Justin Coslor Ideas and Probabilities
Ideas change probabilities, and ideas come from experimentation: search, sort,
and shuffle (grouping and storing patterns in contexts). Ideas guide courses of
action and affect expectations, of which reactions are based on, and those are
some of the probabilities ideas can change, but they can also pave the way for
new systems and developments. Intentions guide experimentation, and logic
guides methodology. Axioms define logic and modes of proof. Innate programming
(instinct) and use of methodology in real-time guides intentions. Useful ideas
change contexts dramatically, and in doing so, many of the patterns in those
contexts are able to form lots of new associations and possibilities. The most
sweeping ideas are at the axiom level, and as new axioms are added, contexts
expand and develop greater depth and greater interconnectivity. ---------------
Book III: Math Ideas: --------------- Copyright 9/13/2004 Justin Coslor
Infinity Something that is infinite in one context may be finite in another
context. For the re-definition of "infinite" is something that goes on forever
along the dimensional framework of a given context. But once new axioms are
applied to the context where that something went on forever, the context is
changed, and thus so the definition of many if not all things that existed in
the former context, and in many cases infinite objects may become quitet
definable (finite). ---------------------------------- 3/2/2005 update by
Justin Coslor Also, it\\\'s important to not that perspectives changes (such as
recontexualizations), may come with different axiom sets than the original
context. 10/19/2004 Justin Coslor Public Domain, free for well intended use
only. The upper limits of NP-Completeness Polynomial time computations\\\' upper
limit can be described by saying "infinity^x", and that has finitely many
dimensions of context, but infinite scope along those dimensions.
Non-polynomial time computations can be described by "x^infinity", and that has
finite scope, but infinitely many dimensions of context. As you can see, cannot
exactly equal np, however, it can approximate an incomplete abstract summary of
some parts of np, using part of p\\\'s scope. This is because exponents stand for
the number of perpendicular or symmetrical dimensions that the variable exists
in. So saying that p=np is like trying to say that infinity^x=x^infinity, which
it clearly is not; but p can be composed of a selection of np\\\'s dimensions, as
long as they have a common base for forming selective perspective. Copyright 10
/17/2004 Justin Coslor Qualifying & Quantifying Dimensionality In equations
such as AnX^n + A{n-1}X^n-1 + . . . + A1X + A0 = 0, the coefficients (An to A1)
can be considered to be quantifiers, and X^n to X or Y\\\'s etc, can be considered
to be qualitative variables. When the variables X, Y, etc have exponents or are
multiplied together, each combination of exponents and variables defines the
dimensionality of the planes that the equation is holding in relation to one
another, and the coefficients define the size or length or quantity or
magnitude of each dimensional/qualitative structure in the equation that is
held in relation to each other dimensional/qualitative structure in the
equation. Now some dimensional structures are best described by equations that
have more than two sides to the equal sign, such as those that exist on higher
prime and prime composite levels of balance than most of current mathematics is
based on. So we can only approximate descriptions of those structures in a
duality format if at all. I guess a computer array or database or arrays of
arrays can be used to depict higher dimensionality, but past a certain number
of dimensions it surpasses the human brain\\\'s neuro- hardware\\\'s ability to
visualize the relations and dimensional complexity. Arrays can be used to list
out infinitely many dimensions categorically and quantitatively. However,
nobody as of yet has discovered a way to think of a way to bound the
classification of objects or situations using more than two extremes, using
dualities such as maximum and minimum to balance an equation. Triality, or
quintality, etc, along the prime numbers may indeed be possible, though our
brains don\\\'t seem to interpret the universe along those dimensions as of yet.
Perhaps eventually we will learn to adapt higher logical foundations. Copyright
10/4/2004 Justin Coslor Spirals (See the photos of the pictures depicted by
this text on this date.) A number that has exponents contains one perpendicular
or symmetrical dimension per exponent , so f^5 in this equation might look
something like the multidimensional picture of a spiral within a spiral within
a spiral within a spiral within a spiral. This is how my math invention "Sine
Spiral Graphing" applies to the discovery I made about dimensionality (see
journal entry dated 7/10/2004 Justin Coslor). The line going through the center
of the spiral might actually be a spiral, a circle, an elliptical loop, a
curve, or some combination of those. This kind of visual notation ("Exponential
Sine Spiral Graphing" I call it) can be used in conjunction with conical orbit
graphing I call it) can be used in conjuntion with conical orbit graphing to
simplify the interaction visualizations of multiple spinning and/or orbiting
bodies that have at least one plane of rotation in common.
------------------------------ Update: Copyright 2/10/2005 Justin Coslor The
optimal structure of nanotechnology parallel-processing supercomputer memory
structure could be something like this f^5 composite exponential spiral, except
with ribbons of memory units and have vertical pipelines interconnecting each
exponential layer of the composite spiral, and have a brick made out of short
columns of these f^4 or f^5 or f^n spirals that are laterally connected on the
ends of each column and stack multiple columns on top of each other in sheets
of intensely interconnected spirals, like slices of a tree trunk. 7/10/2004 by
Justin Coslor Light Spirals For several weeks now I have believed that light
(and other emissions of convecting energy) particles/packets/quanta travel not
in waves, but in spirals and flocks of spirals. I came to this conclusion after
figuring out how to visualize Balmer\\\'s frequency equation (the one with the
Rydberg constant and electron shell radiuses: f=R(1/Nf^2 - 1/Ni^2) where Nf is
the outermost shell and Ni is the initial shell) in terms of sine-spiral
graphing (Sine-spiral graphing is something of my own invention, and is a 3D
resentation of circular motion, where the sine-waves or cosine waves
represented for all points in time as a spiral (cosine of a point is X, sine at
that point is Y, and time at that point is Z in the 3D coordinate
system....remember the unit circle?) through time (or through a 3rd dimension
if time is irrelevant or instantaneous or if motion is uniform)). See pg 67 of
the comic book "Introducing Quantum Theory" by J.P. McEvoy and Oscar Zarate -
Copyright 1996 (2003 reprint) ISBN: 1840460571 for Balmer\\\'s frequency equation.
*Note: Waveforms only look like that from a perpendicular side-view, and I
think this because, interestingly enough, 3D spirals look exactly like that
when they are looked at from a perpendicular side view, which essentially is a
2D perspective. That is part of the basis of my sine-spiral graphing methods (I
came up with the math for it when I got way behind in 10th grade Math-Analysis
class). 7/11/2004 update by Justin Coslor Light Spirals Continued To visualize
it I juggled the equation around a little, and figured out the intent that went
into creating the algorithm. In Nf^2 and Ni^2, f^2 and i^2 just means that the
variable f exists in a two- dimensional plane where one f axis is perpendicular
or symmetrical to every other variable in the composite of the multiplicative
parts; and when numbers or values get plugged into those variables, the
visualization depicts a specific graph within the context of that combined
dimensionality. That is why multiplication is used in algorithms to combine
variables that are proportional to each other. *Multiplication shows that they
have a proportional relationship. **Multiplication can also show that
variables\\\' dimensionality can share the same space, by perceiving of them in
the broader context of their dimensions\\\' combined contexts (whether it be
symbolic, semantic, algebraic, or geometrical). ***One variable=1 dimensional
representation. Two variables=2 dimensional representation. Three variables=3D
. . . There is a limit to our neuro hardware\\\'s dimensional ability. ****If a
variable is squared it exists within a two-dimensional context, if it is cubed,
it exists within a 3D context, etc. Copyright 5/6/1997 Justin Coslor Sine
Spiral Graphing A new method of graphing motion called "Sine Spiral Graphing"
was developed by me when I was 16. It allows for simultaneously graphing the
sine and cosine curves of an object in motion, three-dimensionally. Sine and
cosine, when graphed simultaneously in two dimensions, look like two staggered
intersecting waves traveling in the same general direction. (Fig. 1) There has
been a need for developing better methods of graphing an object\\\'s
two-dimensional (flat) motion through space over a period of time that more
clearly shows the progression of travel. At present, mapping three-dimensional
motion using different variables is more complicated, but could be a further
application of the principles presented in the "Sine Spiral Graphing" method.
The "Sine Spiral" is based on the spiral shape of two-dimensional circular
motion graphed in three dimensions using this new graphing technique. The name
is derived from the general name of the sine wave combined with what the actual
3D graph looks like: a spiral. This technique could be helpful for scientists
and students alike in many applications. Some possible application for the Sine
Spiral could be: - Plotting the motion of a bead in a hula hoop as it spins
around one\\\'s waist. - Calculating the position of various atomic/subatomic
particles moving in relation to each other over time. - Plotting the velocity
and position of a point on an automobile wheel as sit spins down a runway or
curvy hilly road. - Plotting the motion of a baseball spinning through the air
as it travels forward to the catcher over a period of time. - Calculating the
motion of a point on a bowling ball as it rolls down the lane over time. -
Calculating the speeds and positions of a set of points, on various gears at
work, in a clock in relation to each other over time. - Calculating the motion
of a point on a rocket ship, or of a point on a space satellite as it orbits a
planet. - Plotting the movement of a chicken in a tornado. All of these
examples listed present graphing difficulties when depicted on a normal graph.
The motions in these examples could be calculated on a computer and represented
in a simulated fashion to show the actual movement in space for one point in
time at a time. Concurrent Sine Spiral graphs can also be drawn for comparison
of points on multiple moving objects. However, it would be difficult to
graphically represent these motions for all points in time all at once. A
simulation could be like a video, where one can only view one place on the
video at a time. Viewing forward and reverse at the same time is not
logistically possible on a video. However, when motion is three-dimensionally
graphed on a computer using a Sine Spiral, it is possible to view these motions
for all points in time all at once. A very effective way to manipulate and
browse three-dimensional graphs (such as a Sine Spiral) on a computer is with
Virtual Reality equipment. With Virtual Reality equipment, the perspective of
the viewer can freely move around in space (on the graph) and see the 3D
objects in one\\\'s graph from any perspective. In a Virtual Reality graph, the
user can have total control over what is viewed and how it is viewed.
Understanding the trigonometric functions of sine, cosine, tangent, and their
inverse counterparts is a necessity for understanding Sine Spiral Graphing.
Trigonometric functions of real numbers, called "Circular Functions" (or
Wrapping Functions), can be defined in terms of the coordinates of points on
the unit circle with the equation x^2+y^2=1 having its center at the origin and
a radius of 1. (Fig. 2) There are three elements in a two-dimensional
trigonometric function: the angle of rotation (sigma), the radius of the
rotation r, and the (x,y) position of the point at that angle and radius. As
can be seen in Figure 3, the x and y portions of the graph are always
perpendicular to each other. Thus a right triangle is formed between the x, y,
and radius sides. Right triangle rules can therefore be applied to this point
in space (Brown/Robbins 190). Such trigonometric functions as sine and cosine
can be applied to the triangle formed by rotation. These functions, sin and
cos, are of fundamental importance in all branches of mathematics. One can use
points other than those on the unit circle to find values of the sine and
cosine functions. (Fig. 4) If a point Q has coordinates (x,y), and it is at
angle sigma in reference to the origin, (cos sigma) = x/r and (sin sigma) = y/
r. To obtain a rough sketch of a sine wave, plot the points (t, sin t) (Fig.
5), then draw a smooth curve through them, and extend the configuration to the
right and left in periodic fashion. This gives the portion of the graph shown
in Figure 5 (Swolowski 78). A cosine can be graphed in the same fashion by
simply shifting the graph 90 degrees to the right. (Fig. 6) An object\\\'s
circular motion can be described by either a sine wave or a cosine graphed in
the same fashion. Such a wave is composed of the object\\\'s radius of rotation
and the vperiod (number of degrees in on cycle) per unit of time that it
rotates. Seeing an object\\\'s sine and cosine graph simultaneously greatly helps
in visualizing the object\\\'s motion analytically compared how it found in real
life. Watching an animation of an object spinning is the same as seeing the x
and y coordinates (cosine and sine) of the object for each frame of the
animation, one frame at a time. This is because one could see a scale view of
its whole two-dimensional motion over a period of time. Visualizing an object\\\'s
true motion in nature from merely looking at a graph of its sine or cosine can
be difficult to conceptualize. For this reason, the Sine Spiral may be an
improvement in current co-linear graphing (Fig. 7). Velocity over the period of
one rotation on a sine curve can be measured by dividing the distance traveled
in one rotation by the amount of time it takes to complete that one rotation.
Velocity = change in distance/change in time + direction. Any change in
velocity (a change in time) will change the distance between peaks of the
spiral. The whole Z-axis around which the spiral revolves represents time
passed. When the velocity is constant, the distance from peak to peak in the
spiral is constant or each distance from one peak to another peak is the same.
(Fig. 6) Therefore, if the distance from one peak to another changes somewhere
in the spiral, this indicates that the velocity has changed at that point in
time. Within the Sine Spiral, some of the variables that can change in the
object\\\'s motion are velocity, radius of rotation, position of axis of
revolution, and the scale upon which measurements are based. The shape of this
spiral is an indication of any and all of these variables. The change in the
shape of the spiral correlates to the change in one or more of these variables.
(Fig. 7) Webster\\\'s Third New International Dictionary defines a spiral as "A
three-dimensional curve (as a helix) with one or more turns around and axis."
In current circular motion, the sine of the angle of rotation provides a Y
value (Sine=Y/Radius of Rotation), while the cosine of that same angle provides
and X value (Cosine=X/Radius of Rotation). These X and Y values are all that is
needed to draw the two-dimensional models of rotation known as the sine curve
and the two- dimensional models of rotation known as the sine curve and cosine
curve (or sine wave). To my knowledge it has not been thought possible to graph
this same motion in three dimensions though, because one needs an X, Y, and Z
coordinate in order to graph in 3D. There can be an X and Y coordinate by
finding the sine and cosine of a unit circle. All that is needed is a Z
coordinate to make the circular motion graphable in three dimensions. That Z
coordinate could be representable by time, or speed of rotation, or even the
period of degrees it takes for one complete rotation. In a sine wave, the
period is 360 degrees. Using the period of degrees in one rotation, one can
find a constantly increasing Z coordinate by dividing the current number of
degrees traveled by the period of degrees it takes to complete one rotation. In
short, degrees/period. The period can be depicted by a set amount of time.
Finding a ratio between something that can be used as a reference point (one
second vs the number of degrees in one rotation) to one\\\'s current progress in
that measurement scale (number of seconds that have passed vs number of degrees
that have been traveled) determine where one is on the Z- axis. By dividing
one\\\'s progress by a predetermined scale of reference, a new dimension can be
generated in which to plot on a graph in order to illustrate this in
three-dimensional fashion. This new dimension can be called the "Z-axis". Now
that there is an X, Y, and Z dimension available, a three-dimensional model of
an object\\\'s progress through its path of circular motion is possible. For 3D
motion, one can draw three spirals over the same T axis and where two of the
spirals intersect, plot a point. Connecting the dots between the points gives
one a tri-spiral (a spiral or shape that represents 3D motion over time). One
can continue plotting the points with several objects and where the tri-spirals
intersect, the objects intersect. One can break down the tri-spiral to find out
where the X, Y, and Z coordinates are in space and the time coordinates of the
intersection. To use the Sine Spiral to map the 3D motion throughout time, one
could mark the spiral with tags (or color code it) that tell one when and how
far down the Z-axis it travels. Then to graph several objects to compare their
motions and positions to each other, one can have a computer draw lines of the
same color of the Z-tag, linking all of the objects that intersect on the two
planes like the ZX plane, or the ZY plane. That way, one could identify when
objects like planets line up on a plane or intersect. There is much to benefit
from in being able to graph an object\\\'s progress at the same time as its
position in space. One can see time from an outside perspective and also see
how an object\\\'s motion, position, and speed relate to any point in time. In
many circumstances, it may be very useful to finally be able to get to see the
general shape of an object\\\'s travel through all points in time all at once.
This new method of graphing circular motion in three dimensions is the "Sine
Spiral". The graph forms a regularly spaced spiral whose axis is a straight
line equidistant from the perimeter of the spiral. Changing the radius of
rotation around a center axis changes the radius of the spiral around the Z
axis. Changing the center of rotation in two-dimensional space (X, Y
coordinates) makes the Z axis of the sign spiral curve up, down, or to the
sides when graphed (instead of the normal straight line Z-axis). For instance,
an air hockey puck pinning in place would have a regular sign spiral that
represents a point on the puck\\\'s perimeter that is traveling in a circle. Now
if the spinning puck were to be slid across an air hockey table, that same
point (on the perimeter of the puck) would have an irregular sine spiral whose
radius would be constant, but the Z-axis around which the graph spirals would
instantaneously bend at a ninety degree angle. A computer can easily generate
this three-dimensional picture of an object "N" at point "T" in time if the
speed of travel is irregular (or at the ratio of degrees traveled to the period
of one complete rotation if the speed is constant). (Fig. 8) Graphing any
two-dimensional motion (motion that moves in any direction on a flat plane), or
rotation in three-dimensions using time or progress as the third dimension
allows one to look at time from an outside perspective. The Sine Spiral can be
used to graph any such two-dimensional motion, or any number of combinations of
such motion. It can be used to graph several objects moving around in 2D (flat)
space on the same plane. The Sine Spiral can be used to graph an object which
has a rotation within a rotation, and so on (Fig. 9). In this case, each next
level of rotation is on an incrementally larger scale. To view some of the
higher levels of rotation, one must graph the object\\\'s motion over a longer
period of time. This concept can relate to complex motions of a longer period
of time. This concept can relate to complex motions of a large scale found in,
for example, the universe. Sine Spiral graphing can literally be used to graph
the motion of every particle in perceivable universe for all points in
observable time, simultaneously (by bending the Z-axis appropriately to
accommodate changes is axis orientation). Using the Sine Spiral, graphing
motion in the Z-axis, or time, requires one to employ a means to mark or
reference the Sine Spiral in order to distinguish how deep down the Z-axis the
motion has traveled. Without a Sine Spiral, one can only pick three-dimensions
to see on a graph for all points in those dimensions. One could have X, Y, and
Z coordinates on a 3D graph all at once, but only for one point in time per
graph. Or one could illustrate motion in any two dimensions for all points in
time using the Sine Spiral. Here are some of the dimensions from which one can
choose: X, Y, Z, and Time. One can have four or more dimensions on a graph by
selecting 3 variables form out of the X, Y, Z, and Time, as well as any number
of descriptive, qualitative, categorical, computational, or other quantitative
dimensions. These kinds of dimensions may appeal/apply to one\\\'s senses and
could be described in "real" dimensions such as the Z-axis and others. With 3D
applications using this concept (once improved methods of graphing 3D motion
with the sine spirals are better developed), other more complex spirals can be
mapped. Such 3D applications could include the universe in their motion through
space throughout all time to see where certain ones meet or line up), and
graphing the motion of particles of a sun during a supernova (the spiral would
look similar to a tangent spiral as described below). The Sine Spiral may be an
improvement in the graphing of nonlinear and linear motion. With the help of
the recent Virtual Reality technology, most any computer can be used to build
3D models such as Sine Spirals. We can construct and view a Sine Spiral and
have complete control over the graph, viewing it in 3D space as if it were
physically here. There are many new math applications and theorems that may
apply to this concept. Different types of spirals are possible with the general
Sine Spiral method. Such shapes could include the Sine Tube (a sine spiral
whose period is infinitely small), the Tangent Spiral (which uses a sine spiral
whose period is infinitely small), the Tangent Spiral (uses the equation Tan
sigma = (y/r)/ (x/r) for the x and y coordinates), and the secant spiral (uses
sec sigma = 1/(x/r) for the coordinate and csc sigma = 1/(y/r) for the y
coordinate). Also, in either two-dimensional or three-dimensional motion (when
a graphing method is available), an object can be spinning in a circle within a
circle (each level of rotation incrementally bigger than the previous), and
this will make a very special type of Sine Spiral that looks like a spiral
within a spiral within a spiral, etc., depending on how many levels of rotation
are going on. More new math applications ar sure to be found that can apply to
the Sine Spiral as it is used. Graphing three-dimensional motion with the Sine
Spiral is more difficult to do, but can be done effectively. Graphing
three-dimensional motion using the Sine Spiral needs further refinement at this
time, but will hopefully be available for use in the near future. There are
many new avenues that open up as people figure things out in science and math.
The Sine Spiral may be another door in mathematics ready to be opened up and
entered. Through this door may be a whole new way to look at things, a way to
see objects in nonlinear motion from a standpoint outside of time.
---------------------------------- Works Cited: Brown R., and D. Robbins,
"Advanced Mathematics: A Precalculus Course" Boston: Houghton Mifflin Company
1987. Fleenor C., M. Shanks, and C. Brumfiel. "The Elementary Functions".
Boston: Addison-Wesley Publishing Company, 1973. Gove, P.B., ed. "Webster\\\'s
Third New International Dictionary, Unabridged". Springfield, MA:
Miriam-Webster, 1986. Manougian, M.N. "Trigonometry with Applications". Tampa,
FL: Mariner Publishing Co., 1980. Swokowski, E.W. "Fundamentals of
Trigonometry". Boston: Prindle, Weber & Schmidt, Incorporated, 1982.
-------------------------------- Copyright 6/28/2003 Justin Coslor Conical
Satellite Orbit Graphing (See Diagrams dated 10/4/2004, 3/1/2004, and 9/15/
2001) I do think the conical satellite orbit graphing idea I thought of in
winter 2001 (or the year before) could still be something valuable in detecting
and calculating collisions and for 3D space junk detection. It\\\'s based on the
hypothesis that if you compress a half-sphere into the shape of a cone, the 180
degree arcs become straight lines, and straight lines are easier to represent,
interpret depth of, and run calculations on than arcs. Elliptical orbits would
just re straight lines at an angle, each line representing the orbital path of
an object in space. Where two or more lines intersect, a collision is possible
at the point by either accelerating or de-accelerating the objects that the
lines represent. Each object in a hemisphere cone is represented by a maximum
and minimum altitude, and an angle representing the direction in which the
object is traveling. There is one cone for each hemisphere. The neat thing
about the conical format is that you can see how a bunch of objects, traveling
in different directions at various altitudes, stack up along a common line of
altitude protruding through the center of the planet, sun, moon, atom, galaxy,
etc, and you can see how this line of altitude intersects each of those objects
at two points in time (one for each hypersphere cone), along their various
paths of travel. Conical orbit graphing is a way to group a set of satellites
(or other objects in orbit) by a single line protruding through the center of
the central mass out into space (with a longitude and latitude coordinate for
each hemisphere from which the line emerges). All sorts of nifty computer
software functions can be incorporated into this as well, such as having a 2D
map of the central mass (such as a planetary map or electron orbital map) as a
clickable image map that generates a unique pair of orbit cones for each
coordinate (one for each hemisphere of the hypersphere for objects traveling
360 degrees or more around the planet). It would have a timing component as
well and can be used as a multi-body gravitational clock, viewable with virtual
reality equipment or a regular computer. There can also be a range component
that highlights any possible collisions within a certain proximity of the
satellites in focus (the satellites that intersect a common axis of altitude,
have one pair of cones for each axis of altitude). The user should also be able
to zoom in and out, rotate the cones, focus on different axis\\\' of altitude,
combine complex orbits with sine- spiral graphing techniques (see my paper on
that), and watch the satellites travel along their path lines in real-time (at
an adjustable rate) using live or recorded data collected from sensors and
observational equipment. It would help if most modern satellites were equipped
to detect space junk and satellites around them and relay it back to the ground
so that the world has a constantly updated fairly accurate map of all of the
objects and space junk in orbit around the earth, since space flight has been
compared to flying through a high-speed shooting gallery. Ideally, some kind of
Star Trek-like/Tesla Wardencliffe-tower-like shields or something are needed
for the safety of that hazard (but not for use as a weapon), but a good 3D
navigational map can\\\'t hurt. For each satellite the computer can run a conical
orbit graphing collision detection test for each point in time along it\\\'s
projected path of travel. The main use of conical orbit graphing as I see it,
is for detecting collisions at points along a line of altitude, using one pair
of cones for each point in time (or as a 3D interactive video). The user should
be able to pick a time and x-y coordinate, see the satellites that intersect
that line of altitude, then zoom in on the part of the path of the satellite
that they are interested in, then click on a point in that path, and a new set
of cones will be generated using that point as an altitude line in the center
of the cones so that you can then see what possible collisions and path
intersections there are for that point in the satellite flight path-time. All
as straight lines so that it\\\'s easier to comprehend in complex situations. The
computer calculations might even be quicker than calculating arcs. I\\\'d assume
elliptical arcs to be the most computationally intensive using traditional
methods, but they too could probably be represented as straight lines in the
software (going diagonally across the cones from one height to another height,
and then the opposite for the other cone). It would be a 3D software tool for
visualization and collision-interception calculation (and might be able to help
protect all countries from incoming intercontinental thermonuclear ballistic
missiles by combing this visualization method with a ground-based or
space-based or airplane-based or reusable non-offensive missile based laser/
maser anti-ballistic missile defense system. There might be many other
beneficial uses for this visualization method that I haven\\\'t thought of yet
(such as charting asteroids around Saturn or something; though hopefully it
won\\\'t ever be used for, or even be useful for offensive purposes of any kind)..
I haven\\\'t written any of the code yet or figured out much of the math yet to
make it possible yet. Scholarly help is encouraged. Copyright 8/28/2005 Justin
Coslor Applications of Conical Hyperhemisphere Graphing When Combined With Sine
Spiral Graphing (See my papers dated 5/6/1997 and 6/28/2003.) A Sine Spiral
graph can be used to depict how an object rotates in N dimensions as it moves
from point to point in time (as though it were rotating in place through time
without actually traveling forward along a path). Then those time coordinates
can be linked to a conical orbit graph of the distance vectors that the object
moves through along its path (or use a 3D Cartesian Coordinate grid of its path
if it isn\\\'t going to travel a full orbit around the planet...or not...). This
combination of graphing techniques works regardless of whether the object is
below, on, or above the surface of the Earth, or other center of mass in space.
For instance it could be used for mapping the path of a vessel that goes from
under the ocean, up into the sky, and out into space into an orbit around the
moon or something. ***************** Each layer of the hyperhemisphere cone is
a polar grid of a different altitude. Elliptical and circular orbits are
represented as straight lines going across a pair of cones and intersect with
an axis of altitude line that goes vertically through the center of each cone,
where the axis of altitude represents a line going through the center of the
planet and out both sides into space. Elliptical orbits go diagonally across
the cones in this fashion from one altitude to another, and back the opposite
way in the cone that represents the other half of the hyperhemisphere. Circular
orbits go straight across the cones at whatever altitude and declination they
happen to be on. ***************** Space stations could use these mapping
techniques to coordinate their motion and to dock incoming spacecraft, and it
could be useful for spaceship navigation and satellite positioning,
coordination, and communication routing too. Navy submarines could use these
sine spiral + conical hyperhemisphere (or sine spiral + Cartesian or polar)
graphs when planning and plotting routes through the oceans of the world
through different depths and complex courses. Air-Force planes in perpetual (or
merely long distance) flight could also use it to plan or plot their courses,
so could airlines. It could simplify autonomous agent motion through extremely
complicated environments, such as space, or for nanobots navigation in a chip
or in colloidal fluid, or autopiloted aircraft in extremely crowded skies (such
as autopiloted personal aircraft for overcrowded cities). Cross Domain
Relations, for the Mathematics of Alternative Route Exploration Aside from the
first order logic stuff, the ideas and depictions in this paper were originally
conceived of and are Copyright 5/22/2004 by Justin M. Coslor, ALL RIGHTS
RESERVED (Please contact me for conditions of use...). This Rough Draft was
typed on 6/9/2004 in AbiWord on an X86-Compatible Personal Computer running GNU
Sarge (a free Debian Linux Operating System), and was encouraged by the
FRDCSA.ORG project. These ideas are intended to enhance the ability to discover
and invent new routes in any field of study, and to aid in evaluating the
relative utility of known routes, as well as to simplify some of the problems
posed by computability theory. Figure 1. From the foundations of relational
logic, we already know that: if a relation is xRy: X-->Y, then it is injective;
or if xRy: X<-->Y, then it is bijective; or if xRy: X-->(y1, y2, ..., yp), then
it is surjective; We also know that if a functional relation is xRy: y=f(x)=m
where f(x) represents an arbitrary function of the domain X that yields a set
of unique m\\\'s that are sub-ranges (y\\\'s) within the bounds of the range Y
(a.k.a. the Class Y), where each m corresponds to a uniquely arbitrary domain x
through the functional relation f(x). In this case, [f(x)]=R in the equation
xRy. (*Remember for later that any mathematical operator (+, -, /, *, etc.) can
be a relation. Any piece of computer software can also be treated as a
relation, since software performs operations, and is basically a collection of
algebraicly-tied operators.) But perhaps, we can broaden the scope of the
Context in order to allow for more possibilities. This "broadening", may
include metaphoric operations and metaphoric relations between the data type(s)
of the functional relation(s) in focus and various specified number sets,
orderings, and systems of numbers (including symbolic ones). (*We\\\'ll cover more
on this later.) Let us introduce a new type of relation, that is a relation
that relates relations, and let us call it a Cross-Domain Relation, and depict
it as such: One goal of this paper is to show a system to accurately depict the
following kinds of relation: xCy: (x1, x2, ..., xp)-->knEY (injective), or xCy:
(x1, x2, ..., xp)<-->knEY (bijective), or xCy: (x1, x2, ..., xp)-->(k1, k2,
..., kn)EY (surjective); where every sub-range k that is an element of the
range Y, has multiple domains that relate to each k in a unique way (through a
unique route). Each sub-domain in the Domain X can come from different contexts
and each sub- domain may operate under a different relation to specific
sub-ranges in Y than other sub- domains relations to those same sub-ranges in
Y. In these relations, some of the sub-domains may be injective, some may be
bijective, and some may be surjective. In order to label and order each set of
sub-domains that is part of a unique cross-domain relation, we introduce the
ordering term "n". We can use the "n" component here to differentiate and/or
order cross-domain relations, by combining the ordering of cross-domain-related
sub-domains (i.e. nCx) with the individual relations between those sub-domains
and any given sub-ranges (i.e. xRy), as such: nCx: N-->X (injective), or nCx: N
<-->X (bijective), or nCx: N-->{x1, x2, ..., xp} (surjective), then nCxRy
describes the cross-domain relation where n is an element in the cross-domain N
such that x=f(n), and x is an element of a particular cross-domain subset n (as
well as being a sub-domain of the domain X), where x has a relation (a.k.a. a
route) to a particular sub-range y in Y.; (***Note: every x in X and/or every n
in N can come from vastly different contexts, yet still lead to the same y(s)
in Y.) where for each sub-range y, f(n) is every function in the cross-domain N
that leads to multiple sub-domains in X that lead to the the multilateral
result k (which is a specific singular sub-range y in the Class Y with multiple
relations leading to it from the domain X) through the route: F[C{f(x)}]-->kEY
(kEY means k is an Element of Y), where C{f(x)}=n and y=f(x) and x=f(n), and k
represents any specific unique sub-range in Y that can be arrived at via
multiple domains\\\' functional relations, where each of the multiple domain\\\'s
relations goes from any sub-domain x in X to the same specific sub- range y in
Y; where F[N] is the set of all routes to all k\\\'s in Y, K is the set of all k\\\'s
in Y, and F[n] is the a relation describing set of all routes to a specific k
in Y. k is used to depict sub-ranges that have multiple ways to arrive at them;
that is to say, ways that include origin variations, and intermediary relation
combinations (middle-man combinations). In short: "If some unique X\\\'s yield
some of the same unique y\\\'s through various relations, then those X\\\'s are said
to have "cross-domain relations", because those domains have some relations
whose end results have something in common." ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^This is what I was
trying to draw and put into an equation format. I\\\'m not sure if I succeeded,
but probably. It seemed like there needed to be a formal word for what I was
trying to depict as relations that relate different contexts\\\' functions\\\'
domains by a representable equivalence or similarity in their ranges (when
there is exists such a representable equivalence or similarity), so that\\\'s how
I came up with the name "cross- domain relations". Computer software can
essentially be treated as such functions, for which cross-domain relations that
lead to alternative routes may exist for any given set or class of software
functions. It\\\'s basically all about alternative routes. Such a mapping can be
quite useful for exploring alternative, or previously unconsidered, or unknown
possibilities and modalities. In Figure 1., X is a class that contains domains
that lead to ranges within the class Y. There may be other classes that lead to
those ranges, even if they do so indirectly through other classes by broadening
the applicable context. By saying "lead to them" I mean "relate to them" in any
"chosen" way(s). The route equations can get very complex the more classes and
destinations you\\\'re analyzing when looking for and mapping cross-domain
relations. In practice, the user ends up with a concise pack of cross-domain
relation equations that summarizes the entire complexity of the known patterns
in the contexts of any situation or model. The equation packs can also be used
to represent the possible outlets to explore for new patterns based on
perceived priority of their beginning class of categories, and perceived
attainability/computability. . . mark off potentially infinite patterns and
recursive loops accordingly, after exploring the first few layers only.
Conclusion: Cross-domain relations can be used when depicting, predicting,
finding, manipulating, creating, using, analyzing, backtracking, tracing,
comparing, and reverse engineering alternative routes to anything, in any field
of application.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
---------------------------------------------------------------------
---------------------------------------------------------------------
--------------------------------------------------------------------- Examples:
(*In the following examples I have defined the "underscore" character "_" to be
the equivalent of the logical statement "OR", which is equivalent of the
English language statement "and/or". I use the "_" character to link multiple
routes to a sub-range, so that the patterns of the context of that sub-range
can all be packaged into one continuous string. Such a string can then be
parsed easily and sorted according to factors such as: route-scale (number of
computable degrees or nodes v.s. potentially infinite possibilities), route
category, route-size, relative route location, etc.) Example 1: In Figure 1.,
the domain x2 has an alternative route to y1 through the cross-domain relation
n1Cx2Ry1_n1Cx1Cy1 where n1Cx2Ry1=Route k1, and n1Cx1Cy1=Route k2. ((In my
examples I like to use C to represent bijective relations, and R to represent
surjective or injective relations.) *Note that x1Cy1Cn1=n1Cx1Cy1 ) So in this
example k1 and k2 are the known routes to y1, and since we know about more than
one route to y1, we can call k1 and k2 cross-domain relations. Or we can simply
reference that group of routes by the meta-name k1_k2. Figure 1.
-----------------------------------------------------------------------
-----------------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------------- The
following are Graph Theory Examples of Cross-Domain Relations: (**In the
following examples, I use R to represent an injective or surjective route, and
use C to represent the continuous directional flow of a bijective route. I use
the symbol "$" to indicate that the routes on each side of the "$" have a
bijective relationship. The "$" symbol is used when comparing two or more
routes. The "=>" symbol means "directly implies".) Example 2: First have a look
at Figure 2. (***Note: in ACB, (a1Cb1)$(b1Ca1), because BCA exists.) Figure 2.
Alternative routes to A from C: ARC=a2Ra2 => a2 = ACCk1 ACBRC=a1Cb1Rb3_
a1Cb1Ca1Cb1Rb3 => ACCk2_ACCk3 ACBCDCC=a1Cb1Cb2Cd1Cd2_A$B$D$C=a1b2d2 => Routes
ACCk4 through ACCk11 (****Many more complex routes beginning at A and
terminating at C exist, and can be very explicitly depicted in this manner.)
----------------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------------------
---------------------------------------------------------------------- Example
3: In Figure 2, by entering each line\\\'s node relationship into a computer in a
format such as: [ACB,BCD,DCC,BRC,ARC,ARF,FCE,FCC], (<----This is the Context.)
(Next I\\\'ll describe the Patterns in that Context...) the computer can generate
on the fly all of the possible routes from any given node to any other given
node, including curtailed potentially infinite loop structures (by representing
loop structures via the "$" operator, as noted earlier), and it can explicitly
represent the optimal routes and rank the suboptimal routes using relation and
cross-domain relation notation. Perhaps in some situations, one might even
order the routes by largest perimeter of closed polygonal circuit region to
smallest polygonal circuit perimeter, followed by largest open leg to smallest
open leg, when declaring a context. (*****Where ";" is the character that
indicates the parsing of each closed-circuit polygonal region or open leg in
this notation variation.) This might look something like: [ARC_CCF_ARF;
ARC_ACB_BRC;BCD_DCC_BRC;FCE] ...if the proportions were correctly represented
in my diagram, that is... Figure 2. Copyright 2/1/2005 Justin Coslor
Hierarchical Number Theory: Graph Theory Conversions Looking for patterns in
this: Prime odd and even cardinality on the natural number system (*See
diagram). First I listed out the prime numbers all in a row, separated by
commas. Then above them I drew connecting arcs over top of every other odd
prime (of the ordering of primes). Over top of those I drew an arc over every
two of those arcs, sequentially. Then over top of every sequential pair of
those arcs I drew another arc, and so on. Then I did the same thing below the
listing of the numbers, but this time starting with every other even prime.
Then I sequentially listed out whole lot of natural numbers and did the same
thing to them down below them, except I put both every other even and every
other odd hierarchical ordering of arcs over top of one another, down below the
listing of the natural number system. Then over top of the that listing of the
natural number system I transposed the hierarchical arc structures from the
prime number system; putting both every other even prime and every other odd
prime hierarchically on top of each other, as I previously described. *Now I
must note that in all of these, in the center of every arc I drew a line going
straight up or down to the center number for that arc. (See diagram.) In
another example, I took the data, and spread out the numbers all over the page
in an optimal layout, where no no hierarchical lines cross each other, but the
numbers act as nodal terminals where the hierarchical arches sprout out of.
(See Diagram) This made a very beautiful picture which was very similar to a
hypercube that has been unfolded onto a 2D surface. Graph Theory might be able
to be applied to hierarchical representations that have been re-aligned in this
manner, and in that way axioms from Graph Theory might be able to be translated
into Hierarchical Number Theory. The center-poles are very significant because
when I transposed the prime number structures onto the natural number system
there is a central non-prime even natural number in the very center directly
between the center-poles of the sequential arc structures of the every other
even prime and every other odd prime of the same hierarchical level and group
number. The incredibly amazing thing is that when dealing with very large prime
numbers, those prime numbers can be further reduced by representing them as an
offset equation of the central number plus or minus an offset number. The
beauty of is, that the since the central numbers aren\\\'t prime, they can be
reduced in parallel as the composite of some prime numbers, that when
multiplied together total that central number; and those prime composite
numbers can be further reduced in parallel by representing each one as their
central number (just like I previously described) plus or minus some offset
number, and so on and so on until you are dealing with very managably small
numbers in a massively parallel computation. The offset numbers can be
similarly crunched down to practically nothing as well. This very well may
solve a large class of N-P completeness problems!!! Hurray! It could be
extremely valuable in encryption, decryption, heuristics, pattern recognition,
random number testing, testing for primality in the search for new primes,
several branches of mathematics and other hard sciences can benefit from it as
well. I discovered pretty much independently, just playing around with numbers
in a coffee shop one day on 1/31/2005, and elaborated on 2/1/2005, and it was
on 2/4/2005 when describing it to a friend who wishes to remain anonymous that
I realized this nifty prime-number crunching technique, a few days after
talking with the Carnegie Mellon University Logic and Computation Grad Student
Seth Casana, actually it was then that I realized that prime numbers could be
represented as an offset equation, and then I figured out how to reduce the
offset equations to sets of smaller and smaller offset equations. I was showing
Seth the diagrams I had drawn and the patterns in them. He commented that it
looked like a Friege lattice or something. I think After I pointed out the
existance of central numbers in the diagrams Seth told me that sometimes people
represent prime numbers as an offset, and that all he could think of was that
they could be some kind of offset or something. He\\\'s a total genius. He\\\'s
graduating this year with a thesis on complexity theory and the philosophy of
science. He made a bunch of Flash animations that teach people epistemology.
Copyright 2/1/2005 Justin Coslor Rough draft typed 3/19/2005. This is an
entirely new way to perceive of number systems. It\\\'s a way to perceive of them
hierarchically. Many mathematical patterns may ready become apparent for number
theorists as larger and larger maps in this format are drawn and computed.
Hopefully some will be in the prime number system, as perceived through a
variety of other numbering systems and forms of cardinality. (See photos.)
Copyright 3/25/2004 Justin Coslor Hierarchical Number Theory Applied to Graph
Theory When every-other-number numerical hierarchies are converted into
dependency charts and then those dependency charts are generalized and pattern
matched to graphs and partial graphs of problems, number theory can apply to
those problems because the hierarchies are based on the number line of various
cardinalities. I had fun at Go Club yesterday, and while I was at the gym I
thought of another math invention. It was great. I figured out how to convert a
graph into a numerical hierarchy which is based on the number line, so number
theory can apply to the graph, and do so by pattern matching the graph to the
various graphs that are generated by converting numerical hierarchical
representations of the number line into dependency charts. I don\\\'t know if that
will make sense without seeing the diagrams, but it\\\'s something like that. The
exciting part is that almost any thing, concept, game, or situation can be
represented as a graph, and now, a bunch of patterns can be translated into
being able to apply to them. Copyright 1/31/2005 Justin Coslor Odd and Even
Prime Cardinality First twenty primes: 2, 3, 5, 7, 11, 13, 17, 19, 23, 29, 37,
41, 43, 47, 53, 59, 61, 67, 71, 73. ------------------- *See the photo of the
digram I drew on the original page. What properties and relations are there
between the odd primes? First ten odd primes: 2, 5, 11, 17, 23, 37, 43, 53, 61,
71. First five odd odd primes: 2, 11, 23, 43, 61. First five odd even primes:
5, 17, 37, 53, 71. First ten even primes: 3, 7, 13, 19, 29, 41, 47, 59, 67, 73.
First five even even primes: 7, 19, 41, 59, 73. First five even odd primes: 3,
13, 29, 47, 67. -------------------------- prime^(odd^4) = prime^(odd)^(odd)^
(odd)^(odd) = 2, 61, . . prime^(odd^3) = prime^(odd)^(odd)^(odd) = 2, 23, 43,
61, . . . prime^(odd^2) = prime^(odd)^(odd) = 2, 11, 23, 43, 61, . . . prime^
(odd) = prime^(odd) = 2, 5, 11, 17, 23, 37, 43, 53, 61, 71, . . . prime^(odd)^
(even) = 5, 17, 37, 53, 71, . . . prime^(even)^(odd) = 3, 13, 29, 47, 67, . . .
---------------------------------- Copyright 6/10/2005 Justin Coslor HOPS:
Hierarchical Offset Prefixes For counting hierarchically, prefix each set by
the following variables: parity, level, and group (group starting number). Then
use that group starting number as the starting position, and count up to the
number from zero placed at that starting position for representation of a
number prior to HOP computation. I need to develop a calculation method for
that representation. Have a high-level index which lists all of the group
starting numbers for one of the highest rows, then the rest of the number\\\'s
group numbers can be derived for any given level above or below it. All
calculations should access this index. If I was to look for the pattern "55" in
a string of numbers, for example, I might search linearly and copy all
two-digit locations that start with a "5" into a file, along with the memory
address of each, then throw out all instances that don\\\'t contain a "5" as the
second digit. That\\\'s one common way to search. But for addresses with a log of
digits, such as extremely large numbers, this is impractical and it\\\'s much
easier to do hierarchical level math to check for matches. The simplest way to
do it is a hierarchical parity check + level check + group # check before
proceeding to check both parities of every subgroup on level 1 of that the
offset number. The offset begins at zero at the end of the prefix\\\'s group
number, and a micro-hierarchy is built out of that offset. For large numbers,
this is much faster than using big numbers for everything. Example: Imagine the
number 123,456,789 on the number line. We\\\'ll call it "N". N = 9 digits in
decimal, and many more digits in binary. In HOP notation, N =
parity.level.group.offset. If I had a comprehensive index of all the group
numbers for a bunch of the levels I could generate a prefix for this # N, and
then I\\\'d only have to work with a tiny number that is the difference between
the closest highest group and the original number, because chances are the
numbers I apply it to are also offset by that prefix or a nearby prefix. The
great part about hierarchical offset prefixes is that it makes every number
very close to every other number because you just have to jump around from
level to level (vertically) and by group to group (horizontally). I\\\'ll need to
ask a programmer to make me a program that generates an index of group numbers
on each level, and the program should also be able to do conversions between
decimal numbers and hierarchical offset prefixes (HOPs). That way there are
only four simple equations necessary to add, subtract, multiply, divide any two
HOP numbers: just perform the proper conversions between the HOPs\\\' parity,
levels, groups, and offsets. Parity conversions are simple, level conversions
are just dealing with powers of 2, group conversions are just multiples of 2 +
1, and offset conversions just deal with regular mathematics using small
numbers. Copyright 7/7/2005 Justin Coslor Prime Breakdown Lookup Tables Make a
lookup table of all of the prime numbers in level 1 level.group.offset
notation, and calculate values for N levels up from there for each prime in
that same level.group.offset notation using the level 1 database. 2^n =
distance between prime 2^(n + m) and prime 2^(n + (m + 1)). Center numbers are
generated by picking another prime on that same level somehow (I\\\'m not positive
how yet), and the number in-between them is the center number. Center number
factoring can be done repeatedly so that, for example, if you wanted to
multiply a million digit number by a million digit number, you could spread
that out into several thousand small number calculations, and in that way
primes can be factored using center numbers + their offsets. Also, prime number
divisor checking can be done laterally in parallel by representing each divisor
in level.group.offset notation and then converting the computation into a set
of parallel processed center number prime breakdown calculations, which would
be significantly faster than doing traditional divisor checking, especially for
very large divisors, assuming you have a parallel processor computer at your
disposal, or do distributed computing, and do multiprocessing/multi- threading
on each processor as well. Copyright 10/7/2004 Justin Coslor Prime
divisor-checking in parallel processing pattern search. *I assume that people
have always known this information. Prime Numbers are not: 1. Even --> Add all
even numbers to the reject filter. 2. Divisible by other prime numbers --> Try
dividing all numbers on the potentially prime list by all known primes. 3.
Multiples of other prime numbers --> Parallel process: Map out in parallel
multiples of known primes up to a certain range for the scope of the search
field, and add those to the reject filter for that search scope. When you try
to divide numbers on the potentially prime list, all of those divisions can be
done in parallel where each prime divisor is granted its own process, and
multiple numbers on the potentially prime list for that search scope (actually
all of the potentials) could be divisor-checked in parallel, where every number
on the potentially prime list is granted its own complete set off parallel
processes, where each set contains a separate parallel process for every known
prime. So for less than half of the numbers in the search scope will initially
qualify to make it onto the potentially prime list for divisor checking. And
all of the potentially prime numbers will need to have their divisor check
processes augmented as more primes are discovered in the search scope. The
Sieve of Eratosthenes says that the search scope is in the range of n^2, where
n is the largest known prime. Multiple search scopes can be running
concurrently as well, and smaller divisor checks will always finish much sooner
than the larger ones (sequentially) for all numbers not already filtered out.
12/24/2004 Justin Coslor Look for Ways to Merge Prime Number Perception
Algorithms I don\\\'t yet understand how the Riemann Zeta Function works, but it
might be compatible with some of the mathematics I came up with for prime
numbers (sequential prime number word list heuristics, active filtering
techniques, and every other number groupings on the primes and on the natural
number system). Maybe there are lots of other prime number perception
algorithms that can also be used in conjunction with my algorithms. ???
-------------- Try applying my algorithm for greatly simplifying the
representation of large prime numbers to the Riemann Zeta function. My
algorithm reduces the complexity of the patterns between sequential prime
numbers to a fixed five variable word for each pair of sequential primes, and
there are only 81 possible words in all. So as a result of fixing the pattern
representation language to only look for certain qualities that are in every
sequential prime relationship, rather than having infinite possibilities and
not knowing what to look for, patterns will emerge after not to long into the
computer runtime. These patterns can then be used to predict the range of the
scope of future undiscovered prime numbers, which simplifies the search for the
next prime dramatically, but even more important than that is that my algorithm
reduces the cardinality complexity (the representation) of each prime number
significantly for all primes past a certain point, so in essence, this language
I\\\'ve invented is a whole new number system, but I\\\'m not sure how to run
computations on it. . .though it can be used with a search engine as a
cataloging method for dealing with extremely large numbers. My algorithm is in
this format: The Nth prime (in relation to the prime that came before it) = the
prime number nearest to [the midpoint of the Nth prime, whether it be in the
upper half or the lower half] : in relation to the remainder of that
"near-midpoint-prime" when subtracted from the Nth prime. The biggest part
always gets listed to the left of the smaller part (with a ratio sign
separating them), and if for the N- 1th prime if the prime prime part got
listed on one side and in the next if it\\\'s on the opposite side we take note of
that. Next we find the difference in the two parts and note if it is positive
or negative, even or odd, and lastly we compare it to the N-1th difference to
see if it is up, down, the same, or if N-1\\\'s difference is greater than 1 and
N\\\'s difference is 1 then we say it has been "reset". If the difference jumps
from 1 to a larger difference in N\\\'s difference we say it\\\'s "undo reset". Also,
the difference is the absolute value of the "near-midpoint-prime" minus the
remaining amount between it and the Nth prime. Now each of these qualities can
be represented by one letter and placed in one of four sequential places
(categories) to make a four character word. Numbers could even be used instead
of characters, but that might confuse people (though not computers).
******************* "Prime Sequence Matcher" (to be made into software)
******************* This whole method is Copyright 10/25/2004 Justin Coslor, or
even sooner (most likely 10/17/2004, since that\\\'s when it occurred to me. I
thought of this idea to help the whole world and therefore must copyright it to
ensure that nobody hordes or misuses it. The algorithms behind this method that
I have invented are free for academic use by all United Nations member nations,
for fair good intent only towards everyone. ----------------------------------
Download a list of the first 10,000 prime numbers from the Internet, and
consider formating it in EMACS to look something like this: 12 23 35 47 5 11 6
13 . . . 10,000 ____ and name that file primelist.txt -----------------------
Write a computer program in C or Java called "PrimeSequenceMatcher" that
generates a file called "primerelations.txt" in the following format based on
calculations done on each of line of the file "primelist.txt". primelist.txt->
PrimeSequenceMatcher->primerelations.txt file: primerelations.txt 2 3 2:1 diff
1 left, pos, odd, same 3 5 3:2 diff 1 left, pos, even, up 4 7 5:2 diff 3 left,
pos, even, same 5 11 7:4 diff 3 LR, neg, even, down(or reset) 6 13 6:5 diff 1
right, pos, even, up(or undo reset) 7 17 10:7 diff 3 . . . N __ __:__ diff __
For the C program see pg. 241 to 251 of Kernigan and Ritchie\\\'s book, "The C
Programming Language", for functions that might be useful in the program. See
the scans of my journal entries from 10/17/2004, 10/18/2004, and 10/24/2004 for
details on the process (*Note, there may be a few errors, and the paperwork is
sort of sloppy for those dates...), and turn it into an efficient explicit
algorithm. **2/22/2005 Update: I wrote out the gist of the algorithms for the
software in my 10/26/2004 journal entry. The point of the generating the file
primerelations.txt is to run the file through pattern searching algorithms, and
build a relational database, because since the language of the primes\\\'s
representation in my method is severely limited, patterns might emerge. Nobody
knows whether or not the patterns will be consistent in predicting the range
that the next primes will be in, but I hope that they will, and it\\\'s worth
doing the experiment since that would be a remarkable tool to have discovered.
The patterns may reveal in some cases which is larger: the nearest-to-midpoint
prime or it\\\'s corresponding additive part. Where the sum equals the prime. That
would tell you a general range of where the next prime isn\\\'t at. Also the
patterns may in some cases have a predictable "diff" value, which would be
immensely valuable in knowing, so that you can compare it to the values of the
prime that came before it, which would give a fairly close prediction of where
the next prime may lye. By looking at the pattern of the ordering of sentences,
we can possibly tell which side of the ratio sign the nearest-to-midpoint prime
of the next prime we are looking for lies on (and thus know whether it is in
the upper half or the lower half of the search scope). The search scope for the
next prime number is in the range of the largest known prime squared. We might
also be able to in some cases determine how far from the absolute value of the
difference between the nearest-to- midpoint prime and the prime number we are
looking for, that the prime number that we are looking for is. Copyright 10/26/
2004 to 10/27/2004 Justin Coslor I hereby release this idea under The GNU
Public License Agreement (GPL). ************************* Prime Sequence
Matcher Algorithm ************************* (This algorithm is to be turned
into software. See previous journal entries that are related.) Concept
conceived of originally on 10/17/2004 by Justin Coslor Trends in these
sequential prime relation sentences might emerge as lists of these sentences
are formed and parsed for all, or a large chunk of, the known primes.
------------------------------- The following definitions are important to know
in order to understand the algorithm: nmp = the prime number nearest to the
midpoint of "the Nth prime we are representing divided by 2" aptnmp = adjacent
part of the nmp = prime number we are representing minus nmp prime/2 =
(nmp+aptnmp)/2 = the midpoint of the prime nmp = (2 * midpoint) - aptnmp aptnmp
= (2 * midpoint) - nmp prime = 2 * midpoint We take notice of whether nmp is
greater than, equal to, or less than aptnmp. diff = |nmp - aptnmp| N prime =
nmp:aptnmp or aptnmp:nmp, diff = |nmp - aptnmp|
___________________________________ | a | b | c | d | | left | pos | even | up
| | right | neg | odd | down | | LR | null | | same | | RL | | | reset | | | |
| undoreset | ----------------------------------- Each possible word can be
abbreviated as a symbolic character or symbolic digit, so the sentence is
shortened to the size of a four character word or four digit number. *Note: "a"
only = "same" when prime = 2 (.....that is, when N = 1) **Note: If "c" ever =
"same", then N is not prime, so halt. "abcd" has less than or equal to 100
possible sequential prime relation sentences (SPRS)\\\'s, since the representation
is limited by the algorithms listed below. Generate a list of SPRS\\\'s for all
known primes and do pattern matching/search algorithms to look for trends that
will limit the search scope. The algorithms might even include SPRS orderings
recursively. -------------------------------- Here are the rules that govern
abcd: If nmp > aptnmp, then a = left. If nmp < aptnmp, then a = right. If nmp =
aptnmp, then a = same. If N - 1\\\'s "a" = left, and N\\\'s "a" = right, then set N\\\'s
"a" = LR. If N - 1\\\'s "a" = right, and N\\\'s "a" = left, then set N\\\'s a = RL. If
N\\\'s nmp - (N - 1)\\\'s nmp > 0, then b = pos. If N\\\'s nmp - (N - 1)\\\'s nmp < 0, then
b = neg. If C = same, then b = null. Meaning, if N\\\'s nmp - (N-1)\\\'s nmp = 0,
then b= null. If N\\\'s nmp - (N-1)\\\'s nmp is an even integer, then c = even. If
N\\\'s nmp - (N - 1)\\\'s nmp is an odd integer, then c = odd. If N\\\'s diff > (N - 1)
\\\'s diff, then d = up. If N\\\'s diff < (N - 1)\\\'s diff, then d = down. If N\\\'s diff
= (N-1)\\\'s diff, then d = same. If (N - 1)\\\'s diff > 1 and N\\\'s diff = 1, then d =
reset. If (N - 1)\\\'s diff = 1 and N\\\'s diff > 1, then d = undoreset. [......But
maybe when (N - 1)\\\'s diff and N\\\'s diff = either 1 or 3, then d would also = up,
or d = down.] If a = left or RL, then N prime = nmp:aptnmp, diff = |nmp -
aptnmp| If a = right or LR, then N prime = aptnmp:nmp, diff = |nmp - aptnmp| If
a = same, then N prime = nmp:nmp, diff = |nmp - aptnmp|, but only when N prime
= N. ----------------------------------- Copyright 10/24/2004 Justin Coslor
Prime number patterns based on a ratio balance of the largest near-midpoint
prime number and the non-prime combinations of factors in the remainder: An
overlay of symmetries describe prime number patterns based on a ratio balance
of the largest near midpoint prime number and the non-prime combinations of
factors in the remainder. This is to cut down the search space for the next
prime number, by guessing at what range to search the prime in first, using
this data. For instance, we might describe the prime number 67 geometrically by
layering the prime number 31 under the remainder 36, which has the modulo
binary symmetry equivalency of the pattern 2*2*3*3. We always put the largest
number on top in our description, regardless of whether it is prime or
non-prime, because this ordering will be of importance in our sentence
description of that prime. We describe the sentence in relation to how we
described the prime number that came before it. For instance, we described 61
as 61=31:2*3*5 ratio (the larger composite always goes on the left of the ratio
symbol, because it will be important to note which side the prime number ends
up on), difference of 1 (difference shows how far from the center the near-mid
prime lies. 31-30=1), right->left (this changing of sides is important to note
because it describes which side of the midpoint of the prime that the
nearest-to-midpoint prime lies on or has moved to, in terms of the ratio
symbol) odd same (this describes whether the nearest-to-midpoint primes of two
prime numbers have a difference that is even, odd, or if they have the same
nearest-to-midpoint primes.) 67=2*2*3*3:31 ratio, difference of 5, left->right
same undo last reset. By looking at the pattern in the sentence descriptions
(180 possible sentences), we can tell which side of the ratio sign that the
next prime\\\'s nearest-to-midpoint prime lies on, which tells you which half of
the search scope the next prime lies in, which might cut the computational task
in finding the next finding that next prime number in half or more. A computer
program to generate these sentences can be written for doing the pattern
matching. In the prime number 67 example, the part that says "same", refers to
whether the nearest-to- midpoint primes of two prime numbers have a difference
that is even, odd, or if they have the same nearest-to-midpoint primes. I threw
in the "reset to 1" thing just because it probably occurs a lot, then there\\\'s
also the infamous "undo-from-last-reset" which it brings the difference from 1
back to where it was previously at. Copyright 10/5/2004 Justin Coslor Prime
Numbers in Geometry continued . . . Modulo Binary I think that if prime numbers
can be expressed geometrically as ratios there might be a geometric shortcut to
determining if a number is prime or maybe non-prime. Prime numbers can be
represented symmetrically, but not with colored partitions. (*See diagrams.)
Here\\\'s a new kind of binary code that I invented, based on the method of
partitioning a circle and alternately coloring and grouping the equiangled
symmetrical partitions of non-prime partition sections. (*Note, since prime
numbers don\\\'t have symmetrical equiangled partitions, use the center-number +
offset converted into modulo binary (see my 2/4/2005 idea and the 2/1/2005
diagram I drew for prime odd and even cardinality and data compression on the
prime numbers)). Modulo binary: *Based on geometric symmetry ratios. **I may
not have been very consistent with my numbering scheme here, but you should be
in final draft version. 1=1 2=11 3=111 4=1010 5=11111 6=110110 or 101010 7=
1111111 8=10101010 or 11101110 9=110110110 10=1010101010 11=11111111111 12=
110110110110 13=1111111111111 14=10101010101010 15=10110,10110,10110 16=
1010,1010,1010,1010 Find a better way of doing this that might incorporate my
prime center number + offset representation of the primes and non-primes. This
is an entirely new way of counting, so try to make it scalable, and
calculatable. Secondary Levels of Modulo Binary: (*This is just experimental. .
.I based these secondary levels on the first level numbers that are multiples
of these.) 0=00 1=1 2=10 3=110 4=2+2=1010 5=10110 6=3+3=110110 or 111000 or
101101 7= 8=4+4=10101010 9=3+3+3=110110110 10=1010101010 11= 12=3+3+3+3=
110110110110 13= 14=10101010101010101010 15=5+5+5=101101011010110 16=4+4+4+4=
1010101010101010 Draw a 49 section and 56 section circle, and look for
symmetries to figure out how best to represent the number 7 in the secondary
layer of modulo binary. There needs to be a stop bit too. Maybe 00 or
something, and always start numbers with a 1. The numbers on through ten should
be sufficient for converting partially from base 10. Where calculations would
still be done in base 10, but using modulo binary representations of each
digit. For encryption obfuscation and stuff. It seems that for even numbers,
the half-circle symmetries rotate between 0,0 across the circle for numbers
that are odd when divided by two, and the numbers that are odd when divided by
two have alternate-half 0,0 symmetry. But numbers that are prime when divided
by two have middle- across 0,1 symmetry. Copyright 9/30/2004 Justin Coslor
Prime Numbers in Geometry *Turn this idea into a Design Science paper entitled
"Patterns in prime composite partition coloring structures". In the paper,
relate these discoveries to the periodic table. (All prime numbers can be
represented as unique symmetries in Geometry.) 1/1 = 0 division lines 1/2 = 1
division lines 1/3 = 3 division lines 1/4 = 2 division lines 1/5 = 5 division
lines 1/6 = 5 division lines = one 1/2 division line and two 1/3 division lines
on each half circle. 1/7 = 7 division lines 1/8 = 4 division lines 1/9 = _____
division lines . . . Or maybe count by partition sections rather than division
lines. . . How do I write an algorithm or computer program that counts how many
division lines there are in a symmetrically equiangled partitioning of a
circle, where if two division lines that meet in the middle (as all division
lines do) form a straight line they would only count as one line and not two?
Generate a sequential list of values to find their number of division lines,
and see if there is any pattern in the non-prime division line numbers (i.e. 1/
4, 1/6, 1/8, 1/9, 1/10, 1/12, ...) that might be able to be related to the
process of determining or discovering which divisions are prime, or the
sequence of the prime numbers (1/2, 1/3, 1/5, 1/7, 1/11, 1/13, 1/17, ...). 10/5
/2004 Justin Coslor As it turns out, there is a pattern in the non-prime
division lines that partition a circle. The equiangled symmetry partition
patterns look like stacks of prime composites layered on top of one another
like the Tower of Hanoi computer game, where each layer\\\'s non-prime symmetry
pattern can be colored using it\\\'s own colors in an on-off configuration around
the circle (See diagrams.). Prime layers can\\\'t be colored in an on-off pattern
symmetrically if the partitions remain equiangled, because there would be two
adjacent partitions somewhere in the circle of the same color, and that\\\'s not
symmetrical. Copyright 7/25/2005 Justin Coslor Geometry of the Numberline:
Pictograms and Polygons. (See diagrams) Obtain a list of sequential prime
numbers. Then draw a pictogram chart for each number on graph paper, with the
base 10 digits 1 through 10 on the Y-axis, and on the X-axis of each pictogram
the first column is the 1\\\'s column, the second column is the 10\\\'s column, the
third columns is the 100\\\'s column, etc. Then plot the points for each digit of
the prime number you\\\'re representing, and connect the lines sequentially. That
pictogram is then the exact unique base-10 geometrical representation of that
particular prime number (and it can be done for non-prime numbers too). Another
way to make the pictogram for a number is to plot the points as described, but
then connect the points to form a maximum surface area polygon, because when
you do that, that unique polygon exactly describes that particular number when
it\\\'s listed in its original orientation. inside the base-10 graph paper border
that uses the minimum amount of X-axis boxes necessary to convey the picture,
and pictograms are always bordered on the canvas 10 boxes high in base 10.
Other bases can be used too for different sets of pictograms. What does the
pictogram for a given number look like in other bases? We can connect the dots
to make a polygon too, that is exactly the specific representation in its
proper orientation of that particular unique number represented in that base.
Also I wonder what the pictograms and polygon pictograms look like when
represented in polar coordinates? These pictogram patterns might show up a lot
in nature and artwork, and it\\\'d be interesting to do a mathematical study of
photos and artwork, where each polygon that matches gets bordered by the border
of it\\\'s particular matching pictogram polygon in whatever base it happens to be
in, and pictures might be representable as layers of these numerical
pictograms, spread out all over the canvas overlapping and all, and maybe
partially hidden for some. You could in that way make a coordinate system in
which to calculate the positions and layerings of the numerical pictograms that
show up within the border of the photo or frame of the artwork, and it could
even be a form of steganometry when intentionally layered into photos and
artwork, for cryptography and art. Summing multiple vertexes of numerical
polygon pictograms could also be used as a technique that would be useful for
surjectively distorting sums of large numbers. That too might have applications
in cryptography and computer vector artwork. See the diagram of the base 10
polar coordinate pictogram representation of the number 13,063. With polar
notation, as with Cartesian Coordinate System notation of the pictograms, it\\\'s
important to note where the reference point is, and what base it\\\'s in, and
whether it\\\'s on a polar coordinate system or Cartesian Coordinate System. In
polar coordinates, you need to know where the center point is in relation to
the polygon. . .no I\\\'m wrong, it can be calculated s long as no vertexes lie in
a line. In all polygon representations, the edge needs to touch all vertexes.
Copyright 7/27/2005 Justin Coslor Combining level.group.offset hierarchical
representation with base N pictogram representation of numbers (See diagrams)
level.group offset notation is (baseN^level)*group+offset Pictogram notation is
as described previously. If you take the pictogram shape out of context and
orient it differently it could mean a lot of different things, but if you know
the orientation (you can calculate the spacing of the vertexes in different
orientations to find the correct orientation, but you know must also know what
base the number is in to begin with) then you can decipher what number the
polygon represents. You must know what the base is because it could be of an
enormous base. . .you must also know an anchor point for lining it up with the
XY border of the number line context in that base because it could be a number
shape floating inside a enormous base for all anyone knows, with that anchor
point. Also, multiple numbers on the same straight line can be confusing unless
they are clearly marked as vertexes. If multiple polygons are intersecting,
then they could represent a matrix equation of all of those numbers. Or if
there are three or four polygons connected to each other by a line or a single
vertex, then the three pictograms might represent the three or four parts of a
large or small level.group.offset number in a particular base. Pictograms
connected in level.group offset notation would still need to be independently
rotated into their correct orientation, and you\\\'d need to know their anchor
points and base, but you could very simply represent an unfathomably enormous
number that way in just a tiny little drawing. Also, numbers might represent
words in a dictionary or letters of an alphabet. This is literally the most
concise way to represent unfathomably enormous numbers that possibly anyone has
ever imagined. Ever. You could write a computer program that would draw and
randomize these drawings as a translation from a dictionary/language set and
word processor document. They could decoded in the reverse process by people
who know the anchor point keys and base keys for each polygon. You can make the
drawings as a subtle off-white color blended into the white part of the
background of a picture, and transmit enormous documents as a single tiny
little picture that just needs some calculating and keys to decode. Different
polygon pictograms, which each could represent a string of numbers, which can
be partitioned into sections that each represents a word or character, could
each be drawn in a different color. So polygons that are in different colors
and different layers in a haphazard stack, could be organized, where the color
of multiple polygons, means they are part of the same document string, and the
layering of the polygons indicates the order that the documents are to be read
in. Copyright 7/28/2005 Justin Coslor Optimal Data Compression: Geometric
Numberline Pictograms If each polygon is represented using a different color,
you don\\\'t even need to draw the lines that connect the vertexes, so that you
can cram as many polygons as possible onto the canvas. In each polygon, the
number of vertexes is the number of digits in whatever base it\\\'s being
represented in. Large bases will mean larger image dimensions, but will allow
for really small representations of large numbers. Ideally one should only use
a particular color on one polygon once. For optimal representation, one should
represent each number in a base that is as close to the number of digits in
that base as possible. If you always do that, then you won\\\'t have to know what
base the polygon is represented in to begin with (because it can be
calculated). However, you will still need to know the starting vertex or
another anchor point to figure out which orientation the polygon is to be
perceived of in. On polar coordinate polygon pictograms, you will just need to
know the center point and a reference point such as where the zero mark is, as
well as what base the polygon is represented in (in most cases). Hierarchical
level.group.offset data compression techniques or other data compression
techniques can also be used. Copyright 7/24/2005 Justin Coslor Prime Inversion
Charts (See diagram) Make a conversion list of the sequential prime numbers,
where each number (prime 1 through the N\\\'th prime) is inverted so that the
least significant digit is now the most significant digit, and the most
significant digit is now the least significant digit (ones column stays in the
ones column, but the 10\\\'s column gets put in the 10ths column on the other side
of the decimal point, same with hundreds, etc.). So you have a graph that goes
from 0 through 10 on the Y-axis, and 0 through N along the X axis, and you just
plot the points for prime 1 through the N\\\'th prime and connect the dots
sequentially. Also, you can convert this into a binary string by making it so
that if any prime is higher up on the Y-axis than the prime before it, it
becomes a 1, and if it is less than the prime before it, it becomes a 0. Then
you can look for patterns in that. I noticed many recurring binary string
patterns in that sequence, as well as many pallendrome string patterns in that
representation (and I only looked at the first couple of numbers, so there
might be something to it). 10/8/2004 Justin Coslor Classical Algebra (textbook
notes) Pg. 157 of Classical Algebra fourth edition says: The Prime Number
Theorem: In the interval of 1 through X, there are about X/LOGeX primes in this
interval. P=X/LOGeX scope: (1,X) or something. The book claims that they cannot
factor 200 digit primes yet. In 1999 Nayan Hajratwala found a record new prime
2^6972593 - 1 with his PC. It\\\'s a Mersenne Prime over 2 million digits long.
This book deals a lot with encryption. I believe that nothing is 100% secure
except for the potential for a delay. On pg. 39 it says "There is no known
efficient procedure for finding prime numbers." On pg. 157 it directly
contradicts that statement by saying: "There are efficient methods for finding
very large prime numbers." The process I described in my 10/7/2004 journal
entryis like the sieve of Eratosthenes, except my method goes a step farther in
making a continuously augmented filter list of divisor multiplicants not to
bother checking, while simultaneously running the Sieve of Eratosthenes in a
massive synchronously parallel computational process. Prime numbers are useful
for use in pattern search algorithms that operate in abdicative and deductive
reasoning engines (systems), which can be used to explore and grow and help
solve problems and provide new opportunities and to invent things and do
science simulations far beyond human capability. (Pg. 40) Theorem: An integer
x>1 is either prime or contains a prime factor <=sqrt(x). Proof: x=ab where a
and b are positive integers between 1 and x. Since P is the smallest prime
factor, a>=p, b>=p and x=ab>=p^2. Hence p<=sqrt(x). Example: If x=10 a=2 and b=
5. p=3 p^2=9 so 10=2*5>=9. So factors of x are within the scope of (2, sqrt(x))
or else it\\\'s prime. a^2>=b^2. x^2>=p^4. x^2/p^4=big. Try converting Fermat\\\'s
Little Theorem and other corollaries into geometry symmetries and modulo binary
format. The propositions in Modern Algebra about modulo might only hold for
two- dimensional arithmetic, but if you add a 3rd dimension the rotations are
countable as periods on a spiral, which when viewed from a perpendicular
side-view looks like a 2-dimensional waveform. 9/26/2004 Justin Coslor Privacy
True privacy may not be possible, but the best that we can hope for is a long
enough delay in recognition of observations to have enough time and patience to
put things intot the perspective of a more understanding context. Copyright 9/
17/2004 Justin Coslor A Simple, Concise, Encryption Syntax. This can be one
layer of an encryption, that can be the foundation of a concise syntax.
*Important: The example does not do this, but in practice, if you plan on using
this kind of encryption more than once, then be sure to generate a random
unique binary string for each letter of the alphabet, and make each X digits
long. Then generate a random binary string that is N times as long as the
length of your message to be sent, and append unique sequential pieces (of
equal length) of this random binary string to the right of each character\\\'s
binary representation. The remote parts should have lots of securely acquired
random unique alphabet/random binary string pairs, such as on a DVD that twas
delivered by hand. In long messages, never use the same alphabet\\\'s character(s)
more than once but rotate to the next binary character representation on the
DVD sequentially. Here\\\'s the example alphabet (note that you can of course
choose your own alphabetic representation as long as it is logically
consistent): a 010101 b 011001 c 011101 d 100001 e 100101 f 101001 g 110001 h
110101 i 111001 --------- j 010110 k 011010 l 011110 m 100010 n 100110 o 101010
p 110010 q 110110 r 111010 --------- s 010111 t 011011 u 011111 v 100011 w
100111 x 101011 y 110011 z 110111 space 111011 ------------------------
EXAMPLE: "peace brother" can be encoded like this using that particular
alphabet:
011011101001011000101101011100100110010110010101110111011010010110111011010110
0101111010101010100001101110110101111001010111101001 ------------------------ 2
/18/2005 Update by Justin Coslor Well, I forgot how to break my own code.
Imagine that! I think it had something to do with making up a random string
that was of a length that is divisible by the number of letters in the
alphabet, yet is of equal bit-length to the bit-translated message, so that you
know how long the message is, and you know how many bits it takes to represent
each character in the alphabet. Then systematically mix in the random bits with
the bits in the encoded message. In my alphabet I used 27 characters that were
each six bits in length; and in my example, my message was 13 characters long,
11 of which were unique. I seriously have no idea what I was thinking when I
wrote this example, but at least my alphabet I do understand, and it\\\'s pretty
concise, and sufficiently obscured for some purposes. Copyright 6/30/2005
Justin Coslor Automatic Systems (See Diagram) There is 2D, and there are 3D
snapshots represented in 2D, and there is the model-theory approach of making
graphs and flowcharts, but why not add dimensional metrics to graph diagrams to
represent systems more accurately? --------------------------------- Atomic
Elements -> Mixing pot -> Distillation/Recombination: A->B->C->D->E -> State
Machine Output Display (Active Graphing = real-time) -> Output Parsing and
calculation of refinements (Empirical) -> Set of contextually adaptive
relations: R1->A, R2->B, R3->C, R4->D, R5->E.
------------------------------------- Copyright 5/11/2005 Justin Coslor How to
combine sequences: Draw a set of Cartesian coordinate system axis, and on the x
axis mark off the points for one sequence, and on the y axis mark off the
points for the sequence you want to combine with it (and if you have three
sequences you want to combine, mark off the third sequence on the z-axis.
...for more than 3 sequences, use linear algebra). Next draw a box between the
origin and the first point on each sequence; then calculate the length of the
diagonal. Then do the same for the next point in each sequence and calculate
the length of the diagonal. Eventually you will have a unique sequence that is
representative of all of the different sequences that you combined into one in
this manner. For instance, you could generate a sequence that is the
combination of the prime numbers and the Fibonacci Sequence. In fact, the prime
numbers might be a combination of two or more other sequences in this manner,
for all I know. 1/4/2005 Justin Coslor Notes from the book "Connections: The
Geometric Bridge Between Art and Science" + some ideas. In a meeting with Nehru
in India in 1958 he said "The problem of a comprehensive design science is to
isolate specific instances of the pattern of a general, cosmic energy system
and turn these to human use." The topic of design science was started by
architect, designer, and inventor Buckminster Fuller. The chemical physicist
Arthur Loeb, who considers design science to be the grammar of space. Buy that
book, as well as the book "The Undecidable" by Martin Davis. Chemist Istvan
Hergittai edited two large books on symmetry. He also edits the journals
"symmetry" and "space structures" where I could submit my paper on the geometry
of prime numbers and patterns in composite partition coloring structures.
*Also, send it to Physical Science Review to solicit scientific applications of
my discovery. Send it to some math journals too. Again, the paper I want to
write is called "Patterns in prime composite partition coloring structures",
and it will be based on that journal entry I had about symmetrically dividing
up a circle into partitions, then labeling the alternating patterns in the
symmetries using individual colors for each primary pattern in the stack,
similar to that game "The Tower of Hanoi". Study the writings of Thales
(Teacher of Pythagoras), who is known as the father of Greek mathematics,
astronomy, and philosophy, and who visited Egypt to learn its secrets
[Turnbull, 1961 "The Great Mathematicians], [Gorman, 1979 Pythagoras - A Life]
---------------------------- Connections page 11. Figure 1.7 The Ptolemaic
scale based on the primes 2, 3, and 5. C=1, D=8/9, E=4/5, F=3/4, G=2/3, A=3/5,
B=8/15, C=1/2. ------------------------- Figure 1.6 The Pythagorean scale
derived from the primes 2 and 3: C=1, space=8/9, D=8/9, space=8/9, E=64/81,
space=243/256, F=3/4, space=8/9, G=2/3, space=8/9, A=16/27, space=8/9, B=128/
243, space=243/256, C\\\'=1/2, space=8/9, D\\\'=4/9, space=8/9, E\\\'=32/81, space=243/
256, F\\\'=3/8, space=8/9, G\\\'=1/3, space=8/9, A\\\'=8/27, space=8/9, B\\\'=64/243, space
=243/256, C"=1/4. ----------------- *1/4/2005 Project: Someday try writing an
electronic music song that makes vivid use of parallel mathematical algorithms
based on the prime numbers, actually come to think of it, this concept was
presented in an episode of Star Trek Voyager. ---------------------------- 8/26
/2004 Justin Coslor Notes (pg. 1) These are my notes on three papers
contributed to the MIT Encyclopedias of Cognitive Science by Wilfried Sieg in
July 1997: Report CMU-PHIL-79, Philosophy, Methodology, Logic. Pittsburgh,
Pennsylvania 15213-3890. - Formal Systems - Church Turing Thesis - Godel\\\'s
Theorems -------------------------------- Notes on Wilfried Sieg\\\'s "Properties
of Formal Systems" paper: Euclid\\\'s Elements -> axiomatic-deductive method.
Formal Systems = "Mechanical" regimentation of the inference steps along with
only syntactic statements described in a precise symbolic language and a
logical calculus, both of which must be recursive (by the Church-Turing
Thesis). Meaning Formal Systems use just the syntax of symbolic word statements
(not their meaning), recursive logical calculus, and recursive symbolic
definitions of each word. Frege in 1879: "a symbolic language (with relations
and quantifiers)" + an adequate logical calculus -> the means for the
completely formal representation of mathematical proofs. Fregean frame ->
mathematical logic ->Whitehead & Russell\\\'s "Principia Mathematica" ->
metamathematical perspective <- Hilbert\\\'s "Grundlagen der Geometrie" 1899
*metamathematical perspective -> Hilbert& Bernays "Die Prizipien der
Mathematik" lectures 1917- 1918 -> first order logic = central language + made
a suitable logical calculus. Questions raised: Completeness, consistency,
decidability. Still active. Lots of progress has been made in these areas since
then. **Hilbert & Bernays "Die Prizipien der Mathematik" lectures 1917-1918 ->
mathematical logic. Kinds of completeness: Quasi-empirical completeness of
Zermelo Fraenkel set theory, syntactic completeness of formal theories, and
semantic completeness = all statements true in all models. - Sentential logic
proved complete by Hilbert and Bernays (1918) and Post (1921). - First order
logic proved complete by Godel (1930). "If every finite subset of a system has
a model, so does the systems." But first order logic has some non-standard
models. Hilbert\\\'s Entsheidungsproblem proved undecidable by Church & Turing. It
was the decision problem for first order logic. So the "decision problem"
proved undecidable, but it lead to recursion theoretic complexity of sets,
which lead to classification of 1. arithmetical, 2. hyper-arithmetical, and 3.
analytical hierarchies. It later lead to computational complexity classes. So
they couldn\\\'t prove what could be decided in first order logic, but they could
classify the complexity of modes of computation using first order logic. ---In
first order logic, one can classify the empirical and computational complexity
of syntactic configurations whose formulas and proofs are effectively decidable
by a Turing Machine. I\\\'m not positive about this next part. ...but, such
syntactic configurations (aka software that eventually halts) are considered to
be formed systems. In other words, ,one cannot classify the empirical and
computational complexity of software that never halts (or hasn\\\'t halted), using
first order logic. The Entsheidungsproblem (First order logic Decision Problem)
resulted in model theory, proof theory, and computability thoery. It required
"effective methods" of decision making to be precisely defined. Or rather, it
required effective methods of characterizing what could or couldn\\\'t be decided
in first-order logic. The proof of the completeness theorem resulted in the
relativity of "being countable" which in turn resulted in the Skolem paradox.
***I believe that paradoxes only occur when the context of a logic is
incomplete or when it\\\'s foundations scope is not broad enough. Semantic
arguments in geometry yielded "Relative Consistency Proofs". Hilbert used
"finitist means" to establish the consistency of formal systems. Ackerman, von
Neumann, and Herbrand used a very restricted induction principle to establish
the consistency of number theory. Modern proof theory used "constructivist"
means to prove significant parts of analysis. Insights have been gained into
the "normal form" of proofs in sequent and natural deduction calculi. So they
all wanted to map the spectrum of unbreakable reason. Godel firmly believed
that the term "formal system\\\' or \\\'formalism\\\' should never be used for anything
but software that halts. ------------------------------------- 9/1/2004 Justin
Coslor Notes on Wilfried Sieg\\\'s "Church-Turing Thesis" paper: Church re-defined
the term "effective calculable function" (of positive integers) with the
mathematically precise term "recursive function". Kleen used the term
"recursive" in "Introduction to Metamathematics, in 1952. Turing independently
suggested identifying "effectively calculable functions" as functions whose
values can be computed (mechanically) using a Turing Machine.Turing & Church\\\'s
theses were, in effect, equivalent, and so jointly they are referred to as the
Church-Turing Thesis. Metamathematics takes formally presented theories as
objects of mathematical study (Hilbert 1904), and it\\\'s been pursued since the
1920\\\'s, which led to precisely characterizing the class of effective
procedures, which led to the Entsheidungsproblem, which was solved negatively
relative to recursion (****but what about for non-recursive systems?).
Metamathematics also led to Godel\\\'s Incompleteness Theorems (1931), which apply
to all formal systems, like type theory of Principia Mathematica or
Zermalo-Fraenkel Set Theory, etc. Effective Computability: So it seems like
they all wanted infallable systtems (formal systems), and the were convinced
that the way to get there required a precise definition of effective
calculability. Church and Kleen thought it was equivalent to
lambda-definability, and later prove that lambda-definability is equivalent to
recursiveness (1935-1936). Turing thought effective calculability could be
defined as anything that can be calculated on a Turing Machine (1936). Godel
defined the concept of a (general) recursive function using an equational
calculus, but was not convinced that all effectively calculable functions would
fall under it. Post (*my favorite definition...*) in 1936 made a model that is
strikingly similar to Turing\\\'s, but didn\\\'t provide any analysis in support of
the generality of his model. But Post did suggest verifying formal theories by
investigating ever wider formulations and reducing them to his basic
formulation. He considered this method of identifying/defining effectively
calculable functions as a working hypothesis. Post\\\'s method is strikingly
similar to my friend Andrew J. Dougherty\\\'s thesis of artificial intelligence,
which is that at a certain point, the compactness of a set of functions is
maximized through optimization and at that point, the complexity of their
informational content plateaus, unless you keep adding new functions. So his
solution to Artificial Intelligence is to assimilate all of the known useful
functions in the world, and optimize them to the plateau point of complexity
(put the information in lowest terms), and to then use that condensed
information set/tool in exploring for new functions to add, so that the rich
depth of the problem solving and information seeking technology can continually
improve past any plateau points. (in 1939) Hilbert and Bernays showed that
deductively formalized functions require that their proof predicates to be
primitive recursive. Such "reconable" functions are recursive and can be
evaluated in a very restricted number of theoretic formalism. Godel emphasized
that provability and definability depend on the formalism considered. Godel
also emphasized that recursiveness or computability have an absoluteness
property not shared by provability or definability, and other metamathematical
notions. My theory is a bottom-up approach for pattern discovery and adaptive
reconceptualization between the domains of different contexts, and can provide
the theoretical framework for abdicative reaasoning, necessary for the
application of my friend Andrew J. Dougherty\\\'s thesis. Perhaps my theories
could be abdicatively formalized? My theories do not require empiricism
(deduction), to produce new elements that are primitive-recursive to produce
new elements that are primitive-recursive (circular-reasoning-based/symbolic/
repetition-based) predicates to be used in building and calculating statements
and structures, that can add new information. To me, "meaning" implies having
an "appreciation" for the information and functions and relations, at least in
part; and that this "appreciation" is obtained through recognition of the
information (and functions\\\' and relations\\\') utility or relative utility via use
or simulation experience within partially- defined contexts. I say
"partially-defined" contexts because by Godel\\\'s Incompleteness Theorems, an
all-encompassing ultimate context cannot be completely defined since the
definition itself (and it\\\'s definer would have to be part of that context,
which isn\\\'t possible because it would have to be infinitely recursive and thus
never fully representable. Turing invented a mechanical method for operating
symbolically. His invention\\\'s concepts provided the mechanical means for
running simulations. Andrew J. Dougherty and I have created the concepts for
mechanically creating new simulations to run until all possible simulations
that can be created in good intention, that are helpful and fair for all,
exceeds the number of such programs that can be possibly used in all of
existence, in all time frames forever, God willing. Turing was a uniter not a
divider and he demanded immediate recognizability of symbolic configurations,
so that basic computation steps need not be further subdivided. *But there are
limitations in taking input at face value. Sieg in 19944, inspired by Turing\\\'s
1936 paper formulated the following boundedness conditions and locality
limitations of computors: (B.1) there is a fixed bound for the number of
symbolic configurations a computor can immediately recognize; (B.2) there is a
fixed bound for the number of a computor\\\'s internal states that need to be
taken into account; -- therefore he can carry out only finitely many different
operations. These operations are restricted by the following locality
conditions: (L.1) only elements of observed configurations can be changed.
(L.2) the computor can shift his attention from one symbolic configuration to
another only if the second is within a bounded distance from the first. *Humans
are capable of more than just mechanical processes.
---------------------------------- Notes on Wilfried Sieg\\\'s "Godel\\\'s Theorems"
paper: Kurt Godel established a number of absolutely essential facts: -
completeness of first order logic - relative consistency of the axiom of choice
- generalized continuum hypothesis - (And relevant to the foundations of
mathematics:) *His two Incompleteness Theorems (a.k.a. Godel\\\'s Theorems. In the
early 20th century dramatic development of logic in the context of deep
problems in the foundations in mathematics provided for the first time the
means to reflect mathematical practice in formal theories. 1. - One question
asked was: "Is there a formal theory such that mathematical truth is co-
extensive with provability in that theory?" (Possibly... See Russell\\\'s type
theory P of Principia Mathematica and axiomatic set theory as formulated by
Zermelo...) - From Hilbert\\\'s research around 1920 another question emerged: 2.
"Is the consistency of mathematics in its formalized presentation provable by
restricted mathematical, so-called finitist means? *To summarize informally: 1.
Is truth co-extensive with provability? 2. Is consistency provable by finitist
means? Godel proved the second question to be negative for the case of
formalizably finitist means. Godel\\\'s Incompleteness theorems: - If P is
consistent (thus recursive), then there is a sentence sigma in the language of
P, such that neither sigma nor its negation not-sigma is provable in P. Sigma
is thus independent of P. (Is sigma the dohnut hole of reason that fits into
the center of the circular reasoning (into the center of, but independent from
the recursion)?) - If P is consistent, then cons, the statement in the language
of P that expresses the consistency of P, is not provable in P. Actually
Godel\\\'s second theorem claims the unprovability of that second (meta)
mathematical meaningful statement noted on pg. 7. Godel\\\'s first incompleteness
theorem\\\'s purpose is to actually demonstrate that some syntactically true
statements can be semantically false. He possibly did this to show that formal
theories are not adequate by themselves to fully describe true knowledge, at
least with knowledge that is represented by numbers, that is. It illustrates
how it is possible to lie with numbers. In other words, syntax and semantics
are mutually exclusive, and Godel\\\'s second Incompleteness Theorem demonstrates
that. In other words the symbolically representative nature of language makes
it possible to lie and misinterpret. Godel liked to explain how every
consistently formal system that contains a certain amount of number theory can
be rigorously proven to contain undecidably arithmetical propositions,
including proving that the consistency of systems within such a system is
non-demonstratable; and that this can all be proven using a Turing Machine.
Godel thought "the human mind (even within the realm of pure mathematics)
infinitely surpasses the power of any finite machine." **But what about
massively parallel Quantum supercomputers? Keep in mind the boundary and
limitation conditions that Sieg noted in his Church-Turing Thesis paper of
dimensional minds in relatable timelines... (Computors). 8/26/2004 Justin
Coslor Concepts that I\\\'ll need to study to better understand logic and
computation: Readings: Euclid\\\'s Elements Principia Mathematica Completeness:
quasi-empirical completeness, syntactic completeness, semantic completeness
consistency decidability recursion theoretic complexity of sets classification
hierarchies computational complexity classes modes of computation model theory
proof theory computability theory relative consistency proofs consistency of
formal systems consistency of number theory modern proof theory constructivist
proofs semantic arguments in geometry analysis sequent and natural deduction
calculi recursive functions Metamathematics Type Theory Zermelo-Fraenkel Set
Theory effective computability Lambda-definability investigating ever-wider
formulations primitive recursive proof predicates provability and definability
meaning: [11/11/2004 Justin Coslor -- Meaning depends on goal-subjective
relative utility. In other words, Experience leading up to perspective filters
and perspective relational association buffers.] utility and relative utility
simulation deductively formalized functions boundedness conditions locality
limitations formalizably finitist means choice, continuum, foundations syntax &
semantics incompleteness undecidable arithmetical propositions hierarchies:
arithmetical, hyper-arithmetical (is hyper-arithmetical where all of the nodes\\\'
relations are able to be retranslated to the perspective of any particular
node?), and analytical hierarchies hierarchical complexity computational
complexity Graph Theory Knowledge Representation Epistemology Pattern Search,
Recognition, Storage, and retrieval Appreciation ---------------- Book IV:
Invention Ideas ---------------- 10/28/2004 Justin Coslor Penny Universities I
read in an article on the Internet that coffee houses used to be called "Penny
Universities" in the mid 1600\\\'s in England, because it cost a penny for
admission and a mug of coffee. "TIPS" is an acronym that was posted on a tin at
the counter, which stood for "To Insure Prompt Service", and people would toss
in a coin as a perk. It was a brilliant idea when the main branch of the
Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh (nested between Carnegie Mellon University and
the University of Pittsburgh) opened a coffee shop and free Internet access
terminals this year in their library (terminals have been in place for several
years). Their renovations are beautiful! Copyright 1/1/2005 Justin Coslor
Inspiring book & some art product ideas. I\\\'ve been reading the most amazing
book called "Connections: The Geometric Bridge Between Art and Science" ISBN:
0-07-034250-4, and it\\\'s inspired me to want to read more books on the topic of
Design Science. On page 264-265 of it it talks about the duality of Platonic
polyhedra: namely The Inscribed Sphere. face<->vertex edge<->edge p<->q Face
centroids of each platonic polyhedra are also vertex points for their duals,
and so they lie equidistant from a common center. These pages in it talk also
talk about Duality, in some of it\\\'s various forms: 1. in Bartk\\\'s music - 103
2. of maps - 125-127 3. of regular tilings - 177 4. of semiregular tilings -
181-182 5. of reciprocal figure - 224-230 6. of Platonic solids - 264-268 7.
interpreting duals - 266-267 8. of convex polyhedra - 291-292 9. interpreting
duals - 299-301 10. of Archimedean solids - 335-337 11. interpreting duals -
351 12. of networks - 362-368, 370-371 13. isometric vector matrix (IVM dual) -
370-371 ------------------------------------ Product Idea #1: Copyright 1/1/
2005 Justin Coslor ERASABLE DOT MATRIX SKETCH PADS WITH AN ASSORTMENT OF
VANISHING POINTS, AND THEIR CROSS-PLATFORM DO-IT-YOURSELF COMPUTER SOFTWARE
EQUIVALENT, FOR 3D PERSPECTIVE DRAWING Here is a product idea I came up with
today. *Look at figure 6.A.2 in the book "Projective Geometry" (pg. 248-253)
That picture inspired the following idea. Here\\\'s a computer product I could
sell both in computer form, and in paper form as an artists canvas tool: make a
3D dotted line matrix that has vanishing points along multiple parallel
horizontal lines so artists can draw realistically spacial drawings. The dots
close up are the biggest, and the dots get smaller and smaller the farther into
the background you look. Then the artist can use those dots to realistically
model 3D spacial representations on the paper, and when they have their sketch
done they can just erase the dots, because the dots can be lightly printed on
the page using erasable ink or erasable graphite. It\\\'d cost fractions of a cent
to print out each page of this kind of drawing paper, and the paper could come
in a variety of perspectives of vanishing point angles. It\\\'d be a great product
to sell archive-quality drawing pads full of an assortment 3D dot matrix
vanishing point angles printed on nice white drawing paper. On the cover of
each pad there should also be a website address for where to download or order
art software such as a software version of these different matrix patterns that
a person can print out onto a page in very very light print (so light that it
won\\\'t show up on a photocopy machine duplicate). Have some screenshots and a
brochure-like visual demonstration and minimum system requirements shown on an
advertisement page of how to use the software, and have that advertisement page
as the first page of the sketch pads that get sold in stores all over the
world. On the software brochure page (note, make the advertisement double-sided
and on a perforated tear-out page that is scored for easy folding into the
shape of a brochure, and use the UPC symbol as a discount coupon for $5 off of
the the price of the software, when ordered online or through the mail. Include
a self-addressed envelope and software payment form that can be torn out on the
next page. I\\\'d likely sell lots of software that way. On the brochure, suggest
that they draw their lines on the computer paper lightly dotted matrix
perspectives by hand, and that they should then either scan the page back into
the computer and run it through a filter to take out the dots, or photocopy the
original to take out the dots, since computer printer ink isn\\\'t erasable. This
way, they wouldn\\\'t need to run to the store to buy new pads of paper. I think
both of these products would be a fantastic product to sell all over the world,
and I could probably get a patent on the pads. I don\\\'t agree with the notion of
software patents though. I\\\'d probably write the software using the Java3D API
so that it\\\'s cross-platform. ---------------------------------- Product Idea #
2: Copyright 1/1/2005 Justin Coslor N-DIMENSIONAL POLYHEDRAL MOTIF DESIGNING
SOFTWARE FOR ARTISTS First look at some writings by the mathematician artists
from the fifteenth century, such as: Alberti, Leonardo da Vinci, and Albrecht
Drer. Then write a little computer software that makes N-dimensional
polyhedral motifs (fundamental patterns) and lets the user design their own and
use them as wallpaper and skins for 3D objects. So people can make M.C.
Escher-like artwork easily. It\\\'ll deal with symmetry design and manipulation
very easily. Copyright 1/15/2005 Justin Coslor Art Software For Making
Symmetrical Design Patterns & Motifs: Write a computer graphics software that
allows the user to make precise symmetry design patterns and to be able to
color and shade in the sections with the greatest of ease. It could also be
good for making repeatable interlocking motifs. Copyright 1/1/2005 Justin
Coslor Perspective Drawing Projects When I first wrote this I was reading the
book "Basic Perspective" by Robert W. Gill - Library of Congress Card Number
79-64518. 1. Try drawing a top view of an object and draw a circle of frames
(Boxes) around it, and in each box draw the 3D perspective side-view of the
object as it would look to a person standing on a point in the center of each
frame at that particular frame\\\'s perspective angle, where each frame is a 3D
perspective drawing, complete with accurate shading. 2. Draw a 3D perspective
drawing form the viewpoint of a cat, and include the cat\\\'s nose, whiskers and
the tip of it\\\'s tail in the drawing. Include special lighting and coloring
effects such as how the scene would look if it was a snapshot from the lens of
a Kirlian photography camera, as cats see a different spectrum of colors than
people, and possibly auras. Copyright 1-13-98 by Justin Coslor Robotics If one
robot figures something out about it\\\'s surroundings it goes and tells the rest,
that makes available more potential actions that the rest can do and have to
work with and use as a tool. When one solves a problem it eliminates an
obstacle which each robot would otherwise have to spend its time figuring out
how to do because it communicates the solution. Example application: new, more
efficient route planner. They could even learn teamwork too. If one robot
solves part of a problem, but knows that the whole thing isn\\\'t solved and wants
to completely solve it but not waste all day working on it, it can go and tell
the other robots about the whole problem (denoting the part they\\\'ve already
solved) instead of just telling them part of the solution that they\\\'ve solved.
It would also tell the other robots the estimated "worth" (personal and
societal ... sort of like a priority rating) of getting the problem completely
solved. In a sense it "asks" the others for help. If the requested action\\\'s
estimated priority is higher than the current actions priority rating, then the
robots will go and help (fulfill the request) and in a sense perform a "favor"
thus the robot in need would be making some "friends".
------------------------------------------------ Fundamental motivations: #1
stimulate/reinforce self (work towards own goals). #2 stimulate/reinforce
others. The robot might stimulate/reinforce itself in order to stimulate/
reinforce others, but not quite as much as stimulating or reinforcing itself
directly, and it works on a "friends" and "favors" system socially. Do a favor
and they are grateful and they are your friend (and doing #2 on a friend is
equal to doing #1 and it is a random choice between the two when in question --
when asked to return a favor for a friend or do something for yourself). Each
robot knows that it can do more faster with friends helping, so if it has
something it needs help with or is bored it might think ahead and stop what it
is doing and go out and get some friends by doing favors for some others and
then later go and ask everyone for help. It would ask even those who aren\\\'t
friends because some of them may help and after a few exchanges of favors with
them, they too might become friends. With a small group (approximately six
robots), in order to have any of then get any of their own stuff done you must
either build a "friend removal" system, where robots are no longer considered a
friend after a certain amount of rejections and they return to the neutral
"stranger" state from the perspective of the rejected robots. Later they could
easily go back into friend state though, or else have a system of higher
ignorance of the friend state rather than a 50% favoring rate, or just have it
so that they would only help a friend in an emergency or on major projects
(remember, these are robots, not people)... Although, with only six robots it
may work out to have the standard friend/favor system without these
restrictions. So in summary, these robots would be socially interacting
communicating and sharing discovered knowledge in search of attaining their
goals. They need to be able to set goals then strive toward them, and interact;
and their goals should reflect what they are programmed to "like" and
"dislike". Their own self-discovered "likes" and "dislikes" should always be
required to be checked by multiple qualified human operators before being
allowed to be implemented. In other words all they need are three things: 1.
the ability to set and strive towards goals (immediate and long term near
future), 2. have a motivation system (know the sensory inputs and actions that
it likes and dislikes), 3. and have a justification system (possibly a
self-modifying justification system based around a few rules and restrictions
like Isaac Asimov\\\'s three laws of robotics)... A justification system is just a
way of doing things based on one\\\'s own system of what is believed to be
logical, which is based on experience and the motivation/goal system, and
checked by external justification systems. These three elements are the roots
of intelligent behavior. Any actions of any intelligent system/life-form can be
accounted for by these three things. Copyright 1-13-98 by Justin Coslor
Copyright 8/27/2004 Justin Coslor Video Game Idea Have a digital camera +
software computer or video game system that digitizes the person\\\'s physical
movements, and incorporates those motions into the software or game system.
Such as a game that taught people martial arts or some exercise thing.
Copyright 2/8/2005 Justin Coslor. All Rights Reserved. Portable Operating
Systems On Cross-Platform USB 2.0 Flash-Memory Devices This is the wave of the
future in portable cross-platform operating systems. It occurred to me today
while I was drinking coffee and reading a graphical book on How Computer\\\'s
Work. Design a USB 2.0 flash-memory device that only communicates using
standard USB 2.0 protocols, and they would have their own software on the
flash-memory that would take over the video card temporarily and have their own
operating system that would load up as soon as you plug in the flash-memory
card, and that operating system would be able to be minimized into the corner
of the screen into a little icon, and that operating system could access all of
the hardware resources of the computer, as well as all of it\\\'s software
directories (using standard USB 2.0 protocols). In this manner an operating
system such as Linux could be instantly loaded onto any USB 2.0 compatible
computer, and it could perform cross-platform functions between its own
operating system and the operating system on the hard drive, all via the
independent controller drivers that were loaded into the re-initialized
temporarily modified BIOS and boot record the instant you plugged the
flash-memory device into the USB 2.0 port. *So it would make a new video card
operating system as the primary root operating system. Basically, the BIOS just
gets re-initialized while the hard drive\\\'s operating system is running, but
this time it sends special instructions to the video card to force it to buffer
two (or more) operating systems transparently on top of each other, so that the
user can switch back and forth between them while still seeing the other
operating system(s) in the background, and either one can then be minimized
into a window or icon in the corner of the screen and the mouse and keyboard
could still control all of them (such as to maximize one of the operating
system icons or windows) using the video card\\\'s new operating system that was
instantly loaded off of the flash-memory card through the temporarily
modification and reinitialization of the BIOS of the computer -- the moment you
plugged in the USB 2.0 flash memory card. As soon as you unplug the
flash-memory card, the computer\\\'s plug&play BIOS could unload the video card\\\'s
operating system and the computer hard drive\\\'s original operating system would
return to normal. Also, since USB 2.0 has its own universal standards, if
multiple flash memory operating systems (different kinds) were all plugged in
simultaneously, the video card\\\'s operating system would just treat them all
like icons on a desktop that can be maximized with a click, or minimized with a
keystroke, or turned into a movable window that can be stacked on top of or
under any or all of the other operating systems that aren\\\'t minimized. Also,
another keystroke would switch between operating systems as though they were
windows and which ever operating system is on top is the primary active one so
that they get layered like a stack. The video card\\\'s operating system can have
"save screenshot to"/"print screenshot"/"copy"/"paste"/"save to" features that
can be cross-platform tools that become available when you move the mouse over
an object or highlight some text, or make a selection box with the mouse --
then hold down the control key as you click the mouse button. This sort of
simple set of cross-platform functionality shouldn\\\'t need to take up more than
one mouse click\\\'s menu\\\'s worth of selection choices. This might need to be
implemented in the USB 3.0 specification, whenever that comes out, if it can\\\'t
currently be done using the USB 2.0 specification. Copyright 2/8/2005 Justin
Coslor. All Rights Reserved. Copyright 7/17/2005 Justin Coslor Nanotechnology
(see picture) Have a nanotechnology cell composed of seven cubes linked
together by hinges in a dense unit. Electromagnets on each cube can pull each
hinge closed or push it open, and electromagnets on the ends and sides of each
block can connect multiple structures like this together, and can connect loose
dead blocks from an interconnected storage clump to the central power supply
because terminals are on the ends of each face that is diagonally across from
the sub-block\\\'s hinge. There is a micro-controller in the center block of each
cell for intelligence, control and orientation calculation, and communications
network relaying, and there is a port that links to this this micro-controller
on each outward facing face. These cellular structures would be very small and
could link together to form robotic systems that are reconfigurable and
adaptable. A similar robotic system exists, but like my design *much* better.
The hinges could elastically be fixed at various angles between fully open and
fully closed by repelling the block from both sides, at an adjustable ratio of
power being fed to the opposing electromagnets. In that way the blocks could
also act as touch sensors, and flex sensors, and springs and solenoids, and
precisely adjustable angled hinges. There could be lots of different shapes of
cellular parts for making things, like planks, rods, hinges, plates, bearings,
angle units, etc. with electromagnets and/or electromagnetic hinges on the ends
and/or face plates. A vision system would be on the external control module,
and could be linked to the cellular network directly or by remote control.
Everything about the block structure would be automatically calculated and
added to the internal representation of the unit\\\'s state model, which can be
communicated from block to block on the network of linked structures sos that
blocks linked in a storage clump can be reoriented and moved about, and whole
multicellular structures can be relocated as a group. The cells would talk to
each other so that they know where they are in the orientation system, and the
controller would have the big picture so that it could tell the cells what to
do on the fly. Each group of cells could then pool its computing power to run
subroutine programs as multicellular unit. Copyright 7/12/2005 Justin Coslor
Product idea: seed kits for suburban gardens One way to make a product is to
package several things together in the form of a kit. One such kit that would
sell well in stores and be easy to make would be seed kits for people to plant
a vegetable garden or flower garden in their yard. It could contain a wide
variety of seeds organized inside a divider box with a little container full of
seeds in each section of the divider box, where each row is a growing season
(plants that grow best in a certain season will be grouped together by row);
and each container will be labeled with the name, expiration date, growing
season, and ideal soil pH. The kit will come with a soil tester and will
recommend certain plant fertilizers, such as Miracle Grow to change the pH.
There will be a color instruction manual with photos of each plant and seed,
and it\\\'ll have some drawing space where they can design the layout of their
garden, and an example will be given. The manual will have gardening tips for
growing each plant. Also there should be a coupon for a discount off of a
Garden Claw hand-powered rototiller tool. There should also be a website
address where people can communicate in topical forums and post pictures of
their flowers and vegetables from the kit for other people to see. The website
should also have a comment/suggestion form to help improve the product. These
would be sold in major chain stores, small shops, plant stores, hardware
stores, and maybe even grocery stores all across America, and maybe even
abroad. There could be several varieties of kits, and the seeds would last for
several years, and seeds from the plants that were planted can then be put into
those same containers to stay organized for the next year. We\\\'d specialize in
perennials especially, and would only use seeds that can generate offspring of
their own, to help combat evil genetic engineering companies like Monsanto, who
produces seeds that grow into sterile or seedless plants. Copyright 7/12/2005
Justin Coslor Bottled Water With the latest craze of bottled water companies, I
could start my own entrepreneurial venture: River Water - "From the Ghangi to
the Nile!" Ocean Water - "A mix of the seven seas.", "Aaargh!" Nuclear Power
Plant Cooling Tower Water - "It\\\'s energizing!" Run Off - "Mexico City\\\'s
finest.", "Free heavy metal test strip included." Sleuce Juice - "Just like
Star Trek -- it\\\'s recycled!" Red Tide - "Be a man!", "Nature in a can!" Dead
Sea Colloidal Brew - "Free Bible included!" Copyright 6/29/2005 Justin Coslor
Camping Stuff You can make a make-shift backpack made out of a sheet: 1. Start
out with a sheet. 2. Fold the sheet in half to make the pocket. 3. Tie the two
adjacent corners on each side of the sheet into a knot to make the arm-hole
shoulder straps. 4. There\\\'s a big pocket in the back with an opening on the
top. It\\\'s a one-pocket backpack. (See Diagram)
---------------------------------- A simple four stick shelter can be made from
a tarp or parachute, some rope, and some sticks that are lodges securely in the
ground. Tie rope around in a square with an "X" in it on the tops of the
sticks, this will help support the tarp. The corners of the tarp should be tied
to the bottom of each of the four sticks so that it doesn\\\'t blow away. The top
of the shelter can be used to collect rainwater or dew. If you have a clear
tarp this makes a great big solar still. A black tarp under a white tarp will
keep you cool. To enter or exit the shelter just lift up and edge and crawl in
or untie one corner and go in that way. Prop a stick under one edge to make a
breathing hole. (See Diagram) Copyright 6/29/2005 Justin Coslor Cooling Shirt
The simplest way to make a cooling shirt would be to have a stretchy tee-shirt
crossed with a fishing vest (for the extra pockets), and have water pockets all
over it, connected by a tube (or not, in case one leaks), and make the pockets
out of a kind of plastic that breathes moisture through the plastic\\\'s pores, so
that the evaporation keeps the water cold, and since the pockets are up against
your skin, you stay cool as a result. It\\\'d be very simple that way and wouldn\\\'t
require electricity, and there could be a rubber tube at the bottom with a
valve on it so that you can drink the water right out of the cooling shirt
you\\\'re wearing. This would GREAT for use in hot climates, especially in
combination with water purification tablets, and there needs to be a simple
system for cleaning the vest such as filling it with hot salt water and letting
it sit for a few minutes. Copyright 6/27/2005 Justin Coslor Dune Shirt (See
Diagram) Engineer a still suit/dune shirt for staying cool. It would look like
a cross between a fishing vest and a tee-shirt, with some attachments. It would
have a water reservoir, a pump, tubes, bladders, and a rechargeable battery
pack to run the pump. The battery pack could be recharged by a solar- power
photovoltaic umbrella that could be held by the wearer to provide shade (it
might even have a little fan inside it). The solar-power photovoltaic umbrella
could also be made so that it could be clipped onto a backpack so that the
wearer has both hands free. If the pump is to be mechanically powered, it might
be powered by ratcheting a spring and small vertical flywheel by swinging your
arms back and forth. In that case, there might be a sort of exoskelleton that
clips a a thing onto each arm just above each elbow, and connecting it to an
exo-ribcage structure for support and making the mechanical energy transfer.
Copyright 6/29/2005 Justin Coslor Alternative Energy System for homes that have
an acre or more. Have habitat and employment and food/water/coffee procurement
for modern migrators. That\\\'s a different topic though... Live near the coast
because it doesn\\\'t freeze there, and you can eat fish and seafood. Build a yurt
by the ocean and use wind power or tidal power to purify water and provide
electricity. Hip waders, sweatpants, wool socks, and a fishing pole are
essential, + a waterproof raincoat and a sweater. Have a large greenhouse
garden and do hydroponics. Just have a farm with a fantastic garden, orchard,
and berry bushes. Map out what grows in what seasons and in what soil
conditions, and terraform the land into the ideal form. Maybe even use terraces
and build a huge solar oven and use photovoltaics and wind turbines, but
instead of using batteries to store the energy generated (since batteries are
toxic), use water as an energy storage mechanism, either in the form of doing
electrolysis and compressing the gases into tanks (which is dangerous) for
future use in fuel cells, or the safer method of pumping the water far uphill
into a reservoir or water tower out of a well or other water source, then have
a hydropower turbine to convert the down-flowing water into electrical power or
mechanical energy as needed, and it could drain right back into a well or onto
crops. For a combined alternative energy system,build a huge high water tower
and put oil drum s- rotor wind turbines all up and down it and around it, with
a car alternator connected to each one, and put photovoltaics on the roof of it
and have it situated right over top of a well or stream. Electric energy
generated by from the wind turbines and photovoltaics would be stored by
pumping water out of the well into the water tower and it can be used for
plumbing from there, or it can be used converted back into electricity by
letting the water flow out of the tower through a hydropower turbine and back
into the well, or onto the garden. You might actually get more energy out of
this than you put into it because of the hydropower dam effect that pushes the
water out with great force due to the height of the water inside the tank. Look
up plans for how to build Savonius oil drum S-rotor wind turbines. (See
diagram) Copyright 6/18/2005 Justin Coslor Pictograph books for language
adaptation. There should be a set of pictographs to use for icons for the main
functions of life in general. That way translations would be fairly simple in
whatever languages are used thousands of years from now. It would be sort of
like a visual dictionary. Actually, a new art form could be created which is
made of cartooning strips and comic books without words, and you could see how
complex and simple the concepts can get beyond what words can express, though
not always apparent to the casual observer. I don\\\'t intend for such an art to
replace written language, but merely for each artwork/book to be used as a
teaching tool for teaching people different languages, and for inventing new
languages. There would be a set of most popular (classic) books which when
combined would cover much or most of the cases of describable language and
basic experience that all people (including aliens) could reference to indicate
a word or concept. Copyright 6/18/2005 Justin Coslor Knowledge lifespans and
pictograph software We need more mechanisms to improve the quality, quantity,
clarity, simplicity, beauty, accessibility, and efficiency of knowledge that we
have available to us. Hopefully by doing so we will improve the lifespan of the
knowledge so that it may be found useful for many more generations than it is
in its current form. There may be other steps that can be taken to improve the
lifespan of public knowledge, and steps to ensure that private knowledge is in
line with public knowledge, and not in contradiction.. Pictograph software:
This relates to my pictograph book idea. Maybe a computer software could be
made that accepts stories and documents and written language in any written
language as input, and could output a vivid pictographic comic strip or
pictographic video onto the monitor or out the printer. It could also have
pointer arrows to the different aspects of the pictographs which when clicked,
says the literal translation into another language. Or, in the pictographic
movie sequence, the audio track could be in the new language at an easy
understandable pace, along with pointer arrows. Checkout Simple English:
simple.wikipedia.org. An example could be done from Simple English to
pictographs to another language. Copyright 6/16/2005 Justin Coslor Industries,
Priority Systems, and Adaptation Industries, much like the mind (or all life
for that matter), operate under the guidance of constantly-updating priority
systems. However the difference is that a given industry may be governed by the
union of a wide variety of priority systems, when a singular mind may strive to
adapt its priority system into every situation it encounters. Different systems
often have at least some different axioms, and in attempts to merge them,
sometimes axioms need to be dropped or adopted. By merging systems, they then
become more complex to adapt, but are more versatile as a result. There is much
more to an industry than supply and demand, because many variables go into and
relate to supply, and many others go into and relate to demand. Quality,
quantity available, target audience/market and their wants and needs,
manufacturing and distribution, beneficial/enjoyability rating, priority of
selling and of buying the product or service, how the product or service
affects other products or services, time-frame of use and possible likely
re-use count, etc. Basically the factors involved are the factors of merging a
new system with an existing system, and incorporating it into the priority
system. Gaining a needed capability is generally a high priority, however
taking the time and effort to analyze and learn/map out what capabilities are
needed or that would drastically improve things is generally a low priority.
Learning how to actually obtain those capabilities is an even lower priority in
many cases. However, pre-existing maps and a personal demonstration of the
value of new capabilities I\\\'ve heard gets about a 15% to 30% success rate if
done well (since people are resistant to change). Adaptation takes time, though
if you have all of the elements in the configuration you want or need right
from the start, its easier to learn that system than to learn a lesser system
and then make a paradigm shift into an adaptation of that system, because the
two can get confused and it takes more time. It\\\'s important to keep things
simple enough to prevent discouragement in any system, unless your goal is to
repel people. Copyright 6/14/2005 Justin Coslor Industry Creation In creating a
new industry one must redesign a concept or broaden a context to allow for the
existence and development of a new concept to re-route a network of
infrastructure. Some objects are anchored, others are flexible, and others can
be augmented to, or can come in quite a variety. A sub-industry can be created
by making an anchored object flexible, augmentable, or opening up a variety of
alternatives. Invent a new thing for people to do that is enjoyable and/or
beneficial and there lyes the potential for a new industry. So systematically
map out all of the things that people CAN do, and look for patterns that can be
re-applied to dependency-chart mappings of other areas. That\\\'s the analogical
approach. Also if you can solve the problem of making it possible to do
something that is needed or wanted, that\\\'s another route to a new industry. The
other approach is the experimental scientific deductive/inductive approach of
combining concepts and wiring a pattern/tool/technique/concept into the context
of another field, or even to wire many things together into what will be a
novel unique context that meets the simple criteria of being beneficial and/or
enjoyable. The other criteria is that it should be sustainable and non-harmful
to people and the environment. The possibilities for the creation of niche
markets is only limited by people\\\'s initiative and creativity. Criteria for new
industries: 1. Novel/unique/worthwhile 2. Beneficial/enjoyable 3. Sustainable
4. Non-harmful to people Copyright 5/27/2005 Justin Coslor Natural Gas Mining
in Landfills, Using Grids of Vertical Bamboo Tubes Since someone figured out
that you can collect methane gas by sticking tubes into landfills vertically,
maybe they could save some money and materials by using bamboo tubes since
they\\\'re very strong, and they could drill some holes into the part of the tube
that goes below the surface, to collect extra gas from the sides. Then they
could push the bamboo tubes down until they\\\'re less than 1 foot above the
surface, and space them out about 3 feet apart in a grid, and above the
surface, have re-usable plastic or rubber caps with rubber or PVC tubes
connecting the bamboo tubes to horizontal pipelines, much like a computer RAM
memory array structure, and there could be a safety valve on each row. Then,
when the output is really low from the methane supply being depleted, they
could just stack another 5-10 feet of garbage over the pipeline field after
first removing the top caps & pipeline grid on the surface, and they could do
it all over again with new bamboo tubes since the other ones would eventually
rot and bamboo grows so easily. Maybe use timber bamboo. Also, it may be
possible to grow bamboo forests over landfills, along with non- THC hemp plants
as underbrush for rope and cloth, since they\\\'re both really hardy useful weeds.
Copyright 5/27/2005 Justin Coslor 3-Legged Walking Robot (It Gallops) The
middle leg has a knee and a duck foot for stability, and it jumps through two
spider legs that each have a knee and are angled wide for stability. When the
duck foot is in back it bends or ratchets the knee (which could cock a spring),
and then it rapidly straightens it out to perform the jump, then cocks the knee
again in mid-jump as it passes between the two spider legs, and makes a
controlled fall onto the duck leg, which is now in front. The spider legs make
a similar motion to get in front too, except the spider legs do the turning. To
turn, one of the spider legs just bends more than the other one, or pushes
harder than the other one. It could even pull a cart. These things could be
smoothly hopping along all over the place, and could be made very small or even
very large. It could even climb up stairs too, and might even be able to go
down stairs (carefully). Copyright 3/16/2005 Justin Coslor MAGNETOSONIC ELEMENT
SEPARATOR Have six walls separate walls, each one individually attached to it\\\'s
own robotic manipulator arm, so that the robotic arms can clamp the walls into
the shape of a cube. Two of the walls, both opposite to each other, are to be
lined with ferromagnetic electromagnets. Two of the walls, both on opposite
sides, are to be lined with paramagnetic electromagnets. The remaining two
walls are to be lined with diamagnetic electromagnets. Before the top wall (the
lid) is put on, rocks and raw ore are to be dumped inside. In two opposite
diagonal corners there are some fiberoptics units connected on long cords to
digital CCD observation cameras. Each of the remaining corners is to have a
sonic cannon mounted in it beamed at the wall diagonally across from it. Then
all of electromagnets are to be turned on, as well as all of the sonic cannons,
and so, all of the rocks and ore inside will be obliterated by the sonic
cannons into powder, and then magnetically drawn to the wall that it is
molecularly attracted to by the various kinds of electromagnets. Then the
robotic arms will take the cube apart and dump each wall\\\'s contents into its
own melting pot or storage container for further chemical separation or
polymerization. This can be a very efficient way to process materials. Here
I\\\'ve labeled the sonic cannon-mounted corners using the letters A through F:
A->side 1 = electroferromagnetic north plate B->side 2 = electroferromagnetic
south plate C->side 3 = electroparamagnetic positive plate D->side 4 =
electroparamagnetic negative plate E->side 5 = electrodiamagnetic negative
plate F->side 6 = electrodiamagnetic positive plate. The remaining two corners
are the fiberoptic view-ports. Anything that isn\\\'t magnetic at all also just
gets dumped in its own vat. Copyright 1/7/2005 Justin Coslor Diamagnetic
Electromagnets {Diamagnetic materials: water, salt, pyrolytic graphite,
bismuth, etc.} When you pass a magnet over a coil, or pass a coil through a
magnetic field, electricity flows through the coil. Electric generators are
based on that principle. Electric generators turn into electric motors when
electricity is passed through them (At least the electro-magnetic rotational
kind.) So why can\\\'t we make electric generators that are based on diamagnetic
materials, such as diamagnetic coils or diamagnetic electromagnets? *See the
electromagnetism logic database diagram I drew that shows in the database
margins what is perpendicular and parallel to what, etc, in the relations of
different kinds of electromagnetic properties and devices and materials maybe.
**See the different kinds of ferromagnetic and diamagnetic electromagnet
designs I invented (hand-drawn diagrams 1/7/2005). Copyright 2/8/2005 Justin
Coslor PDA Kiosks Use a PDA as a remote-controlled teaching pendant for a
robot, and bolt several PDA\\\'s down into a kiosk and network them for use as a
head\\\'s-up display. Attach a keyboard and a switch-box to it, have a stylus on a
cord, and include a printer. The great part is that PDA\\\'s turn on instantly and
consume very little electricity. Networking software and hardware might need to
be designed for them though, but it likely already exists. The kiosks could be
very very small this way, and could just be on a swing-arm or arm bolted to a
wall or tabletop with power cord leading up to them. Copyright 8/10/2005 Justin
Coslor PDA Virtual Reality/Augmented Reality System (See Diagram) Build or
adapt a lightweight sunglasses-like head mounted display that uses high
resolution LCD screens in stereo for portable virtual reality uses with a PDA
and folding PDA keyboard (it should also work on a laptop). Even a single color
high resolution LCD head mounted display for a PDA would be incredible for
reading and browsing the web wirelessly, as well as browsing VRML and Java3D
worlds at at least 800x600 color pixel resolution. Battery life is the main
issue here. You need to be able to get at least 10 hours of battery life, and
it needs to be easily rechargeable. An augmented reality transparent LCD screen
would be ideal or one of those miniature projector LCD\\\'s. Also, it might be
neat to have a wireless 3D finger ring mouse that has several buttons on it, at
least for drawing 3D models and browsing VRML and Java3D worlds and webpages.
The PDA screen could be a small scale version of the 3D HMD scene or
programmable control panel buttons. There could be a videocamera on the HMD for
doing Augmented Reality, and have a visual dictionary pattern matching software
and a 2D to 3D object reconstruction software, as well as have a 6DOF head
tracking system. It\\\'s important that all of the hardware be open source
programmable and be openly interfacable. I realize the military already has
contact lens versions of this Augmented Reality display system, but this would
be affordable to the public. They also have G.W.E.N. (Ground Wave Emission
Network) Tower/Tempest brain interface systems too all over the country (for
martial law population control and clandestine "experiments", and such), but
that\\\'s another matter. Copyright 11/12/2004 Justin Coslor My eBike Shop:
Eco-Bikes (TM)(R) If I ever wanted to live in Pittsburgh for an extended period
of time (such as to go to Grad School later on), I could open up an electric
bicycle dealership, and fit each bike with solid rubber tires from
GreenTires.com or AirFreeTires.com, so that they wouldn\\\'t get flats, and only
sell bikes that use batteries that aren\\\'t highly toxic (no lead-acid or NiCd
batteries).It could be open in the evenings so that I could go to class during
the day, or I could hire some students to help run it. We could do maintenance
and repairs on electric bikes too, and recycle broken batteries and recycle or
re-use parts from old eBikes sometimes. Most of all, they\\\'d be affordable, and
fitted with baskets and fenders, and comfortable seats. This way, students
could easily ride to the East-End Food Co-Op & Whole Foods for groceries, carry
library books, etc, and ride all over town and re-claim the roads. It\\\'d get the
city to put in special well-swept bike lanes all over town and to pass enormous
hit and run penalty laws for drivers to follow. We\\\'d make a huge push to get
bike racks re-installed on all of the public transit buses too. 1/13/2005
Justin Coslor Business ideas: Right now as a money maker I could retrofit
people\\\'s bikes with electric motors for a $100 fee + parts. I could also sell
hard drives with Linux pre-installed on them for $100 + parts (~$150). It could
come with a set of GNU/Linux CD\\\'s. I could also sell homemade random number
generators for $250. See my journal entry dated 12/15/2003 and the drawing I
made on 1/22/2005 for details. They could be useful to staticians, scientists,
and people who use encryption technologies. The machine is capable of
generating large amounts of random seed numbers simultaneously for each cycle
that it is run. I might be able to sell it for even more. Copyright 1/21/2005
Justin Coslor Ram-Horn Handlebars for City Bikes: I think whomever designed the
handlebars on city bikes got the idea from looking at a pair of rams horns.. As
such, it would be neat to bolt a rams skull onto the bike in place of the
handlebars or make a hollow or cast mold version to sell to ram/bicycle
enthusiasts. (GNU-compatible) Copyright 1/13/2005 Justin Coslor Augmented
Reality Goggles for doing X-Ray Vision and 3D Image Reconstruction Architects
could like augmented reality goggles for doing x-ray or sonar vision and stereo
3D image reconstruction of live video data as they walk through a building
while wearing the goggles. The goggles could be used as digitizers to map
details onto the original wireframe CAD schematics. The military already has
this, but I don\\\'t know if anyone has done an open-source open-hardware version
of this for the commercial market and archeology gear.
------------------------------------ 9/19/2004 Justin Coslor Simple magnetism
experiment: What happens when you wrap copper wire around an insulated tube,
then put an iron bar inside the tube, then run electricity through both the
copper coil, as well as the iron bar, but from separate power supplies? What
happens when you switch the polarity of the iron bar\\\'s power supply? What
electrical voltage, amperage, resistance, and magnetism (Gaussmeter) readings
do you get in each case, and in the case where you don\\\'t energize the iron bar
but only the coil? Does the electricity running through the iron bar amplify
the magnetic field or the current of the copper coil?
------------------------------------- Copyright 9/19/2004 Justin Coslor New
Kinds of Electric Generator/Electric Motors In the diagram I drew, you can use
toroidal coils inside roller wheels that roll on the inside of the magnet tube.
Permanent magnets or horseshoe electromagnets can be used around the outside
(since they are three times stronger). The axle is split in the middle and one
end of each of the rollers\\\' coil wire goes to each corresponding separate half
of the roller\\\'s axle, which in turn comes in contact with the corresponding
dived separate main axle end cap, and just have a spring- loaded contact
terminal on each half of the axle. Another model could also have a split axle
terminal, and could have a frictionless magnetic bearing surface internally. 11
/7/2004 Justin Coslor Batteries. In the October 2004 issue of Popular Science,
they talked about a thing where the European Space Agency and Team Encounter
allow people to pay $25 to have a photo + description get etched onto a High
Density Rosetta nickel chip and get send off into space on a solar sail
spacecraft. The chips are expected to last at least 1000 years. Gold substrate
CDROMs last about 10 years. D-Skin.com, for $6, sells five CD skins that
prevent scratches. Put a copy of my friendly intelligence diagram on one of
those nickel chips. It acts kind of like microfiche. We might make some
friends. Around 200 B.C.E., Parthinians in present-day Baghdad make a crude
battery, an iron rod surrounded by a copper cylinder inside a clay jar filled
with vinegar. -------> Try stacks of copper or zinc and bismuth plates
separated by two silicon rods between each junction and fill the container with
vinegar or bleach that you\\\'ve added extra salt to, or use condensed urine or
something as the go-between, and put it in a tempered glass or tempered ceramic
container and attach terminals. Around 1898, size-D zinc-carbon batteries made
their debut inside a paper tube along with a bulb and a brass reflector - which
became the first "electric hand torch". What we know of today as the
flashlight. Would bismuth be a good substitute for carbon or graphite in a
battery? Would stainless steel be useful instead of iron in a wet cell?
Stainless steel has some toxic materials in it though. Would bismuth be a good
substitute for lead in batteries? They\\\'re similar on the periodic table,
however bismuth is nontoxic and diamagnetic. Water is a conductor and it\\\'s in
vinegar. Sodium chloride is too, and acidic fluids are often in batteries as
well. Maybe acids have extra electrons and bases have extra holes?
------------------------------------ 11/7/2004 Justin Coslor See pg 35 of The
Random House Book of 1001 Wonders of Science by Brian and Brenda Williams.
Battery idea #1: Do electrolysis on salt water to make bleach, which probably
will act as an acidic conductor. Then put the bleach in a glass or ceramic jar
and make a solid bismuth coil and put it in the bleach filled jar, and take a
solid zinc rod and electroplate it with magnesium or dip it in magnesium and
put it in the middle of the bismuth coil (or if a bismuth tube is used instead,
put it in the middle of that with some space between it and the
magnesium-coated zinc rod), and make some kind of cap with a pressure release
cannister and valve. It might work as a great battery, but keep it outside just
in case it leaks or explodes. The bleach might crystallize (which is good) if
you add a bunch of extra salt to it after doing electrolysis. If it does
crystallize, it\\\'s less likely to leak. --------------------------- 11/7/2004
Justin Coslor Battery idea #2: Drugstore battery. Open up a tin can and dump
the contents out and fill it up with Pepto Bismal and take a plastic cap and
roll up some aluminum foil and jam one end of it into the cap and wrap the
other end of it in wax paper and fold it over the edge. (You might have to boil
the water out of the Pepto Bismal to thicken it into bismuth.) Next wrap some
more tinfoil around the rim of the can and fold up an extension terminal from
it. I don\\\'t know if this will work at all. Copyright 10/31/2004 Justin Coslor
Diamagnetic Energy Generation Satellites When a coil is passed through a
magnetic field it generates a current of electricity through the coil. So, make
a satellite that has a coil made out of diamagnetic material, and at night it
should generate a current because the earth\\\'s diamagnetic field bows out on the
dark side of the Earth due to the solar wind form the sun. As the Earth turns,
the coil will be passing through that bowed out diamagnetic field. It\\\'s
necessary to use diamagnetic material for the coil because it will be used to
turn the diamagnetic field of the earth (which is between the poles) into an
electric current running through the coil. A coil made out of non-diamagnetic
material would not be receptive to the diamagnetic field. Some examples of
diamagnetic materials are pyrolytic graphite, bismuth, water, and salt. The
reason that ice floats is because water is diamagnetic, and ice is more
diamagnetic than water, so it repels the water\\\'s diamagnetic field, and the
diamagnetic field of the Earth. One could theoretically make a gigantic coil
out of ice, and generate electricity with it. One could also make a satellite
that could travel through the Earth\\\'s magnetic field in its equatorial orbit,
and the diamagnetic coil would produce an electric current perpendicular to the
Earth\\\'s diamagnetic field, and it could beam the electricity back to Earth in
the form of microwaves. One could even try making a satellite that can just sit
and levitate permanently in a semi-fixed position in space on the dark side of
the Earth. The moon is probably diamagnetic since one side is always facing the
Earth. (See related pictures.) 10/7/2004 Justin Coslor Electromagnetism People
say that electric fields run perpendicular to magnetic fields, so maybe the
electric force can be thought of as the active force in atoms, while the
magnetic force can be thought of as the stabilizing force in atoms, yet the two
forces correspond to each other to balance the energy and space in an atom, as
energy is always in motion, and space provides potential for that motion to
occur, whether it be in loops, knots, spirals or transfer/transformation to
other planes, shapes, and dimensions of energy flow pathways. I like to guess
at possibilities then check science, math, logic, and philosophy or experiment
to see if I got anything right. It\\\'s my hobby. It helps me develop intuition
and reasoning ability. 9/26/2004 Justin Coslor Magnetic Coordinates Magnetic
North is offset from True North because the Earth wobbles at an angle that
causes there to be four seasons. The Prime Meridian goes around the globe, and
on one hemisphere it travels through Magnetic North, and on the other
hemisphere it travels through Greenwich, England. It also goes through True
North and True South. Figure out where the magnetic South Pole is. Is it split
into branches? It\\\'s probably in Antarctica. At what points on the Earth\\\'s
geomagnetic field coordinates (x,y,z polar coordinates) are there severe
distortions or landmark sub-fields? Is 360 degrees optimal for calculating an
oblong spheroid? The Earth is not round, but more of an oblong spheroid. Why
did the Greeks choose 360 degrees? Greek astronomer Hipparchus (~165- 127 B.C.)
made a map that included Antarctica so they must have had advanced technology
then. The map I\\\'ve seen is fairly complete, but it only shows one side of the
globe. If he was able to have a complete detailed map of Antarctica way back
then, then surely he had a way to obtain a map of the American Continents?
Ptolemy\\\'s map also denoted Magnetic North & South offset from true North &
South. Where exactly is the magnetic North Pole, and how often do the poles
flip and why? Does the Moon\\\'s orbit get pushed away from the Earth temporarily
during the flipping of the Earth\\\'s poles? Probably, since the moon is mostly
made out of diamagnetic material. That\\\'s why we always see the same face of it,
and diamagnetic materials repel both North and South Poles and like to hover
over the mid-point between them (Satellite levitation application... Read
diamagnetic levitation article in New American Scientist around this month.)
Copyright 9/23/2004 Justin Coslor Magnetic Battery Idea Steam and gas atoms and
molecules probably contain more quanta than liquid atoms and liquid molecules,
which partially utilize each other\\\'s electron shells. Where steam and gas atoms
probably have higher electron orbits and have their own repulsive/attractive
field depending on the spin. Crystallized atom and molecule configurations
probably exist because a bunch of atoms and molecules were either compressed
into a tight area and extended the orbit of their strong force electron shells,
or possibly the atoms might have been cooled from a liquid state while under
the influence of a magnetic field. [10/28/2004 update: The magnetic field of an
atom is the stabilizing force, and the electric field is the active force. .
.probably?] Is it possible to make crystallized oxygen or crystallized hydrogen
or other gases? [Then just add energy of the atom\\\'s particular spectroscopic
frequency to liberate the molecules out of the crystallized form. They\\\'d
probably have to be mixed with other elements to form crystals at reasonable
temperatures.] What if they were highly ionized gases or isotopes? What happens
if you put two conductor terminals on a quartz crystal and then bolt a magnet
onto each side of the crystal independently so that the magnets repel or
attract each other? Will that provide a steady supply of electricity due to the
compression forces on the quartz crystal? It might be a way to make a magnetic
electricity battery that doesn\\\'t run out until the magnets lose their charge.
Just attach a circuit or light to something to the terminals. 8/23/2004 Justin
Coslor Toroidal EM Fields (like for fusion. . .see attached pictures): I\\\'m not
claiming that this is correct, but maybe some elements conduct electricity and
have a magnetic field that is perpendicular to the flow of electrons and maybe
other elements conduct magnetism and have an electric field that is
perpendicular to the lines of flux. Maybe some elements do both, and maybe some
do neither. Gravity is proportional to how active an element is at the quantum
level, coupled with how interactive it is externally. Make a toroidal field
around a Peltier Stack (dissimilar metals like a battery all stacked up), and
blow gases with extra electrons into the toroidal squasher and their extra
electrons may travel up the Peltier stack, sort of like a battery, but it could
polarize the stack and maybe could function as a power source without actually
doing fusion. It could also be a kind of electron stripper. ??? Gravity is
about how the energy of the internal interacts with the energy of the external.
It might merely be cyclic regions of space that have greater potential for
motion (for energy quanta and other cyclic space regions) than fairly neutral
space regions. I believe that space holds a compression and that the function
of space is potential for motion. Time is a function of motion, and matter is
energy quantas swirling in compressed cyclic space regions. Maybe the space has
knots in it to lock the quanta into cycles? Who knows?
---------------------------------- Copyright 9/18/2004 Justin Coslor Note to
self: Diodes act as one-way gates. Transistors act like adjustable-flow valves.
They can be strung together to make Boolean logic circuits.
---------------------------------- Copyright 9/19/2004 Justin Coslor
Crystalline Memory Lattices: Maybe one could use intersecting laser beams to
control the shadow-growth of semiconductor crystals for making optical
circuitry or maybe some frequencies will grow lattice structures conducive to
electron flow (Negative cells), while others (or pits rather than peaks) might
grow structures (or carve/melt) conducive to receiving electrons (positive
cells/holes). ---------------------------------- Copyright 9/19/2004 Justin
Coslor Super-cheap gigantic diamagnetic electromagnets: Try making an
electromagnet out of ice as the conductor. Take some plastic tubing and fill it
up with water, cap the ends, coil it up into a spiral, then freeze it. Then
take a larger piece of tubing (wider) and freeze (or make a horse-shoe-style
ice magnet). Then run electricity through the ice spiral and see if it is able
to act as an electro-diamagnet (since water is somewhat diamagnetic). The
lattice structure of the ice crystals might be good for holding a diamagnetic
charge. Who knows??? Try it. If it works, make an enormous one. What happens
when you beam light through the electrically conductive ice coil spiral?
------------------------------------ Copyright 9/6/2004 Justin Coslor
Supercomputer and Memory Technology Build a supercomputer out of millions of
memory units of the kind I designed earlier that have no moving parts and
operate optically. Locate the computer in either Antarctica or in a very cold
climate, such as on a satellite that stays in the shadow of the Earth or
underground on the dark side of the moon. It could be nuclear powered, or
powered by a thermocouple that runs off of hot rocks (thermonuclear isotopes).
use an instantaneous communication relay between it and stations on the Earth
(see physics research in the book "The Dancing Woo Li Masters" by Gary Zukav).
The key component to the memory units is the new kind of laser range-finder I
designed when I was 16. 2/17/2005 Update by Justin Coslor: Recently I came up
with the optimal geometry for an entirely new and different (and possibly
better) solid-state dense nanotechnology memory geometry design. See my most
recent journal entry to this date on that topic, as well as the partial diagram
I drew that describes the mathematics behind it. Copyright 9/24/2004 Justin
Coslor Speculation about photodiodes, photovoltaics, and the nature of energy
transmission through materials. Figure out how photodiodes work. I think they
somehow convert light into electrons. That would mean that the light quanta
would add energy to the diode\\\'s N-plate\\\'s electrons to bring the outermost
electrons to a higher orbit around the nucleus and eventually high enough to be
able to transfer over from one atom to an orbit around an adjacent atom capable
of supporting an extra electron. When all of the atoms on the N-plate have
electrons at transferable orbits they will hop over the junction and start
filling in the orbit holes in the P-plate\\\'s atoms. When the P-plate\\\'s atoms
fill up with transferable atoms, then electricity will flow in either direction
because the N-P plates will act just like a regular conductor. In fact, you
might not even need a P-plate unless you wanted a one-way gate effect.
Probably, you would have to use a material that has a photon emission frequency
that is the same as the kind of light that you are exposing it to, in order for
the photons to get absorbed by the electrons orbiting around that material\\\'s
nucleuses. Use electron spectroscopy to find suitable materials for the
spectrums of light you expect to use the photovoltaic cells under. Transparent
photovoltaics could be made out of some kind of crystallne materials
(appropriately receptive to the incoming wavelengths), and could be made very
thick, where both the anode and cathode structures could be transparent, and
could be made of a semiconducting crystalline block that has been formed while
under the polarizing magnetic field of a powerful superconductor. That way,
every molecule in the transparent crystalline block would act as a photodiode,
like miniature photovoltaic cells. Perhaps materials that do not look
transparent to us are quite transparent to their specific spectroscopic
frequencies of radiation, and that may be why they are able to "conduct" those
frequencies of radiation and in doing so, convert that energy into electric/
electron current. ??? Copyright 9/14/2005 Justin Coslor A New Kind of
Potentiometer (which can be used as a tactile sensor) Details: Make it as a
spring-loaded linear-action potentiometer (variable resistor), where the
farther the lever rod is pushed down,t e more resistance there is on the
current flowing across it between the rod\\\'s conductive bearing surface, and the
decreasingly (or increasingly) conductive plate or channel that it glides on/
in. It\\\'s a very simple device, and clusters of them can be used in conjunction
as sensors for tactile kinetic force of varying magnitude, depending on the
strength of the spring at the bottom of the rod. It could be used n the
finger-pads or gripper-pads of a robotic arm. The glide plate/channel could be
lined with a carbon resistive strip similar to the one in regular slide-pots.
There could be some stranded insulated wire that comes off of the top of the
rod, and the rod itself could be insulated except for the bearing surface. The
ground wire would be at the top of the glide-plate\\\'s resistive carbon film, so
that as the rod gets pushed down against the force of the spring at the bottom,
the resistor would turn on or off farther and farther depending on how it is
designed. The conductive bearing surface could just be a strip of metal with a
rounded bend in it, so that it has some spring action, and it could have a
similar rounded strip-spring on the back of it so that it pushes on the back
wall to exert some force in the direction of the carbon-resistive film. Or the
bearing surface could be a roller wheel with conductive lubrication, such as
graphite powder, and a back-wall spring similar to the one just described or
just have two independent bearing surfaces opposite to each other with a hinge
and a spring in the middle (although that is an unnecessarily complex design).
Or the bearing surface could be like a miniature computer mouse ball in a cage
that only travels forwards and backwards and made out of metal. When I
mentioned possibly using a channel in some designs I meant it to be like a
vertical gutter that is rectangular, or triangular. A triangular gutter design
would probably be the easiest and most stable of the gutter designs to make,
and it would provide a lot of stability against possible twisting action of the
spring-loaded vertical push rod. See the photo of the brief diagram that I
scribbled for this invention. Contact me for terms of licensing, development,
publication, and mass-production. JustinCoslor@gmail.com I\\\'d like everybody to
be able to buy these very inexpensively for their projects, and send samples
out to university students and professors for free. All I\\\'d like is the
standard fair National average inventor\\\'s royalty percentage on the gross
profit of the venture capital wholesale sales gross profit of these
potentiometers and off the gross profit of the sale of improved models so that
I can continue to come up with new inventions and have some spending money. I
shouldn\\\'t have to be poor forever, because that causes so much unnecessary
misery. It\\\'d be wonderful if I had a better workshop and some helpers and
colleages and more resources to work with. Copyright 9/12/2004 Justin Coslor
Highly sensitive tactile/optical range-finding robotic finger sensor-pads: For
rich tactile data input (robo-fingerpad pressure sensors that yield very
detailed sensory input) sensors, add a stereo computer vision range-finding
unit to each finger, and have slider resistor tubes that are spring-loaded
under a rubbery surface skin, and make them flexible if possible. (Update
Copyright 11/11/2004 Justin Coslor: Think of sea anemony-like manipulators that
each have a little CCD range-finder setup and tactile sensors for precise
gentle manipulations.) I could probably build a test pad out of drinking straws
and little springs or rubber bands glued to pins that are soldered to either
trimpots on a swivel-mount or tiny slider-resistors. The skin could be molded
from liquid latex or a piece of bicycle innertube, and the stereo-cameras could
be located up on the arm with fiber-optic light input extensions that go right
out to the finger tip pads where they can be precisely angled to yield
stereoscopic CCD range-finding data so that the fingers will each visually know
how far they are from the objects they are trying to manipulate. Maybe the
CCD\\\'s can be quadranted up into four distinct camera matrixes per CCD (or
more), each of which would be fed light by it\\\'s own independent fiber optic
cable that has an optics unit on each end....? That would bring the costs and
power-consumption down dramatically because not as many actual digital cameras
would need to be used to obtain the effect of having a whole bunch of
independent digital cameras. Copyright 9/11/2004 Justin Coslor A cheaper kind
of touch-screen for computer kiosks for 2D operating system user interface
haptics and 3D augmented reality user interface haptics. Note: I suppose this
is similar to the haptics in the movie "Minority Report." Instead of using
expensive breakable touch screens, why not set up a regular CRT computer
monitor that has a piece of replaceable plexiglass over the monitor face, in
the form of a kiosk interface whose mouse movements or click-movements are
recorded by an overhead pair of digital cameras that are running an open-source
stereo computer vision algorithm as drivers that utilize your own hands\\\'
movements as 3D haptics devices. If the operating system is a 2D point-
and-click environment, then your index finger pointing in 3D angles will move
the mouse and touching (or nearly touching) the plexiglass plate will execute a
click (selection). If the operating system is a 3D environment, then perhaps
all control of the environment will occur at least several inches to several
feet from the plexiglass plate, and perhaps there could be an on-screen 3D
animation that mirrors the hand movements, with trainable hand gestures to
control different features and functions of the environment. The important
thing that I must explicitly note is that the stereo cameras are to be situated
on an extended arm overhead, and potentially out of reach, and that they are to
be located either directly above or behind the user\\\'s head so that they are
only focused on the user\\\'s hands (and not their face) because they are not to
be made in such a way as to be able to digitally photograph the user\\\'s face,
since that would be an invasion of privacy which could potentially be mis-used.
Also, there might be a projection onto a plexiglass plate in front of the face
but behind the hands so that the hands can interact in an augmented reality
environment in addition to being haptics devices for the above-described
kiosk-like CRT screen\\\'s operating system. Copyright 10/29/2004 Justin Coslor
Course Catalog and Skills Inventory (Software Idea) Dig up my old note from
years ago about how course catalogs can be interconnected and turned into
software that inventories and sorts prerequisites and possibilities for which
courses the student is qualified to take based on the courses they\\\'ve taken. It
would help students who aren\\\'t sure what to major in, to plan their school
year, as well as help in organizing quite concretely the knowledge they\\\'ve
learned and the knowledge they can learn. The students can also build
hypothetical models of future courses of study with the software, and can help
teachers model new curriculums, and link their courses to other people\\\'s
curriculums. Libraries can use it too. Also, every student should be able to
see a summary page that lists one paragraph on the topics that will be, or have
been covered in each course in each semester of their education, if not only
just for the benefit of their memory, to see what they\\\'ve learned (or haven\\\'t
learned), what they\\\'re learning, and what they intend to learn (hypothetically)
in the future. That way, they can easily reference their educational background
later on in life, which is especially important if they are lifelong students
or researchers. Artificial intelligence reasoning engines could be made that
generate comprehension tests and study guides and executive summaries for any
book in any language, and they could link related materials and form historical
and/or geographic timelines of the history and spread and evolution of ideas
and concepts. Such software might already exist somewhere in some form.
Employers in industry might also like to look at these educational coverage
charts if they\\\'re looking for knowledge of specific skills in applicants during
their hiring process. Copyright 12/14/2001 Justin Coslor Portable Robotic
Hole-Threading Tool for Building Robots and Stuff. It drills a hole, then
threads the hole with a tap, then runs a bolt through the hole, then puts a
washer and a nut on the other end of the bolt. It might even clamp two pieces
of material together while fastening them together in the above described
manner. It would be a hand-held device, and someone could even make a version
that\\\'s an autonomous mobile device (for use in space or factories), and another
version could be a stationary tool bolted to the floor or something. There
could be several different models. I originally thought of this several years
ago through have not yet drawn schematics. ------------------- Components:
Drill: high torque, high speed motor, use gears and speed control. Tap: stepper
motor + Air nozzle to blow chips and slag away. Bolter: leveraged robo-wrist +
gripper (or possibly a robotic version of one of those spring-loaded universal
wrenches). Nutter: leveraged robo-wrist plus gripper. Clamp: as simple as
possible, like one of those 1-turn clamps or something with rubber pads.
Sensors: slag sensor detects chips and blows them away, torque sensors keep
machinery from jamming and breaking. Vision keeps track of what is in each
quadrant of a laser matrix projected onto the work surface. Parts orienting
system: Loads bolter and nutter and washers (part of nutter) and keeps parts
oriented and organized. Copyright 11/12/2004 Justin Coslor Cottage Industry
Explosion: Portable Inexpensive Manufacturing Robots for Intentional
Communities In America Make portable inexpensive manufacturing robots hooked up
to an open-source computer terminal (possibly running the 3D modeling software
Blender, and some business & art software) as a whole cottage industry
manufacturing system that can be easily set up to refine materials and produce
products that can then be sold locally and over the Internet. People would
design their own products of course, and they can be quite intricate and
precise and easy to replicate due to the use of robots and computer
technologies. The software would make the business part of it a snap. Design a
general system and then use it to fabricate duplicates of itself, and sell and
install them exclusively to people who live in Intentional Communities, so that
America can win back its manufacturing Jobs from China and India, as well as
keep its high-tech jobs from being outsourced. Copyright 11/5/2004 Justin
Coslor Cottage Industry Stuff Print up some tee-shirts, coffee mugs, bookmarks,
and refrigerator magnets of my friendly intelligence diagram. Post them for
sale on the Internet. Write a little booklet that goes with the diagram, to
include with each item, to help people understand the diagram. Look for a
bootable linux distribution that has life-critical software and family business
software. Order DSL and a bootable DVDRW drive and download a copy of Knoppix.
Build the portable computer-numeric-controlled (CNC) machining robot for
carving ornamental wood furniture and paneling, and collect an archive of
geometrical designs and nature patterns to use, and template concrete masonry
patterns for face plates for beautifying buildings and for making sculptures
and walkways. Build the originals out of clay and wood and use stereo digital
cameras or a laser range-finder scanner to digitize the designs. Sell these
portable CNC machines inexpensively to help Americans form cottage industries.
I could build ornate bookshelves and industrial design things that could be
environmentally friendly and quite useful. I\\\'ll need a shop to use unless I
just design it and have other people build it like Ikea does. I could also sell
Atmel AVR SP12 microcontroller programmer kits, and already-put-together
microcontroller programmers, and I could put together an electronics assembly
robot, and a very small very precise set of robotic arms for doing fine work.
11/11/2004 Justin Coslor Holographic Range-finding Orbiting Space Telescopes,
for Holographic Geometric Reconstruction of Distant Celestial Objects and
Celestial Systems (or point it at the Earth for Geographical Information
Systems). See pg. 59 of The Random House Book of 1001 Wonders of Science, for
info on how to make holographic images (depthy multi-perspective images). Do
that on a much larger scale but out in space or even have the Holographic
crystal on the Earth and have the space telescopes pointed either at the Earth
or put distant objects in space. Use a gigantic holographic crystal that is
sensitive to a wide spectrum of different wavelengths (colors). Have the
holographic crystal on a slightly different orbit than the space telescopes,
and the crystal should rotate slightly to capture the changing perspective of
the orbiting stereo or triple space telescopes beamed at it. Put the space
telescopes way out in space. This is nothing new, but the first two space
telescopes could make the XY plane, and range- finding according to focal
length, but add a third space telescope to do XYZ geometric reconstruction of a
remote volume (the front face of the picture at least) with some distortion.
The third telescope could be above and behind the other two for extra
dimensionality, and that way there wouldn\\\'t be a blind spot, however in other
configurations the blind spot might indicate where the readings start to become
somewhat reliable. Copyright 10/29/2004 Justin Coslor Safety Skin for Robots
Make a fabric-like skin of flexible tactile sensors to be put on the outside of
robots, so that if a person (or another robot or obstacle) bumps into the robot
or gets in the way of the robot, the robot immediately will shut down and
disengage to prevent the chance of injuries to the person. This would be an
additional layer of safety in addition to visual and/or sonar/IR/laser
tachometer environmental sensors. Copyright 10/20/2004 Justin Coslor Free
public archive of great anonymous writing and poetry There should be a website
that acts as a free public archive of great anonymous writing and poetry
throughout history. It could be searchable by a variety of interactive
intelligent means, and offer a secure round-the-world ping-pong submission form
that leaves no trail but is subject to human review as to whether it is worth
archiving. Also, it should be entirely based on free open- source software that
is eloquently coded and understandable and proven. Copyright 10/11/2004 Justin
Coslor Precise EM field sensing nanocoil fabric Insulated conductive nanocoils
could be useful for sensing electromagnetic fields very precisely. Somebody
could make packets of independent nanocoils that could be laid out in a
flexible fabric form (or rigid) where each coil would be processed and a
numerical value would be passed to a unit of nonvolatile random access memory.
Then this coil fabric, much like a curtain, could be passed through a room
vertically to get a reading of the electromagnetic field strength at each point
in the room. It could be useful for figuring out where to stick accupuncture
needles in medical treatments too. It would also be useful for teaching people
how to use their own body\\\'s bioelectric field in unison with the Earth\\\'s
geomagnetic field to heal themselves and others, and to people how to harmonize
such forces regardless of the situation. It seems like this kind of
instrumentation and a visual augmented reality software simulation interface to
this kind of sensory equipment could really improve people\\\'s awareness and
mentality, and thus their lives. Eventually they could learn to sense the
fields without the electronic equipment to some degree and not need the
apparatus anymore to stay healthy and balanced. Already there is bioelectric
feedback therapy, MEMS (micro-electro-mechanical-systems), and augmented
reality technology (which is a form of virtual reality). 9/8/2004 Justin Coslor
Notes on the Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh book "Agents Unleashed: A public
domain look at agent technology" by Peter Wayner Copyright 1995, published by
Academic Press, Inc. Agent Technology: Setting Up Secure Networks Parallel and
Distributed Programs User Interfaces Being applied to agent technology: Genetic
algorithms, computational learning theory, classification theory,
adaptive-preference-based decision making automations, personal oracles/
prodigies, power librarians (parse text, translate languages, figure out
language ambiguities), emotional interface via animations, network roaming
ability, and virus protection. Agents are like viruses that are designed to be
helpful. Agents are often programmed in list, and controlled by TCL (Tool
Command Language), and transmitted via PGP encrypted mime-encoded email. XLISP
is a simple, free, microcomputer-based implementation of a subset of the Common
LISP standards. In LISP both the data and the program are stored in nested
listt trees. Inside the LISP environment, agents can easily build up, execute,
and tear down data structures. In LISP there ar no pointers, memory allocation,
and deallocation is automatic, and there ar some security holes but they\\\'re
patchable to keep agents from overstepping their bounds. Common LISP uses a
hierarchy of packages, which are separate tables of variables, functions, and
their names. These package hierarchies offer structured access to variables,
and can be used to keep incoming agents from executing any system calls or
handling local memory. LISP\\\'s debuggers can be re- tooled to send an agent back
home along with the pre and post screen of the remote LISP compiler\\\'s
evaluation loop hooks when an agent causes a memory access or system resource
error. Some smaller versions of LISP such as XLISP-Plus have object-oriented
features called Common LISP Object System. Dynamic linking/binding to find the
latest functions is used in some versions like Scheme, which lead to the more
algebraic C-Like syntax version called Dylan. Commercial versions of LISP
compilers have extra features and are faster than the free compilers. Even
compiled LISP code is semi-interpreted and doesn\\\'t have a direct ability to
manipulate pointers because it needs to stay mobile in memory, so compiled LISP
code is a great environment for supporting agents that can act on it. If I plan
to program Aritificial Intelligence in LISP rather than Java, then I should buy
the book "Common LISP: The Language" by buy Steele, for hardcore LISP
programming. Check out other books too and read reviews and recommends online.
There are probably some free LISP tutorials online as well. Copyright 11/14/
2002 Justin Coslor 2D Wireframe Digitization of Digital Images for Computer
Vision How would the orientation matching algorithm work in the first three
methods? (See 11/14/2002 algorithm.) Irregular objects: 2D width match 2D
height match Form a 2D square around the border of the object. Treat each pixel
in the image as an independent pivot point. For each pixel, draw straight lines
in a layer over top of the image at every possible angle that intersect at the
pivot point (all of which are as long as the longest dimensions of the image).
Measure how much of each line intersects with the object, especially where
there are two or more adjacent pixels in a straight line. If you do this for
all of the pixels you\\\'ll have a coordinate database of angles and lengths and
start and end points or midpoints, which is very useful for forming groups by
associating the lines in the image in various ways, such as: intersection,
adjacency, parallelness, curvature template matching, and continuity of same
line. For some operations one can choose the line that intersects the longest
distance across the object. This is the longest intersecting line from the
current 2D perspective, whose midpoint is the pivot point. This is useful for
the following: at each endpoint of the longest intersecting line draw a point.
Draw a perpendicular line at each endpoint of the line. Start out with a
perpendicular line from the known schematics, that is as long as the longest
dimension of the object (at each endpoint), and make sure that the
perpendicular lines\\\' midpoints are centered on each endpoint. Now form a box at
each half of the object and reduce the width of the box until the outer edge
touches the outside of the object. Do this for each of the two halves of the
object. Now you have a tightly fitting box around that particular 2D object in
the image! The point of doing this is to be able to separate that object from
the rest of the image, and also to figure out the object\\\'s actual perspective
in the image, which can help at guessing 3D attributes. This object can now be
put into an object catalog, each image of which can be rotated in 2D for
matching against for doing approximative Bayesian pattern matching that
incorporates rotation attempts. (See related diagrams from my handwritten
journal.) Now rotate this box and 2D image in the X,Y plane by N degrees about
the pivot point until the box is perfectly vertical and horizontal on the
screen. Now you have the computer show a front view of the 3D object model so
that you can rotate it forwards and backwards about the pivot point until you
get the two positions that match the length of the 2D image. Compare the two
lengths from the pivot point to the endpoints to find the longest or shortest
line for comparison to decide which of the two 3D positions to choose. For each
of these two possible positions we now want to find the two positions in which
the width matches by twisting the 3D object model, and comparing the widest or
shortest half of the box to the 3D model\\\'s two possible width twistations to
find out which width to choose. Now you have the correct 3D perspective match
of the 2D image and you know the movements necessary to re-orient the object in
reality to the 0,0,0 position. So just have the robot do it and begin again
with the next object, and the next, and the next, etc. Copyright 11/14/2002
Justin Coslor Computer Vision Thought Build a little robot that can go around
its environment and pick things up and study them as objects. It would need to
be able to categorize, visualize, contextualize, and use guess-work
(heuristics) scientifically to discover each object\\\'s function, unique and
generalized characteristics (size, weight, shape, color, physical
flexibilities, bend points, and center of gravity), symmetries, associated
objects (around what objects is it generally found and used with?), physics
force vectors during use and storage (this much weight pushes on the floor at
these surfaces (points of contact and interaction), material it is made out of
(robot has a portable microscope to analyze materials and to identify the
presence of cells), surface temperature (infrared vision module can help
determine what objects are alive, very hot or cold, or how much hotter or
colder they are than the ambient room temperature), internal composition (sonar
scanner with 3D computer optimization), and statistical analysis (out of all
the times it has been recognized, what is the average context of objects &
movements of it and the objects interacting with it?). For a practical
application, the robot would only need to recognize a few objects and be able
to ignore all of the rest of what it sees so that it could focus just on what
it needs to know and extract data needed to accomplish its goal. It will need
to simplify what it sees so that it can quickly find what it is looking for. It
should only store in its memory the things that it will use frequently. It will
frequently identify a few particular objects that are in different
orientations. For this a simplified 3D wireframe model would be useful, also
surface color(s) (optional), symmetries, and center of gravity, or handles for
gripping on to (like symmetry lines). Let\\\'s say you have a mechanical part and
the vision system has a 3D wireframe model of its structure. The robot grips
its handle or its center of gravity, picks it up, then figures out what
orientation it is in. How does it figure out the orientation? 1. It could have
touch sensors like a little pin board whose spring loaded pins reveal the shape
(as a matrix of depths) while the robot holds the part. After the shape is
recorded in that orientation, the vision system could match the shape to the 3D
wireframe model and then tell the robot arm to rotate the part in the XYZ to
get the part into 0,0,0 orientation so that it can be placed somewhere
accurately and systematically. 2. It could scan the part with a wide laser
range-finder, then match and reorient the part. 3. It could take a digital
photo (CCD camera) of the part from 0,0,0 orientation then rotate the 3D
computer model in the X,Y,Z until the part\\\'s current orientation matches, then
use an optimized X,Y,Z rotation algorithm to find the shortest method of
rotation to get from the original X,Y,Z orientation to the desired 0,0,0
orientation, then the robot arm would make that adjustment and place the part.
4. Use a part\\\'s tray with little wells to catch the parts as they are shaken
across the tray (like on the SMART Cell manufacturing robotic system I use to
work on at the CMU Robotics Institute years ago). Copyright 8/7/2005 Justin
Coslor Binary Space Partition Trees I\\\'m currently on page 17 of the book "Java
3D Programming" by Daniel Selman Copyright 2002, and it mentioned using binary
space partition trees as a method of sorting relative positions of objects so
that the objects don\\\'t need to be re-sorted when the viewpoint changes. It
didn\\\'t explain how binary search partition trees work though I think it means
forming a tree of nodes for each object, where each node represents a vertex on
the object, and the vertexes are sorted by order of depth (layering). That way
multiple objects can be compared by comparing their vertex depth, and when the
perspective changes a different node on the depth trees becomes node #1, 2, 3,
etc in terms of the layering. Copyright 8/10/2005 Justin Coslor Data
compression for 3D polygonal objects What needs to happen to make 3D and
Virtual Reality and Augmented Reality popular again is to have more software
compatible with Google Earth (A geo-spacial imaging software that can be used
for navigation --- which needs more functionality). But more importantly what
needs to happen is to have software that is able to represent 3D models using
hardly any data at all. Better 3D data compression is needed, possibly like
that stegonometry idea I had, where vertex coordinate systems are represented
as layered pictogram polygons (see the idea in my notes -- July 2005), where
three linked polygons is a 3D point, or set of 3D points, such as an entire 3D
object\\\'s vertexes -- the first polygon represents all of the x coordinates in a
particular object. The second polygon represents all of the Y coordinates. The
third polygon represents all of the Z coordinates successively, and form each
pictogram polygon in a different color for each of the objects in the 3D scene.
The whole thing is in the same base and on the same pictogram XY coordinate
system. The whole thing can be represented as a tiny vector graphic such as a
PNG file that represents an entire 3D rendered mathematical model/
visualization, which is very easy bitwise map which translates directly into
the 3D, so it\\\'d be really fast for rendering each abstract pictogram map of the
object\\\'s vertex coordinates. Also, no two pictogram polygon vertex pixels will
fall on the same point in the pictogram as long as all objects\\\' 3D vertexes are
separated by one pixel or more in 3D space. This would be a highly compressed
way to represent the spacial coordinates of all polygonal objects in a 3D
scene, in the form of a tiny image file, and if you string together multiple
pictogram image files into a sort of a video sequence, the objects in the scene
could gradually move through 3D space sort of like a morph sequence, into the
positioning registered by the second pictogram image file in the video
sequence, etc. . .like a gif89 animation file, but as a vector graphics image.
That would save a lot of processing power and representation space in recording
and playing back 3D video sequences in virtual reality. See my note from 6/13/
2004 on information theory. In it I translated an old paradigm of information
theory into terms of patterns in contexts. "If a set of contexts constitutes t
bits of unique information, and the set of patterns that the contexts are based
on contains less than t bits of unique information, then it is impossible to
create those contexts from that set of patterns." Well, since coming up with
this idea today about encoding 3D models, and the regular 2D stegonometry
version of it (see my other essay), I no longer believe that this paradigm is
true in all cases (such as this one, for example), because it doesn\\\'t account
for alternative perspectives of representation of information (of patterns in
contexts) which are different and of different computational complexity, but
are analogically equivalent. Copyright 8/11/2005 Justin Coslor 3D compression
scheme I\\\'ve developed an alternative system of representing numbers (which
represents them as pictograms), which I turned into an alternative method of
representing 3D vertex coordinates of polygons. In it, each sequential group of
three digits in the pictographic polygon representation represents the X
coordinates for the vertexes from left to right, or the Y coordinates for the
vertexes from top to bottom, or the Z coordinates for the vertexes from front
to back. So in that way depth and ordering of the vertexes is very organized
and the 3D scene can be drawn in layers very quickly from front to back so that
it will be easy to see which vertexes can be skipped due to their being hidden
around the backside of the object. The three pictogram polygon numbers each get
drawn in different colors in the vertex map, and the three polygon numbers gets
parsed into either a set of X coordinates, a set of Y coordinates, or a set of
Z coordinates as previously described, where each partition represents the
three digit location of X, Y, or Z. Probably what needs to happen as a next
step is to make three coordinate buffers: one for the X axis, one for the Y
axis, and one for the Z axis, and then copy the parsed sequences of groups of
three sequential digits into these buffers. Then there will either be a fourth
buffer that combines all of these numbers into a set of XYZ coordinates
representing the vertexes of the 3D object, or else the computer will
dynamically triangulate perspectives on the 3D object to be constructed, where
each sequential list of dynamically combined XYZ vertex coordinates is
generated from left to right, top to down, front to back, based on a projection
of an angular viewpoint of the original orientation of the X, Y, and Z
coordinate lists. That is how re-orientations of perspectives get generated. If
a polygonal pictogram is to be built for each perspective, then the polygon
points in the pictogram can just be combined one column at a time for the X, Y,
and Z vertex polygons (in groups of 3 pixel column places on the pictogram\\\'s X
axis), then the vertexes just get placed on the 3D grid, and lines get drawn
between their boundary shells as a wireframe and skins get applied. If you
wanted to get really simple you don\\\'t even have to use pixels, you can just
make an XY array of 1\\\'s and 0\\\'s, and have it 9 or so digits high in the Y axis
(2^9), and as long in the X axis as necessary, and every group of N binary
digits horizontally gets multiplied by the level it\\\'s on in the Y axis to give
you a set of sequential X coordinates for vertexes of the object in the 3D
space, and in do the same in another XY array for mapping the 3D object\\\'s
vertexes\\\' Y coordinates, and do the same in another XY array for mapping the 3D
objects\\\' vertexes\\\' Z coordinates. Then an XYZ vertex coordinate list gets
dynamically generated for each perspective of this vertex arrangement that gets
requested. That\\\'s how to make an object\\\'s vertex map in binary rather than
pixels. Also, hierarchical representation can be applied to generating
different 3D perspective\\\'s projection calculations. By putting the coordinates
in terms of hierarchical representation (as described in previous essays),
calculations can proceed much more quickly than normal since it speeds up
arithmetic by chunking the calculations into their highest powers of 2 (which
the computer can calculate in one clock-cycle), times a multiplier, plus or
minus an offset, which can also be chunked similarly if it is large. That would
speed up 3D rendering of video sequences dramatically. This is the format that
I want to encode the vertex maps of objects in the visual dictionary I intend
to build, and I intend to systematically and axiomatically categorize the
visual objects in terms of qualitative and quantitative properties, and cross
reference each object to a linguistic encyclopedia, thesaurus, and dictionary.
Most of this work will be automated. Copyright 10/21/2002 Justin Coslor
Thoughts on Computer Vision: 2D Snapshot to 3D Wireframe The Process: Open
image Identify edges of objects Identify symmetries Identify duplicate objects
in different configurations to fill in holes in that kind of object throughout.
3D Clues: Straight lines Corners and intersection points Arcs Complex areas:
generalize areas such as wrinkles in fabric, or limbs on a plant, or grass (or
just generalize by color). Random or repeating texture on flat or curved
surfaces can also give clues. Guess at 2D perspective. Rotate perspective to
rectalinear*. Guess at hidden areas by filling in holes. Rotate to top
perspective, and guess at holes. Rotate to side 1 (*see diagrams) perspective,
guess at holes. Rotate to side 2 perspective, guess at holes. Build 3D
wireframe. Of any 2D picture you basically can see three sides of a cube, and
may have to guess at the other three sides. It\\\'s important to note distorted
areas and account for that in the image processing and representation.
Copyright 9/29/2002 Justin Coslor Computer Vision Thoughts Classify an object\\\'s
parts by first cataloging unknown details. 1. Catalog details 2. Catalog
association of details a. by position b. by range of motion c. by flexible
areas of topography) 3. Catalog repeat patterns. Gage size and distance by
resolution of a known calibration point, or guess. Do so without having to use
active sensing such as radar, laser range-finders, etc. Scale images down to
the lowest resolution possible while still being able to extract geometric
information of a reasonable precision. Write "3D shape-guessing software" that
guesses the 3D shape (generalized topography) of objects in a 2D image. It
could guess at the dimensions it could not see, and could not change the
perspective to any possible side or angle. I know this already exists, but
where, and for how much, and is it available anywhere as free open-source
software? It could progressively assimilate more complete mappings of objects
in view as you feed it more images of the scene or similar scenes. 10/21/2002
Justin Coslor Imaginative new perspectives on famous artworks. Do a painting of
Leonardo DaVinci painting the Mona Lisa in the same style and colors as his
painting except from a different view point of perspective. Study his self
portraits and guess at the unknown details. Do a whole series of paintings of
famous artwork scenes but from different perspectives in those same scenes as
the originals. All in the same style and colors. Copyright 10/01/2002 Justin
Coslor More thoughts on my Thermoelectric Generator Cloth invention 1. Similar
to an inverse Peltier junction 2. Could be embedded in hot ceramic resistors to
recover thermal energy. It could be used to capture lost heat in electronic
circuitry, such as in transistor heat-sinks. It might need a regulator circuit
(which could be embedded on a single chip) to charge a battery or make use of
the electricity directly for non-critical functions in various circuits. It
could be used in cars, on the under side of the hood and inside of the
radiator, and on the exhaust manifold. it could be used to line hot-air
balloons if made thin enough. It could be used in nuclear power plants It could
be wrapped around radioactive hot rocks for use in space. It could be made out
of: 1. metallic powder composites, 2. electroplated wire that can be woven into
a fabric before or after being electroplated. 3. woven dissimilar metal wire.
Inventions: T.E.G. cloth, PDA OCR hand-scanner software Dremel CNC robotic arm
and robotic clamp U CAD/CAM interface software. Copyright 10/16/2002 Justin
Coslor Inventory of revolutionary inventions that I\\\'ve invented (but not built)
up to this date: 1. Thermo-Electric Generator Cloth 2. Sine Spiral Graphing for
Circular and Complex Motion 3. Conical Orbit Graphing for Satellite Path
Visualization and Analysis 4. Dremel CNC Robot (suitcase sized) "Hands Building
Hands" robotic assembly system and haptics interface 5. Library PDA + Hand
Scanner Optical Character Recognition Portable Digitizing System (A software
that could be checked out temporarily from every libary in the world. 6. New
Kind of Cheap Laser-Rangefinder System (use not yet known)...laser
range-finders are normally very expensive. 2/25/2005 Update: I\\\'ve since
invented a new kind of solid-state crystalline shadow-growth computer memory
device that has no moving parts, that my new kind of laser-rangefinder would be
perfect for accessing and writing the data to. 6/18/2005 Justin Coslor Puzzles
There needs to be more geometric puzzles that people can fiddle with with their
hands while they talk or drink coffee. Some could be games. A coffee shop could
have a tough puzzle or a riddle that they could have for people to try, where
they have to buy a cup of coffee to try it, and if they solve it they\\\'d get a
free cup of coffee. 6/19/2005 Justin Coslor World medicine Have a worldwide
franchise of hydroponic greenhouses stocked full of medicinal plants. Put one
or more in every town and in each one there\\\'d also be a laboratory and clinic,
similar to how they do in China, but using plants from all over the world. The
clinic would be a front-end for a vast computer medicinal expert system
artificial intelligence, and have a fast full-body scanner in each one to model
their body in 3D for closer inspection. Have a ridiculous amount of data
storage capacity, memory, and computational power, and have a laser surgery
machine and blood analysis equipment, etc. Combine Western Medicine with
Naturopathy, Homeopathy, Accupuncture, Chinese Herbal Medicine, Native American
remedies, Aruveydic medicine, and South-American Shamantic and Russian
(Shamantic and modern) medicine, and ignore smug know-it-all healer wanna-be\\\'s.
Medicine goes part of the way, belief accounts for 40% of healing (according to
scientists), and the rest is basically a gift from God. Do everything possible
in the best possible way and constantly improve all areas. Also have spiritual/
energy healers if you can find good ones or manage to train them. The fee
should be a sliding scale based on a percentage of income, and have payment
plans, which can be partially paid by working in the greenhouse, lab, or
clinic. ---------------------- Book V: Philosophy & Quotes
---------------------- Copyright 5/15/2005 Justin Coslor Some topics I like
that I think can really help people and the world: I like to study virtue, but
I don\\\'t necessarily believe in ritual. It is disturbing when there are rigid
thinkers telling people what to do and think rather than positive possibility
thinkers inspiring people to understand how to be able to appreciate ways of
life that are beneficial and fair for all. I like to study logic, particularly
epistemology, as it is at the foundation of everything. I like creating
multi-purpose adaptable tools, conceptually, mathematically, and eventually
physically, because they add abilities, perspectives, methods, save time and
effort, and in doing so they help people. That is why I like robotics,
intelligent agents on a software grid, math formulas, mental machinery, and
powerful concepts. I like psychological enhancement, to get rid of cognitive
dissonance, self-defeating thinking patterns, bad habits, and to train new
skills. Psychology can optimize knowledge bases by gaining new perspectives
that can be used as useful ways to search your memory, store new memories
associatively, and for recombining data from your memory to develop new and
better understanding, as well as enhancing your perception and awareness by
knowing what to look for and by being aware of areas and topics and things and
relations and operations and systems that might normally be overlooked.
Psychology can help increase intelligence (reasoning ability), hope,
motivation, incentive; clarify and harmonize expectations and emotions, and
improve interpersonal relationships and communication. 7/18/2005 Justin Coslor
Applied Spirituality Applied spirituality is very much like the axiomatic
deductive reasoning system in logic, because each person believes in a set of
spiritual axioms which shape their perceptions and interpretations, decisions,
and judgments, as they progressively shape and adapt to modifiable and
uncontrollable realities in their temporal collection of experiences, memories,
simulations, and navigations; both physical and perceptual. Spirituality is
mostly perceptual navigation through modes of awareness and conceptual
evolution: of concepts that remain true when perceived of from any level of
awareness. If concepts remain true through different modes of awareness, then
the truth is metaphoric. Many spiritual truths are metaphoric, analogically,
across contexts. Copyright 6/20/2005 Justin Coslor A dream I had A few months
ago I had this very interesting dream where I was hiking to a holy place with
some friends and when we reached the ancient sanctuary/shrine we removed
several stone/nanotechnology cases, each one containing a sample of the
original strain of some grain and grain-like foods: corn, wheat, flax, oat,
homany, garbanzo beans, etc. They were each in their own cryogenic case and we
couldn\\\'t carry all of them and dropped some on the trail down the mountainside
because they were heavy and bulky. We were carrying them back to base camp. The
food samples in each case were millions of years old, yet still fresh and
alive, ready for planting. After we got them back to camp we got inside some
kind of space craft and traveled through time to a period of civilization where
these plants were wiped out by genetic engineering and plant plagues, and we
planted them there. Note, we didn\\\'t manage to get all of them there because we
dropped some down the mountainside and there was great urgency, but we got most
of them to their destination. Then we traveled back home in the ship, and the
pilots took off and this glowing ghostly time-travelling dragon-like god or
alien or something thanked us and it vanished up into the sky. We returned the
remaining cases too before we got home. I think we had to travel way back in
time to get those samples, then went way into the future, then went back to our
original time. It was a really neat dream. That dragon-being could shape-shift
too, and was very powerful, and I remember it being in another one of my dreams
which I can\\\'t remember right now. Copyright 6/14/2005 Justin Coslor The
Dreamworld The worth of the mind is not its mundane existence in the waking
world (which is really the sleeping world -- a world people imprisoned by
limitations and thoughtless recursions); the true worth of the mind is in the
dream world, where there are unimaginable possibilities manifesting together
from parallel universes, past and future, often meaningfully, as if
communicated by higher powers for self discovery, experimentation, and
exploration of universal truths, with many teachers, friends, lovers, and
monsters interacting beyond our control. Dreaming is not about controlling
others or characters in the dreams, it\\\'s about what we actually decide to do
when placed in bizarre situations. There need not be any purpose, but only to
experience new forms of perception and interaction. Sometimes it\\\'s merely rest,
but when our brain is activated fully on during R.E.M. sleep, our mental
frequencies, the time-frames of our cognition system, can resonate at higher
vibrations so that we can temporarily merge our consciousness with higher
dimensional planes where big ideas are anchor points in temporal constructs,
and we might share a moment with some advanced beings, or meed some dead
relatives who have resonated out of their bodies. There might be portals to any
moment or place in existence on higher vibrational time-frames, where we are
just a cup of espresso away from Nirvana (or a R.E.M. siesta rather). High
activation, Time dilation, Quite a sensation, Deep contemplation. 7/5/2005
Justin Coslor "Violence is not the way to anything but hell." 8/10/2005 Justin
Coslor The Philosophy of Nuclear War The philosophy of nuclear war is that If
I can\\\'t have my way during my four year reign of leadership, then I\\\'m going to
make the world a radioactive waste dump for the next 50,000 years. Now that\\\'s
selfish. Copyright 6/23/2005 Justin Coslor Bubble Quote "You\\\'re either in a
bubble or a cage." 6/20/2005 Justin Coslor The Future Maybe I should try
inventing some new traditions. . . They could be fun yet practical, and totally
unenforcible. . .Like having a good stretch every morning and evening, planting
a tree every year, and a garden if possible, mailing your old outdated consumer
products to some poor 3rd world country family, writing a poem every time
something special happens, writing your own book of prayers without crusading
them about, saving a percentage of your income, spending time each week in the
reference section of the library, not ever being violent under any
circumstances, manufacturing some of the things you need and use by hand, etc.
Maybe make some good traditions of your own that\\\'ll come in handy in the
oncoming ice-age that we\\\'re long overdue for. . .global warming has bought us a
little bit of extra time before the poles flip and giant icebergs ravage the
landscape and dot the oceans south of the Arctic Circle and enormous mountains
will rise up in Antarctica and around the tectonic plates, which will scoot
around some, setting off volcanic eruptions all around the ring of fire around
the world, probably earthquakes too occasionally, as always. Ask your local
scientist. Whatever, have a cup of coffee and build yourself a bomb shelter.
Good manners were invented for when times get tough. Be polite, honest, humble,
and compassionate to everyone. Always. Adapt. -- Justin Coslor Copyright 7/7/
2005 Justin Coslor Homo-Sapien Evolution Maybe mankind evolved into the
standing upright posture because females have always generally preferred taller
males to shorter ones, since standing upright makes the male appear taller and
thus bigger and more capable of hunting and gathering and protecting the
females and young. Copyright 6/13/2005 Justin Coslor Prizes When people go from
one kind of high or treat to another in life, they keep on going despite any
lows or mishaps that happen in between, unless the mishaps convince the person
that the whole chase just isn\\\'t worth going playing anymore, in which they
either commit suicide, change their lifestyle, or get into psychiatric
treatment. I believe that suicide is murder, and I refuse to be a murderer
under any circumstances. In other situations, such as in the case of the
soldier\\\'s myth of kill or be killed, I believe that in the long run it\\\'s
better to die than to take the life of another. Copyright 6/7/2005 Justin
Coslor Interconnected Galaxies Paper topic/abstract: (I don\\\'t know if this
theory already exists or how to test it, but I do know that it works on a small
scale, which is the whole basis for instantaneous communication devices). Large
scale quantum-tunneling between the centers of the galaxies in the universe as
part of post-big-bang super-symmetric inverse quantum string theory, but on a
very large scale. If space holds a compression, the closer to the center of a
galaxy you go the deeper the rabbit hole gets. In other words you can get to
any other galaxy by going through the tunnel in the center of the galaxy, which
connects to the center of the universe, where you can then just go down one of
the tunnels leading in the direction of one of the other galaxies. The next
step after that is to figure out how to access the network that links other
plurality bubbles (other universes), if such a network on that scale exists
within the Monality superstructure (the ordinal of existence) somehow.
Copyright 6/9/2005 Justin Coslor Star Gate Bubbles form in infinite One,
compressions of space, an infinite none. Partitions of One spiral through the
none, A cosmic explosion, birthed zillions of suns. Galactic shrapnel, each
center a gate through time to the origin of infinite fates. The inverse
symmetries tunneled connections innate, from center to Hub to center star gate.
Copyright 8/27/2005 Justin Coslor Pulsars I think pulsars might be the smaller
ends of worm-holes that are rapidly untwisting their tube and spewing energy
and matter out the end as they flail around like a runaway fire hose. Worm-
holes are spinning black holes that are connected together in the form of a
spinning tunnel of compressed time-space. Naturally, if one end is much smaller
than the other it will flail around due to the energy rushing through it, and
due to the unraveling of the twist in the tube. Pulsars flash multicolored
light and are somewhat of a mystery. Copyright 5/31/2005 Justin Coslor Freedom
in Sleep Let all of the pain Just wash away With the tides of breath.
Submitting to the will of the Universe, I accept what is In life and love --
But hope for what can be. 5/29/2005 Justin Coslor Good Thinking V.S. Flawed
Thinking The true crux of the eternal battle between the actions and ideals of
good versus the propagation of that which is not, is long-term thinking V.S.
short-term thinking. If everyone thought on an extremely long time-frame in
their decision making (thus giving up the applicability of the self, i.e.
selflessness), past their own lifetime to far future generations ahead, beyond
all applicability, their decisions would be geared towards the sustainable
support of symbiotic life of all forms, especially friendly highly intelligent
life, and well-meaning respect for life forms that are on different paths.
Short-term thinking is flawed, and it paves the way for more flawed thinking.
Copyright 2/19/2005 Justin Coslor Hollywood Quote Hollywood is very dangerous.
They literally "program" people\\\'s beliefs, intentions, expectations, and goals.
11/11/2004 Justin Coslor Do magnets affect time? Time is probably relative to
the kinds of motion that a person or object is doing in physical and Platonic
space because time is a function of motion. I know that when I get inside a
Magnetic Resonance Imaging tube, the powerful superconducting magnets make it
feel like time slows down temporarily, and I can feel the Earth turn under me.
It\\\'s a little disorienting. Measuring Progress 11/8/2004 A person\\\'s progress is
best measured recursively. 11/11/2004 Often over several lifetimes. 10/28/2004
Justin Coslor Expectations People\\\'s expectations need to be made more pliable
and common belief of what is truly important (such as self-mastery and
preventing neglect) need to be re-evaluated. 10/27/2004 Justin Coslor New Logic
Operators Some kinds of logic use the relations "AND", "OR", "NOT"; but maybe
we could make forms of logic that use the operators "UM", "ER", "UH", "AHA!",
"AWE". Example: 10 UH 10 UH 10 UH, ER, UM, 101010 AHA! 1110 AWE. 10/12/2004
Justin Coslor Motion Motion is the transposition of location from one
configuration to another. Time is a function of motion. 10/28/2004 Justin
Coslor Time is only perceptible from a 3rd person perspective on motion, where
the observer\\\'s motion is not in parallel to the motion (transpositions) of the
locations (states, set theoretic configurations) being observed. 1/7/2004
Justin Coslor Notes on the book "Connections: The Geometric Bridge Between Art
& Science" (this book is about Design Science) Pg. 1. All good design should
have: 1. Repetition - some patterns should repeat continuously. 2. Harmony -
parts should fit together. 3. Variety - it should be non-monotonous (not
completely predictable). --------------------------- 1/10/2005 Notes on the
book Telepathy and the Etheric Vehicle by Alice A. Bailey page 13: 1.
Telepathic communication is a. Between soul and mind b. Between soul, mind, and
brain This is as far as interior individual development is concerned. 2. When
it is found between individuals, telepathic communication is a. Between soul
and soul. b. Between mind and mind. c. Between solar plexus and solar plexus,
and therefore purely emotional. d. Between all three of these aspects of energy
simultaneously, in the case of very advanced people. 3. Telepathic
communication is also: a. Between a Master and His disciples or disciple. b.
Between a Master and His group, and a group or groups of sensitives and
aspirants on the physical plane. c. Between subjective and objective groups. d.
Between the occult Hierarchy and groups of disciples on the physical plane.
Occult literally means "hidden." Gnosis means "hidden knowledge." e. Between
the Hierarchy and the New Group of world Servers in order to reach humanity and
lift it nearer the goal. Page 3: There is a group of Thinkers that falls into
the seven main divisions and is presided over by three great Lives or
super-conscious Entities: the Manu, the Christ, and the Mahachohan. They work
primarily by influencing the minds of the Adepts and the initiates, who then
influence the disciples of the world, and these disciples each in his own place
and on his own responsibility work out their concept of the plan and seek to
give expression to it as far as possible. Page 5: 1. Telepathy is possible
through omnipresence. 2. The interplay of many minds produces a unity of
thought which is powerful enough to be recognized by the brain. Page 14: 1.
Instinctual telepathy 2. Mental telepathy 3. Intuitional telepathy 1.
Initiating agent // communicator // the Knower (Described in books such as the
Bhagavad Gita) 2. Recipient // communicant // the Known 3. Medium //
communication // the Field of Knowledge. Copyright 8/13/2005 Justin Coslor Deep
Thinking Each person is like a unique antennae to the knowledge of the
universe, and a good adept can interconnect large groups of people spread out
over any distance (but local is best), into a gigantic antennae to knowledge in
the universe, especially when cosmic thinkers are involved. There are only
about six degrees of separation between everybody on earth; that\\\'s a network
six node levels deep. Likely one can also interconnect dead people and other
forms of life on various planes and remote view a search net around distant
galaxies. It seems though that the bottleneck is on methodologies of perception
such as language and logics and common ground with other contexts that are
based on different sets of axioms than the seeker/observer is aware of. Clarity
and perceived/believed utility are also issues. 10/02/2002 Justin Coslor On the
outer walls of the main branch of the Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh it says:
Carnegie Libary of Pittsburgh - Free to the people The following names carved
into the stonework: Homer, Herodotus, Cicero Virgil, Chaucer, Tasso Shakespere,
Jonson, Milton Moliere, Pope, Voltaire Goldsmith, Goethe, Scott Irving,
Macaulay, Longfellow Emerson, Lowell, Thackeray Dickens, Hawthorne, Tennyson
Leonardo, Raphael Michaelangelo, Titian Copernicus, Galileo, Kepler, Newton
Buffon, Galvani, Herschel, Laplace Rumford, Fulton, Watt, Stephenson
Pythagorus, Aristotle 12/3/2004 Justin Coslor The Soul The Soul is the
intelligent Agent personified by the Mind and identified by the body, which
holds the record and vectors of intentions and actions and reactions (reactions
are caused by expectations) throughout the solitudal and multi-bodied
interactions of one\\\'s life stages and configurations along growth paths of
progression, discovery, exploration, experience, and recursions in finite and
universal contexts. NOT COPYRIGHT, FREE FOR UNLIMITED USE 6/5/2005 Justin
Coslor Monality and Plurality In the diagram I drew in 2004 about "One Possible
Order Of The Development of Friendly Intelligence", the concept of Monality is
the Realm of God, and plurality is the realm of lesser gods (as subsets, or
rather partitions of Monality). Monality is infinite oneness; it\\\'s all pure
energy without space or partitions. It\\\'s ultimate interconnectivity, and is the
Hub and Vessel of everything. Throw in some partitions or space and you have
plurality, which is differentiation and multiplicity. Plurality exists as a
network of bubbles inside Monality, each one containing infrastructure that is
made of partitions of Monality. God and gods are Intelligences, capable of
creating, destroying, harmonizing, and experimenting through any level of
plurality through the medium of the Monality of their existence. Probably a lot
more too. Location and size are mere variables of ideas and are only
comparisons between some perspectives. Copyright 8/28/2005 Justin Coslor What I
Believe I believe that God exists in omnipresent Monality; partitions of which
all things are composed of in this particular bubble in the Monality that our
universe and possibly others exist within. Monality is pure energy with no
space and no partitions (oneness). Life forms on this plane and others are
configurations of Monality. Life forms are of innate design coupled with the
design of the effects of our decision making processes throughout our life, and
our configurations are also influenced by the interactions with rest of our
environments (nature/nurture). It takes a bit of epistemological logic and
physics and philosophy to see the reasoning behind all that. Everything I just
write is just an approximation though because all truth is but an approximation
of a deeper truth. Sometimes I\\\'m wrong too. Justin Coslor Friday, November 12,
2004 Life Rule of Thumb :: Love and Forgiveness Current mood: thoughtful Life
Rule of Thumb This rule of thumb is as true for life in general as it is for
medicine: 1. First, do no harm. 2. Next, take the route that will do the most
good in the long term. (Always assume there\\\'s going to be a long term. Just
think cosmic. Look up into the sky and wonder, and stay positive.) 3. If things
aren\\\'t currently working, search for more possibilities, ask for help, and
figure out why. Meditate on it. Deep Prayer is a form of Meditation that works
and can be utilized to help understand things. Science is good too. Like for
carefully perceiving, finding, and manipulating the building blocks of
translatable, augmentable, and adaptable patterns in contexts. Also, pass on
well-intended strategies that work. Also, don\\\'t ever use religion as an excuse
to treat people, anyone, or anybody badly.
-------------------------------------------------- Love and Forgiveness Typed
with additions: 5/1/04 11:10 A.M., and 9/25/2004. Written by hand: 2/29/2004
This is Copyright 2/29/2004 by me, but you are free to distribute this text
online under the license of The GNU Public License Agreement (GPL), as long as
you include this URL in the space below, and comply with the GNU Public License
Agreement (GPL). I\\\'ll probably publish it in a book at some point, so I reserve
the paperback and hardback book publishing rights for this original document.
50 percent or more of the proceeds from any booklet, brochure, magazine
article, newspaper article, or any other kind of non-online printing that comes
out of this must go to charity. (Read about the GPL license on the http://
www.gnu.org website for terms of online redistribution and augmentation.)
---------------------------------------------------------------- http://
www.myspace.com/index.cfm?fuseaction=user.viewProfile&friendID =141380 aka:
http://myspace.com/dr_octo
---------------------------------------------------------------- Metaphors are
geometrical, in a sense, that is to say they follow mathematical geometries.
That is to say, metaphors can be thought of in terms of geometrical patterns
and systems. ---------------------------------- Clairvoyance is the ability to
see patterns within unknown contexts, where the patterns\\\' contexts contain
unknown variables. That is what makes the contexts unknown.
---------------------------------- The opposite of love is not hate. The
opposite of love is doubt. Hate is a subset of fear. Fear is a subset of doubt.
Fear comes from a doubt in one\\\'s expectations of something, or a doubt in the
position of a game theoretic situation. Anger is a subset of fear in some cases
because it comes from fear of the unknown or fear of one\\\'s own doubt. In other
cases anger is a reaction to disrespect, where one fears that another does not
respect them (or fears that another does not respect themselves or others), and
thus does not love or appreciate them, (love and appreciation are the same
thing, but in varying degrees and ways) because disrespect is rooted in doubt
and is sometimes also linked to fear. One may not have to appreciate or love
something to respect it, but in order to love certain qualities of something,
one must be able to appreciate those qualities (often through understanding
more about them, that\\\'s why understanding of good qualities enhances our
ability to recognize and appreciate them in others (and even learn to find them
in ourselves)), though what is good for one person is not necessarily good or
as good for another person). We all live different versions of the same basic
life. Forgiveness is the permanent action (and decision) of not being angry at
someone (including oneself). In other words, forgiveness is the forgetting of
the painful emotions and judgments brought about by the misdeeds, and
re-framing the memory of the actions themselves into a more understanding
context. A key component of the forgiveness mechanism is NOT HOLDING A GRUDGE,
and adapting ones\\\' own perceptual model to make true forgiveness possible, and
this character-building adaptation is a form of positive growth, and the
adaptation is a virtuous act in itself. Unforgivingness and unforgiving
attitudes create unbounded hostility that blocks the flow of love, and prevents
the healing process from balancing and proceeding. The intention of forgiveness
is to erase hostilities, and enhance the flow of love. The old saying "Forgive
& Forget" should be "Forgive, Adapt, and Forget". Part of forgiveness is
acceptance for what is, and faith in what can be. When a person adapts, it is
usually much easier to avoid conflict and mishap. Repentance on the other\\\'s
part often feels like it is necessary, but repentance takes time and gradual
rebuilding of trust (trust being the foundation of love), though forgiveness on
the victim\\\'s part can help motivate the other person to repent through natural
guilt motivation. Forgiving without negative reaction or provocation,
subconsciously tells the offender that you care about them on a spiritual level
regardless of what they have done to you (that is to say, forgiving them on a
very deep and personal level, which for the moment brings you as close to them
as someone they care dearly about), and that often makes them feel as bad about
hurting you as they would about hurting someone they care deeply about -as
someone who would be capable of understanding them as a person. At the end of
the day, we\\\'re all just people. The closeness is temporal, but the memory of
the virtuous act will stick with them and slowly spiritually guide them towards
positive change. These efforts are progressive and lead towards changing them
into a person who is worthy of such forgiveness. A superficial forgiveness act
can be as simple as shrugging something off instead of placing high priority on
your temporally disrupted sense of trust. The state of one\\\'s sense of trust in
a person or group or situation is a major source of emotional emanations, and
events can be looked at simply as information (as the Stoics taught). Once
learned, the skill of forgiveness is so powerful that it can shine as the most
defining element of one\\\'s spirit. When people don\\\'t know how to live well, or
intensely and deeply why, or what\\\'s going on, then all they can be expected to
do is make mistakes. And as a result, people needlessly suffer and cause
unnecessary suffering, due to their lack of well-intended in-depth questioning.
It\\\'s imperative that everyone ask the hard questions, and constantly delve into
critical thinking, so that they can actively seek and find those profound
answers sufficiently. In-depth questioning and intelligent humble search yields
the path of the ultimate quest: to find the ways of life. That\\\'s why
enlightenment is such a high priority, because the enlightened can help to
shape the universe lovingly. Love and Logic (especially wise loving logic), are
the greatest of Lore. They are the primary operators of Truth through the
medium of experience. Respect is acceptance for what is. Repentance is a
changing of one\\\'s ways to that which is loving and harmonious, or at least
respectful. Love and forgiveness heals spiritual wounds. Unconditional love
requires unconditional appreciation for some qualities of someone or something,
even if it\\\'s just the quality that they appreciate you unconditionally. I
believe that it is everyone\\\'s obligation in life to known themselves and learn
about who they are, and as Mahatma Gandhi\\\'s nephew once said, "become the truth
that you seek". It is also important to have acceptance for the parts that you
don\\\'t love so much, and to try to have unconditional forgiveness for any and
all misdeeds and negative events of the past. This feat is possible if a person
knows themselves well. Know all the good that you can possibly know, and you\\\'ll
be well on your way towards doing good and living well. So the big question is:
"Should forgiveness be dependent on repentance (thus dependent on personal
growth)?" The Prophetic Christ Messiah, Rabbi Jesus of Nazareth, Israel,
commanded (nearly 2000 years ago), that we forgive so that we may be forgiven
by God. Yet despite the obvious disadvantages, many sects of the Jewish and
Islamic faiths have stuck with the "eye for an eye, tooth for a tooth"
philosophy for thousands of years. Though too many so-called "Christians" have
done no better in wartime as well as on a day-today basis. So many people
unfortunately cling to fading allusions of purity, righteousness, and belief in
the rite to avenge (the rite of revenge), as an excuse to treat each other
badly (including their own people) and murder each other in "wars". I don\\\'t
care how people try to justify it, or what kind of merit badges they hand out;
killing people is murder, any way you look at it, and in every situation,
killing people is murder. It is so painfully obvious that the only true
sanctuary and justice is through selfless virtue, which is only attainable on
an individual level, and discovering that paradise is within oneself, not in
their surroundings, but in the nature of their connection to the universe
itself. The world is long overdue for an update by advanced beings, since it
seems to be currently controlled by the manipulative misinforming public media,
the individual egos of various predatory authority figures, and a minority of
rich nonelect. Let\\\'s work together to make the world a better place, and to lay
stable foundations for the sustainability of future generations on Earth.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
---------- Violence is not the way, and two wrongs do not make a right. Oh,
btw, most of the Gospels written about Jesus were either burned or rewritten by
the Cathars, er, I mean the Catholic Church...So don\\\'t assume that you know
what true Christianity is all about unless you\\\'re a psychic metaphysician or
something. Regardless of whether or not you feel the need for a messiah, or
believe in the concept of one, there\\\'s a lot of useful wisdom in scripture from
many religions and meditations, and that\\\'s what\\\'s most important. Nobody is
perfect, since life is an interconnected cyclic progression; and nobody is 100
percent correct about everything, since all perspectives are but an
approximation of the whole Truth; but the gems shine through, and can be
learned. There have been prophets living on the Earth at all times in human
history, whether or not people notice them, and regardless of which path to God
the people and the prophets themselves choose to take or acknowledge. Nobody is
inherently better than anybody else under God, because a person can only truly
be compared to themselves, and a person\\\'s progress is best measured
recursively, often over several lifetimes. We must all be humble. Virtue is a
gift of intelligent choice that one decides to give to themselves. It cannot be
bought, it cannot be sold, and it certainly cannot be handed down, but can
merely be laid out in part by example and through education of good wisdom, as
an option to consider for oneself. Some ways just work better than others, and
of the ways that work, some ways work better than other ways for certain
people. People eventually figure out the ways that support life (hopefully),
often with a little help from a friend. The gist of the Creation V.S. Evolution
debate to me is that creation implies genetic engineering, whereas evolution
implies natural selection over long periods of time. Either way, it\\\'s survival
of the fittest, but genetic engineering is largely based on the genetic
expression of traits that arose through natural selection, that have then been
pieced together to make a hybrid life-form. I believe that both occurred in our
development. People often are too concerned with their physical forms, as
opposed to their spiritual progress, and this debate is a perfect example.
Reincarnation does occur until the end-time, however nobody knows when that may
be, or even whether or not they will be granted a chance to reincarnate.
------------------------------------------------ A wise man once wrote "There
are three things you need to be happy in life: Something to do, Someone to
love, and Something to look forward to." Justin Coslor 04/24/2005 More thoughts
on the philosophy of love... "Doubt not, and your love will be unconditional."
Excerpts from Justin\\\'s Journal 4/8/2004 In any complex situation, I think this
is a good rule to stick to: Prepare for the worst, Hope for the best, Allow
plenty of room for the unexpected, and Know what to do next. 5/5/2004 Almost
any given moment can be a decision point, and at every waking moment we are
subconsciously and/or consciously either acting out old intentions, or enacting
new intentions. It is very important to be mindful of our intentions in
stressful situations, and not to allow our subconscious (or conscious)
intentions to in any way hinder or suppress the free will of others. It is also
important to nurture good intent in ourselves and others, and to consciously
guide the focus back into the range of good intent whenever it gets very far
off track. Positive thinking goes a long way, but it should always be coupled
with good intent towards all parties in order to solve problems in the long
run. Positive thinking + good intent = answers. -Justin Coslor 8/7/2005 Justin
Coslor Appreciation We need to try to be worthy of all of the effort that God
went to to create us and to allow us to exist in His universe. The universe is
an unfathomably gigantic and mostly empty space (on this vibrational plane of
time/motion), full of ridiculously powerful forces and chaos, and the best that
we can hope for is the sustainable evolution of symbiotic life, and to make
friends along the way. 8/8/2005 Eventually everyone will be as smart as the
geniuses of today, and much smarter as we evolve together in many ways. 8/8/
2005 Humans have only been around for a minuscule fraction of the time-line of
life on Earth, and as such we\\\'re still an unproven and rather experimental form
of life, but we have a lot of potential and a long way to go. 4/30/2005 Justin
Coslor Paper topic: Ways to heighten interest and ways of inspiring motivation.
--> Re-map expectations Dangle a carrot over core knowledge bases Be friendly,
helpful, and set a good example. Support eternal questioning, but not eternal
doubting. Inquiry needs to be free of judgments and rigidity. Perspective is
retrospective. Truth is found as patterns in contexts. Motivation is a balance
of hope and incentive. Keep values in mind and alive; meaning value all seekers
of truth, the journey, the accomplishments and milestones, and the lessons
learned preemptively and from mistakes and hardship of chance. Add more later.
. .write a paper. 5/1/2005 --> The purpose of life is to survive and evolve,
but the higher purpose of life is to find and share appreciation. To appreciate
and to be appreciated, to find and share insight: that is the basis of value.
1-16-2005 Justin Coslor Here\\\'s one of my philosophies: "Motivation is dependent
on inspiration, hope of success, and incentive to do whatever there is to be
done." 11-24-2003 Justin Coslor. Information Theory Quote: Information is a
symphony of symbolism and symmetry. Perls of wisdom strung in a ring, tossed in
the sky, away they fly. Copyright Justin Coslor 1-19-2005 Resume: Justin M.
Coslor Post Office Box 367 Mount Vernon, Washington State 1 (360) 856-1776
JustinCoslor@gmail.com http://frdcsa.org/~justin Education: - Sedro-Woolley
High School - Graduated 1998, GPA 3.89, skipped 1 year. - Skagit Valley
Community College - Electronics Fundamentals - 1995 - Carnegie Mellon
University - Completed about one semester, in 1997- 1998. (I had some medical
obstacles while at CMU that held me back.) CMU courses completed: English, Math
in Context (Philosophy Dept. freshman survey course), introductory Statistics,
introductory Psychology, Calculus, Computer Skills Workshop. - South Seattle
Community College - Technical Writing, TIG Welding - 1999 Work Experience: -
K-Mart - Consumer Electronics Dept. Cashier - 1997 - CMU Alumni House -
Telephone Fund-raiser (Work-Study Job) - 1998 - CMU Dept. of Computer Science -
Troubleshooting a robotic cassette player manufacturing system (Work-Study Job)
- 1998 - Kelly Temporary Services - Temp Jobs in Seattle - 1999 - CMU Housing
Dept. - Desk Attendant (Work-Study Job) - 1999 - CMU Dept. of Computer Science
- Volunteer - Assisted in mechanical fabrication and design of a pre-prototype
mock-up of a robotic ice- drilling lunar rover - 2000 - Manpower Temporary
Services - Temp Jobs in Seattle - 2000 - Jewish Community Center - Cashier -
Cafe J Snack Shop - 2003 - The Home Outlet Hardware Store - Customer Service,
Sales Cashier, Key-making, and Computer Repairman - 2003-2004 Skills: I have
primarily computer skills, writing skills, and shop skills. My computer
experience includes some Mac Skills, strong Microsoft Windows Skills, some
Linux Skills, and some HTML. I know how to install hardware and software, and
how to update device drivers from Online sources. I\\\'m excellent at
corresponding remotely via email. I learn new software applications very
quickly. I have excellent Online price comparison shopping skills, and
excellent Online research skills. I\\\'m quite organized and analytical, and often
inspirational. I\\\'m very good at preparing and giving presentations: ask me
about this. Possibility thinking, conceptualizing, writing, and reasoning are
my strong suits, and I consider those to be my most valued skills. I tend to
get along very well with everybody, but especially with creative people and
computer programmers. Objective: Part time low stress work where could do some
writing and reasoning. and or design. Typing. Creative composition. Computing
Skills: Programming: basic HTML, basic C/C++ Platforms: DOS (5,6.22), Windows
(3.1, 95, NT, 98SE/Me, 2000/XP), Linux (Debian 3.0, Knoppix 3.2), Mac (<= 8),
PalmOS 5.21 Applications, as elicited through an interview: - Word processing:
Word, Emacs, Abiword, OpenOffice, Notepad, Wordpad, pico - News/Email: Outlook
Express, Netscape Communicator, Eudora, Opera, Evolution, Konquerer - Project
Management: Planner, Stickynotes - IRC: mIRC - BBS: MajorBBS, RenegadeBBS - IM:
Trillian, Yahoo Messenger, MSN IM, AIM, Tik, Zephyr, ntalk, ytalk - File
Transfer: WsFTP, Hotline, NcFTP, FTP, Synaptic Package Manager, apt-get -
Terminal Client: telnet, finger, ping, man, cd, mv, mkdir, rmdir, ls, chmod,
pwd, locate, wildcards, irc, pico, emacs (still learning), for auto-completion
of paths. - System Administration: DiskDefrag, Norton SpeedDisk, Norton
Antivirus, ZoneAlarm Firewall - MS: Word, Powerpoint, Excel, Access, Frontpage
- Adobe: Pagemaker, Photoshop, Acrobat Reader - WWW Browsers: Lynx, Mozilla,
Netscape, IE, Opera - PDA Device: Palm Zire 71 (PalmOS 5.21) - General:
Software/Hardware/Driver installation/upgrades, Online research, price
comparison, setup internet connections. - Typing: Touch, WPM: >45wpm Mon 22 Oct
2007 11:32:42 PM EDT http://frdcsa.org/~justin Universally Free Everywhere
Forever for Friendly Intelligence uses only that are compatible with this
essay. Please: this is never ever to be used whatsoever for treating anyone or
anything badly. I sometimes believe I can and will evolve my ethics to the
point where no one is able to upset me without anyone treating me badly. I
think the key is in never treating anyone badly whatsoever and in always
treating everyone well and being Stoic to negativity and ignorance and harm
against me by treating such abuse and short-term flawed thinking merely as
information which can be upgraded via education into positive long-term
thinking and well-meaning behavior that has positive results for everyone and
no negative repercussions for anyone and that is fair and honest and kind and
helpful and peaceful and non-harmful and humble and compassionate and
egalitarian and friendly to everyone and everything, and logical and unselfish
in the long term, the short term, and all of the moments in between in all
imaginable contexts, including other peoples. Also I believe that it is
essential to try to see the best in everyone and in everything and to try to be
at my best so that there is a better chance of a smooth transition and of
bringing out the best in everyone and of bringing about harmony, love, truth,
logic, and great positive possibilities and realities. Mon 05 Nov 2007 8:27 PM
http://frdcsa.org/~justin/writing3 ONE GOD = HAVE NO OTHER GOD NO IDOLATRY =
WORSHIP GOD NOT FEAR NO BLASPHEME = SWEAR NOT HONOR SABBATH = A DAY OF REST TO
REMEMBER HONOR PARENTS = BE THANKFUL NO KILL = DO NO MORTAL HARM NO ADULTERY =
HONOR MARRIAGE NO STEAL = GIVE FREELY NO LIE = BE HONEST NO COVET = HAVE
POSITIVE BELIEF AND FORGIVE (covet = jealousy = envy) Exodus 20:3-17 1. ONE no
law until an election 2. TWO no law of religion 3. THREE free exercise 4. FOUR
free speech 5. FIVE free press 6. SIX free people 7. SEVEN free petition The
separation of church and state is necessary. ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz 123456789 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23
24 25 26 27 28 29 30 31 1 2 3 5 7 11 13 17 19 23 29 31 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11
12 SUSPICION IS THE DOWNFALL OF MANY WITHOUT PRIVACY THERE IS NO FREEDOM
WITHOUT FREEDOM THERE IS NO LIBERTY WITHOUT LIBERTY THERE ARE NO TOOLS WITHOUT
TOOLS THERE IS NO LIFE EVEN OUR SPIRITS AND MINDS AND BODIES ARE TOOLS ALL LIFE
IS AND MAKES AND USES TOOLS There is Wisdom in many places from many times,
many spaces. All the world is just one world no less important than another.
Wisdom comes from God and knowledge is translated wisdom. Ethics is knowledge
that should be tested shared and taught; never construed for abuse and never
violently fought. Negative assumptions should be challenged at heart by
long-term positive perspectives to redo their start. Perspective is
introspective and retrospective, an inspirational directive. A context is a
continuum of perspective, as a network of patterns. A pattern is a network of
adjectives, as a network of symmetry and synchronicity. Information is a
symphony of symbolism and symmetry. Sometimes ideas come before their
understanding. Ideas that are understood form a continuum of perspective.
Positivity is harmony with peace at its core, merciful and compassionate and
honest and humble and more. There is always more as that is what ideas are for.
Mistakes come from short term thinking such as selfishness and harm. To be
supportive is to be trusting, appreciative, hopeful, and warm. It is essential
to always be honest and not rude. If these ideas are forgotten this life may
seem crude. To do unto others as you would have others do unto you is to treat
everyone well so that there can be sanctuary for all. Each home is important
and is as important as every other. Each person is important and is as
important as every other. Diversity is essential and is like a university.
Together we learn to avoid temptations such as anger and lust and greed. Even
before we do, the Universe knows exactly what we need. Each of us is an origin,
a destination, and a seed of hope. http://frdcsa.org/~justin/writing3 Please
remember to try not treat anyone badly.
\'
        ];
';
